CHAPTER 11
The First World War
1914-1920
feiN.
I'h



^<1
Mfh


UNIT PROJECT
In this unit, you will read about important changes in the nation and the world that helped the United States to assume a major global role. Use your knowledge of historical eras, the unit’s content, and the major characteristics of history to identify the eras in this unit. Then create a webpage that describes the defining characteristics of each era.
The Statue of Liberty by Francis Hopkinson Smith


■>;//

A-TSu.
'.£■ v'.a-







''


ws





■
~s 1. y


a?

<7
B
SECTION 1: The Origins of Progressivism
Main Idea Political, economic, and social change in late 19th century America led to broad progressive reforms.
SECTION 2: Women in Public Life
Main Idea As a result of social and economic change, many women entered public life as workers and reformers.
SECTION 3: Teddy Roosevelt's Square Deal
Main Idea As president, Theodore Roosevelt worked to give citizens a Square Deal through progressive reforms.
SECTION 4: Progressivism Under Taft
Main Idea Taft's ambivalent approach to progressive reform led to a split in the Republican Party and the loss of the presidency to the Democrats.
SECTION 5: Wilson's New Freedom
strong reform agenda as a progressive leader.
A 1916 suffrage parade.
USA
WORLD
[18961
William McKinley is elected president.
: William McKinley *. is reelected.
119001
[1901 ] McKinley is assassinated; Theodore Roosevelt becomes president.
1904J Theodore Roosevelt is elected
president.......
1900
[1889] Eiffel Tower	• 1 d Ofto 1	:	i	
opens for visitors.	. [ 1898 { Marie	5 1899 Boer War
	* Curie discovers	• in South Africa
	: radium.	: begins.
1901	u t
Commonwealth of
Australia is created.
304 Chapter 9
ss
William H. Taft is elected president.
E. B.
Du Bois helps found the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP). myNotefocwk
INTERACT
WITH HISTORY
Woodrow Wilson is reelected.
11919] Eighteenth
Amendment outlaws alcoholic beverages.
It is the dawn of the 20th century, and the reform movement is growing. Moral reformers are trying to ban alcoholic beverages. Political reformers work toward fair government and business practices. Women fight for equal wages and the right to vote. Throughout society, social and economic issues take center stage. As you read the chapter and explore the issues below, use the annotation tools in your eBook to record your thoughts.
Explore the Issues
•	What types of actions might pressure big business to change?
•	How can individuals bring about change in their government?
•	How might reformers recruit others?
1910
1920
119201 Nineteenth Amendment grants women the right to vote.
: 1910 j Mexican	: j 19121 China’s	:
: revolution	: Qin dynasty
: begins.	: topples.
|1914] World War I begins in Europe.
1919 j Mohandas Gandhi becomes leader of the independence movement in India.
The Progressive Era 305

The Origins of Progressivism
MAIN IDEA
WHY U MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Political, economic, and social change in late 19th century America led to broad progressive reforms.
Progressive reforms in areas such as labor and voting rights reinforced democratic principles that continue to exist today.
*	progressive movement
*	Aorence Kelley »prohibition
*	muckraker •scientific
management
•Robert M.
La Follette
• Initiative »referendum •recall •Seventeenth Amendment

hmhsocialstudies.com
»TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about progressive reform organizations.
One American's Story;
Camella Teoli was just 12 years old when she began working in a Lawrence, Massachusetts, textile mill to help support her family. Soon after she started, a machine used for twisting cotton into thread tore off part of her scalp. The young Italian immigrant spent seven months in the hospital and was scarred for life.
Three years later, when 20,000 Lawrence mill workers went on strike for higher wages, Camella was selected to testify before a congressional committee investigating labor conditions such as workplace safety and underage workers. When asked why she had gone on strike, Camella answered simply, "Because I didn't get enough to eat at home." She explained how she had gone to work before reaching the legal age of 14.
A
Mill workers on strike in 1912 in Lawrence, Massachusetts
A
Personal Voice camella teoli “I used to go to school, and then a man came up to my house and asked my father why I didn’t go to work, so my father says I don’t know whether she is 13 or 14 years old. So, the man say You give me $4 and I will make the papers come from the old country [Italy] saying [that] you are 14. So, my father gave him the $4, and in one month came the papers that I was 14. I went to work, and about two weeks [later] got hurt in my head. ”
—at congressional hearings, March 1912
After nine weeks of striking, the mill workers won the sympathy of the nation as well as five to ten percent pay raises. Stories like Camella's set off a national investigation of labor conditions, and reformers across the country organized to address the problems of industrialization.
Four Goals of Progressivism
At the dawn of the new century, middle-class reformers addressed many of the problems that had contributed to the social upheavals of the 1890s. Journalists and writers exposed the unsafe conditions often faced by factory workers, including
306 Chapter 9
Vocabulary
temperance:
refraining from
alcohol
consumption
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
4^ Why did the prohibition movement appeal to so many women?
women and children. Intellectuals questioned the dominant role of large corporations in American society. Political reformers struggled to make government more responsive to the people. Together, these reform efforts formed the progressive movement, which aimed to restore economic opportunities and correct injustices in American life.
Even though reformers never completely agreed on the problems or the solutions, each of their progressive efforts shared at least one of the following goals:
•	protecting social welfare
•	promoting moral improvement
•	creating economic reform
•	fostering efficiency
PROTECTING SOCIAL WELFARE
Many social welfare reformers worked to soften some of the harsh conditions of industrialization. The Social Gospel and settlement house movements of the late 1800s, which aimed to help the poor through community centers, churches, and social services, continued during the Progressive Era and inspired even more reform activities. The Young Men's Christian Association (YMCA), for example, opened libraries, sponsored classes, and built swimming pools and handball courts. The Salvation Army fed poor people in soup kitchens, cared for children in nurseries, and sent "slum brigades" to instruct poor immigrants in middle-class values of hard work and temperance.
In addition, many women were inspired by the settlement houses to take action. Florence Kelley became an advocate for improving the lives of women and children. She was appointed chief inspector of factories for Illinois after she had helped to win passage of the Illinois Factory Act in 1893. The act, which prohibited child labor and limited women's working hours, soon became a model for other states.
PROMOTING MORAL IMPROVEMENT
Other reformers felt that morality, not the workplace, held the key to improving the lives of poor people. These reformers wanted immigrants and poor city dwellers to uplift themselves by improving their personal behavior. Prohibition, the banning of alcoholic beverages, was one such program. Prohibitionist groups feared that alcohol was undermining American morals. Founded in Cleveland in 1874, the Woman's Christian Temperance Union (WCTU) spearheaded the crusade for prohibition. Members advanced their cause by entering saloons, singing, praying, and urging saloonkeepers to stop selling alcohol. As momentum grew, the Union was transformed by Frances Willard from a small midwestern religious group in 1879 to a national organization. Boasting 245,000 members by 1911, the WCTU became the largest women's group in the nation's history.
WCTU members followed Willard's "do everything slogan and began opening kindergartens for immigrants, visiting inmates in prisons and asylums, and working for
FLORENCE KELLEY 1859-1932
The daughter of an antislavery Republican congressman from Pennsylvania, Florence Kelley became a social reformer whose sympathies lay with the powerless, especially working women and children. During a long career, Kelley pushed the government to solve America’s social problems.
In 1899, Kelley became general secretary of the National Consumers’ League, where she lobbied to improve factory conditions. “Why,” Kelley pointedly asked while campaigning for a federal child-labor law, “are seals, bears, reindeer, fish, wild game in the national parks, buffalo, [and] migratory birds all found suitable for federal protection, but not children?”
In the 1890s, Carry Nation worked for prohibition by walking into saloons, scolding the customers, and using her hatchet to destroy bottles of liquor.
307
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
ANTI-SALOON LEAGUE
Quietly founded by progressive women in 1895, the Anti-Saloon League called itself “the Church in action against the saloon.” Whereas early temperance efforts had asked individuals to change their ways, the Anti-Saloon League worked to pass laws to force people to change and to punish those who drank.
The Anti-Saloon League endorsed politicians who opposed “Demon Rum,” no matter which party they belonged to or where they stood on other issues. It also organized statewide referendums to ban alcohol. Between 1900 and 1917, voters in nearly half of the states—mostly in the South and the West—prohibited the sale, production, and use of alcohol. Individual towns, city wards, and rural areas also voted themselves “dry.”
suffrage. The WCTU reform activities, like those of the settlement-house movement, provided women with expanded public roles, which they used to justify giving women voting rights.
Sometimes efforts at prohibition led to trouble with immigrant groups. Such was the case with the Anti-Saloon League, founded in 1895. As members sought to close saloons to cure society's problems, tension arose between them and many immigrants, whose customs often included the consumption of alcohol. Additionally, saloons filled a number of roles within the immigrant community such as cashing paychecks and serving meals.
CREATING ECONOMIC REFORM
As moral reformers sought to change individual behavior, a severe economic panic in 1893 prompted some Americans to question the capitalist economic system. As a result, some Americans, especially workers, embraced socialism. Labor leader Eugene V. Debs, who helped organize the American Socialist Party in 1901, commented on the uneven balance among big business, government, and ordinary people under the free-market system of capitalism. A
Personal Voice eugene v. debs “ Competition was natural enough at one time, but do you think you are competing today? Many of you think you are competing. Against whom? Against [oil magnate John D.] Rockefeller? About as I would if I had a wheelbarrow and competed with the Santa Fe [railroad] from here to Kansas City. ” —Debs: His Life, Writings and Speeches
Though most progressives distanced themselves from socialism, they saw the truth of many of Debs's criticisms. Big business often received favorable treatment from government officials and politicians and could use its economic power to limit competition.
Journalists who wrote about the corrupt side of business and public life in mass circulation magazines during the early 20th century became known as muckrakers (milk rak r). (The term refers to John Bunyan's "Pilgrim's Progress," in which a character is so busy using a rake to clean up the muck of this world that he does not raise his eyes to heaven.) In her "History of the Standard Oil Company," a monthly serial in McClure's Magazine, the writer Ida M. Tarbell described the company's cutthroat methods of eliminating competition. "Mr. Rockefeller has systematically played with loaded dice," Tarbell charged, "and it is doubtful if there has been a time since 1872 when he has run a race with a competitor and started fair." £)
FOSTERING EFFICIENCY
Many progressive leaders put their faith in experts and scientific principles to make society and the workplace more efficient. In defending an Oregon law that limited women factory and laundry workers to a ten-hour day, lawyer Louis D. Brandeis paid little attention to legal argument. Instead, he focused on data produced by social scientists documenting the high costs of long working hours for both the individual and society. This type of argument—the "Brandeis brief”—would become a model for later reform litigation Within industry, Frederick Winslow Taylor began using time and motion studies to improve efficiency by breaking manufacturing tasks into simpler parts "Taylorism" became a management fad, as industry reformers applied these scientific management studies to see just how quickly each task could be performed
|8 Chapter 9
MAIN IDEA
j Evaluating
Ey What contribution did muckrakers make to the reform movement?
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
^Contrast the goals of scientific management with other progressive reforms.
However, not all workers could work at the same rate, and although the introduction of the assembly lines did speed up production, the system required people to work like machines. This caused a high worker turnover, often due to injuries suffered by fatigued workers. To keep automobile workers happy and to prevent strikes, Henry Ford reduced the workday to eight hours and paid workers five dollars a day. This incentive attracted thousands of workers, but they exhausted themselves. As one homemaker complained in a letter to Henry Ford in 1914, "That $5 is a blessing—a bigger one than you know but oh they earn it."
Such efforts at improving efficiency, an important part of progressivism, targeted not only industry, but government as well.
Everybody will be able to afford [a car], and about everyone will have one.”
HENRY FORD, 1909
Cleaning Up Local Government
Cities faced some of the most obvious social problems of the new industrial age. In many large cities, political bosses rewarded their supporters with jobs and kick-backs and openly bought votes with favors and bribes. Efforts to reform city politics stemmed in part from the desire to make government more efficient and more responsive to its constituents. But those efforts also grew from distrust of immigrants' participation in politics.
REFORMING LOCAL GOVERNMENT
Natural disasters sometimes played an important role in prompting reform of city governments. In 1900, a hurricane and tidal wave almost demolished Galveston, Texas. The politicians on the city council botched the huge relief and rebuilding job so badly that the Texas legislature appointed a five-member commission of experts to take over. Each expert took charge of a different city department, and soon Galveston was rebuilt. This success prompted the city to adopt the commission idea as a form of government, and by 1917, 500 cities had followed Galveston's example. Another natural disaster—a flood in Dayton, Ohio, in 1913—led to the widespread adoption of the council-manager form of government. Staunton, Virginia, had already pioneered this system, in which people elected a city council to make laws. The council in turn appointed a manager, typically a person with training and experience in public administration, to run the city's departments. By 1925, managers were administering nearly 250 cities.
The Progressive Era 309
REFORM MAYORS
In some cities, mayors such as Hazen Pin8^ee ° . Michigan (1890-1897), and Tom Johnson of Cleveland, Ohio (1901-1909), introduced progressive reforms without changing how government was organized
Concentrating on economics, Pingree instituted a fairer tax structure, ow ered fares for public transportation, rooted out corruption, and set up a system of work relief for the unemployed. Detroit city workers built schools, parks, and a municipal lighting plant.
Johnson was only one of 19 socialist mayors who worked to institute progressive reforms in America's cities. In general, these mayors focused on dismissing corrupt and greedy private owners of utilities—such as gasworks, waterworks, and transit lines—and converting the utilities to publicly owned enterprises. Johnson believed that citizens should play a more active role in city government. He held meetings in a large circus tent and invited them to question officials about how the city was managed. Dj
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
How did city government change during the Progressive Era?
JAMES S. HOGG, TEXAS GOVERNOR
(1891-1895) Among the most colorful of the reform governors was James S. Hogg of Texas. Hogg helped to drive illegal insurance companies from the state and championed antitrust legislation. His chief interest, however, was in regulating the railroads. He pointed out abuses in rates—noting, for example, that it cost more to ship lumber from East Texas to Dallas than to ship it all the way to Nebraska. A railroad commission, established largely as a result of his efforts, helped increase milling and manufacturing in Texas by lowering freight rates.
Reform at the State Level
Local reforms coincided with progressive efforts at the state level. Spurred by progressive governors, many states passed laws to regulate railroads, mines, mills, telephone companies, and other large businesses.
REFORM GOVERNORS
Under the progressive Republican leadership of Robert M. La Follette, Wisconsin led the way in regulating big business. "Fighting Bob" La Follette served three terms as governor before he entered the U.S. Senate in 1906. He explained that, as governor, he did not mean to "smash corporations, but merely to drive them out of politics, and then to treat them exactly the same as other people are treated." La Follette's major target was the railroad industry. He taxed railroad property at the same rate as other business property, set up a commission to regulate rates, and forbade railroads to issue free passes to state officials. Other reform governors who attacked big business interests included Charles B. Aycock of North Carolina and James S. Hogg of Texas.
PROTECTING WORKING CHILDREN
As the number of child workers rose dramatically, reformers worked to protect workers and to end child labor. Businesses hired children because they performed unskilled jobs for lower wages and because children's small hands made them more adept at handling small parts and tools. Immigrants and rural migrants often sent their children to work because they viewed their children as part of the family economy. Often wages were so low for adults that every family member needed to work to pull the family out of poverty. In industrial settings, however, children were more prone to accidents caused by fatigue. Many developed serious health problems and suffered from stunted growth. E,
Formed in 1904, the National Child Labor Committee sent investigators to gather evidence of children working in harsh conditions. They then organized exhibitions with photographs and statistics to dramatize the children's plight. They were joined by labor union members who argued that child labor lowered wages for all workers. These groups pressured
Analyzing
Causes
Ej Why did reformers seek to end child labor?
310 Chapter 9
History Through
IMAGES OF CHILD LABOR
In 1908, Lewis Hine quit his teaching job to document child labor practices. Hine’s photographs and descriptions of young laborers—some only three years old—were widely distributed and displayed in exhibits. His compelling images of exploitation helped to convince the public of the need for child labor regulations.
Hine devised a host of clever tactics to gain access to his subjects, such as learning shop managers’ schedules and arriving during their lunch breaks. While talking casually with the children, he secretly scribbled notes on paper hidden in his pocket.
national politicians to pass the Keating-Owen Act in 1916. The act prohibited the transportation across state lines of goods produced with child labor.
Two years later the Supreme Court declared the act unconstitutional due to interference with states' rights to regulate labor. Reformers did, however, succeed in nearly every state by effecting legislation that banned child labor and set maximum hours.
EFFORTS TO LIMIT WORKING HOURS
The Supreme Court sometimes took a more sympathetic view of the plight of workers. In the 1908 case of Muller v. Oregon, Louis D. Brandeis—assisted by Florence Kelley and Josephine Goldmark— persuasively argued that poor working women were much more economically insecure than large corporations. Asserting that women required the state's protection against powerful employers, Brandeis convinced the Court to uphold an Oregon law limiting women to a ten-hour workday. Other states responded by enacting or strengthening laws to reduce women’s hours of work. A similar Brandeis brief in Bunting v. Oregon in 1917 persuaded the Court to uphold a ten-hour workday for men. Progressives also succeeded in winning workers' compensation to aid the families of workers who were hurt or killed on the job. Beginning with Maryland in 1902, one state after another passed legislation requiring employers to pay benefits in death cases.
The Progressive Era 311
REFORMING ELECTIONS
In some cases, ordinary citizens won state reforms. William S. U'Ren prompted his state of Oregon to adopt the secret ballot, the initiative, the referendum, and the recall. The initiative allows voters to put a proposed law on the ballot for public approval. Then voters, instead of the legislature, accepted or rejected the initiative by referendum, a vote on the initiative. The recall enabled voters to remove public officials from elected positions by forcing them to face another election before the end of their term if enough voters asked for it. By 1920, 20 states had adopted at least one of these procedures. In 1899, Minnesota passed the first mandatory statewide primary system. This enabled voters, instead of political machines, to choose candidates for public office through a special popular election. About two-thirds of the states had adopted some form of direct primary by 1915.
DIRECT ELECTION OF SENATORS
It was the success of the direct primary that paved the way for the Seventeenth Amendment to the Constitution. Before 1913, each state's legislature had chosen its own United States senators, which put even more power in the hands of party bosses and wealthy corporation heads. To force senators to be more responsive to the public, progressives pushed for the popular election of senators. At first, the Senate refused to go along with the idea, but gradually more and more states began allowing voters to nominate senatorial candidates in direct primaries. As a result, Congress approved the Seventeenth Amendment in 1912. Its ratification in 1913 made direct election of senators the law of the land.j£> Each of these measures was designed to make politicians more accountable to voters and to give Americans more of a voice. As a whole, they have become powerful tools with which voters can influence public policy. Additionally, government reform drew increased numbers of women into public life. It also focused renewed attention on the issue of woman suffrage.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Summarize the impact of the direct election of senators.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•progressive movement •Florence Kelley •prohibition
•	muckraker
•scientific management
•	Robert M. La Follette
•initiative
•referendum
•recall
•Seventeenth Amendment
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Copy the web below on your paper. Fill it in with examples of organizations that worked for reform in the areas named.
Which group was most successful and why?
CRITICAL THINKING
FORMING GENERALIZATIONS 4.
In what ways might individuals in this chapter be considered trailblazers in progressive reform?
How did their actions impact American society? Support your 5 answers. Think About:
•	the efforts of those who supported Prohibition
•	the leadership of William U’Ren and Robert La Follette
•	Florence Kelley’s appointment as chief inspector of factories for Illinois
EVALUATING
Evaluate the impact of Progressive era reforms, including initiative, referendum, recall, and the passage of the Seventeenth Amendment. ANALYZING EFFECTS
How were management innovations applied in Progressive era workplaces and how did they impact labor and productivity?
.2 Chapter 9
TEKS 3C, 5B, 26A, 26D
Women in Public Life
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
As a result of social and economic change, many women entered public life as workers and reformers.
Women won new opportunities in labor and education that are enjoyed today.
•NACW	‘suffrage
B.
Anthony «NAWSA OneAmerican'sStory
hmhsocialstudies.com
■TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about women and work in the late 1800s.
In 1879, Susette La Flesche, a young Omaha woman, traveled east to translate into English the sad words of Chief Standing Bear, whose Ponca people had been forcibly removed from their homeland in Nebraska. Later, she was invited with Chief Standing Bear to go on a lecture tour to draw attention to the Ponca's situation.
A
Personal Voice susette la flesche “We are thinking men and women. ... We have a right to be heard in whatever concerns us. Your government has driven us hither and thither like cattle. . . . Your government has no right to say to us, Go here, or Go there, and if we show any reluctance, to force us to do its will at the point of the bayonet. ... Do you wonder that the Indian feels outraged by such treatment and retaliates, although it will end in death to himself?” —quoted in Bright Eyes Susette La Flesche
La Flesche testified before congressional committees and helped win passage of the Dawes Act of 1887, which allowed individual Native Americans to claim reservation land and citizenship rights. Her activism was an example of a new role for American women, who were expanding their participation in public life.
Women in the Work Force
Before the Civil War, married middle-class women were generally expected to devote their time to the care of their homes and families. By the late 19th century, however, only middle-class and upper-class women could afford to do so. Poorer women usually had no choice but to work for wages outside the home.
FARM WOMEN
On farms in the South and the Midwest, women's roles had not changed substantially since the previous century. In addition to household tasks such as cooking, making clothes, and laundering, farm women handled a host of other chores such as raising livestock. Often the women had to help plow and plant the fields and harvest the crops. WOMEN IN INDUSTRY
As better-paying opportunities became available in towns and especially cities, women had new options for finding jobs, even though men's'labor unions excluded them from membership. At the turn of the century, The Progressive Era 313
sow THEty
Telephone operators manually connect phone calls in 1915.
i I :
TELEPHONE OPERATORS
Today, when Americans use the telephone, an automated voice often greets them with instructions about which buttons to press. In the 19th century, every telephone call had to be handled by a telephone operator, a person who connected wires through a switchboard.
Young men, the first telephone operators, proved unsatisfactory. Patrons complained that the male operators used profane language and talked back to callers. Women soon largely replaced men as telephone operators, and were willing to accept the ten-do I-lar weekly wage.
Department stores advertised shopping by telephone as a convenience. One ad in the Chicago telephone book of 1904 declared, “Every [telephone] order, inquiry, or request will be quickly and intelligently cared for.” The ad pictured a line of female telephone operators.
one out of five American women held jobs; 25 percent of them worked in manufacturing.
The garment trade claimed about half of all women industrial workers. They typically held the least skilled positions, however, and received only about half as much money as their male counterparts or less. Many of these women were single and were assumed to be supporting only themselves, while men were assumed to be supporting families.
Women also began to fill new jobs in offices, stores, and classrooms. These jobs required a high school education, and by 1890, women high school graduates outnumbered men. Moreover, new business schools were preparing bookkeepers and stenographers, as well as training female typists to operate the new machines. Ay
DOMESTIC WORKERS
Many women without formal education or industrial skills contributed to the economic survival of their families by doing domestic work, such as cleaning for other families. After almost 2 million African-American women were freed from slavery, poverty quickly drove nearly half of them into the work force. They worked on farms and as domestic workers, and migrated by the thousands to big cities for jobs as cooks, laundresses, scrubwomen, and maids. Altogether, roughly 70 percent of women employed in 1870 were servants. Unmarried immigrant women also did domestic labor, especially when they first arrived in the United States. Many married immigrant women contributed to the family income by taking in piecework or caring for boarders at home.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
£ What kinds of job opportunities prompted more women to complete high school?
Women Lead Reform
Dangerous conditions, low wages, and long hours led many female industrial workers to push for reforms. Their ranks grew after 146 workers, mostly Jewish and Italian immigrant girls, died in a 1911 fire in the Triangle Shirtwaist Factory in New York City. Middle- and upper-class women also entered the public sphere. By 1910, women's clubs, at which these women discussed art or literature, were nearly half a million strong. These clubs sometimes grew into reform groups that addressed issues such as temperance or child labor.
WOMEN IN HIGHER EDUCATION
Many of the women who became active in public life in the late 19th century had attended the new women's colleges. Vassar 314 Chapter 9
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
What social and economic effects did higher education have on women?
College with a faculty of 8 men and 22 women—accepted its first students in 1865. Smith and Wellesley Colleges followed in 1875. Though Columbia, Brown, and Harvard Colleges refused to admit women, each university established a separate college for women.
Although women were still expected to fulfill traditional domestic roles, women's colleges sought to grant women an excellent education. In her will, Smith College's founder, Sophia Smith, made her goals clear.
A
Personal Voice sophia smith “ [It Is my desire] to furnish for my own sex means and facilities for education equal to those which are afforded now in our College to young men. ... It is not my design to render my sex any the less feminine, but to develop as fully as may be the powers of womanhood & furnish women with means of usefulness, happiness, & honor now withheld from them. ”
—quoted in Alma Mater
By the late 19th century, marriage was no longer a woman's only alternative. Many women entered the work force or sought higher education. In fact, almost half of college-educated women in the late 19th century never married, retaining their own independence. Many of these educated women began to apply their skills to needed social reforms. ©
WOMEN AND REFORM
Uneducated laborers started efforts to reform workplace health and safety. The participation of educated women often strengthened existing reform groups and provided leadership for new ones. Because women were not allowed to vote or run for office, women reformers strove to improve conditions at work and home. Their "social housekeeping” targeted workplace reform, housing reform, educational improvement, and food and drug laws. In 1896, African-American women founded the National Association of Colored Women, or NACW, by merging two earlier organizations. Josephine Ruffin identified the mission of the African-American women's club movement as "the moral education of the race with which we are identified." The NACW managed nurseries, reading rooms, and kindergartens.
After the Seneca Falls convention of 1848, women split over the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments, which granted equal rights including the right to vote to African American men, but excluded women. Susan B. Anthony, a leading proponent of woman suffrage, the right to vote, said "[I] would sooner cut off my right hand than ask the ballot for the black man and not for women." In 1869 Anthony and Elizabeth Cady Stanton had founded the National Women Suffrage Association (NWSA), which united with another group in 1890 to
Suffragists recruit supporters for a march.
▼
become the National American Woman Suffrage Association, or NAWSA. Other prominent leaders included Lucy Stone and Julia Ward Howe, the author of "The Battle Hymn of the Republic."
Woman suffrage faced constant opposition. The liquor industry feared that women would vote in support of prohibition, while the textile industry worried that women would vote for restrictions on child labor. Many men simply feared the changing role of women in society.
A THREE-PART STRATEGY FOR SUFFRAGE
Suffragist leaders tried three approaches to achieve their objective. First, they tried to convince state legislatures to grant women the right to vote. They achieved a victory in the territory of Wyoming in 1869, and by the 1890s Utah, Colorado, and Idaho had also granted voting rights to women. After 1896, efforts in other states failed. Second, women pursued court cases to test the Fourteenth Amendment, which declared that states denying their male citizens the right to vote would lose congressional representation. Weren't women citizens, too? In 1871 and 1872, Susan B. Anthony and other women tested that question by attempting to vote at least 150 times in ten states and the District of Columbia. The Supreme Court ruled in 1875 that women were indeed citizens—but then denied that citizenship automatically conferred the right to vote.
Third, women pushed for a national constitutional amendment to grant women the vote. Stanton succeeded in having the amendment introduced in California, but it was killed later. For the next 41 years, women lobbied to have it reintroduced, only to see it continually voted down. &
Before the turn of the century, the campaign for suffrage achieved only modest success. Later, however, women's reform efforts paid off in improvements in the treatment of workers and in safer food and drug products—all of which President Theodore Roosevelt supported, along with his own plans for reforming business, labor, and the environment.
PLAY£ft
SUSAN B. ANTHONY 1820-1906
Born to a strict Quaker family, Susan B. Anthony was not allowed to enjoy typical childhood entertainment such as music, games, and toys. Her father insisted on self-discipline, education, and a strong belief system for all of his eight children. At an early age, Anthony developed a positive view of womanhood from a teacher named Mary Perkins who educated the children in their home.
After voting illegally in the presidential election of 1872, Anthony was fined $100 at her trial. “Not a penny shall go to this unjust claim,” she defiantly declared. She never paid the fine.
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
Why did
suffragist leaders employ a three-part strategy for gaining the right to vote?

1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance. •NACW	•Susan B. Anthony	• suffrage
•NAWSA
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one below, fill in details about working women in the late 1800s.
Women Workers:
Late 1800s
Z, i .. 1
Farm Women	Domestic Workers	Factory Workers	White- Collar Workers
What generalizations can you make about women workers at this time?
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	SYNTHESIZING
What women and movements during the Progressive Era helped dispel the stereotype that women were submissive and nonpolitical?
EXPLAINING IMPACT
What actions did women take to expand their political rights in American society?
ANALYZING ISSUES
Identify the social contributions of women to American society during the Progressive Era. Explain how you might use these to recruit other women to support reform movements. Think About:
•	the problems that each movement was trying to remedy
•	how women benefited from each cause
316 Chapter 9
Teddy Roosevelt's Square Deal
MAIN IDEA | WHY IT MATTERS NOW 1
i Terms & Names As president, Theodore Roosevelt worked to give citizens a Square Deal through progressive reforms.	As part of his Square Deal, Roosevelt’s conservation efforts made a permanent impact on environmental resources.	•Upton Sinclair • The Jungle •Theodore Roosevelt •Square Deal	•Meat Inspection Act •Pure Food and Drug Act •conservation
•NAACP
American'si
' hmhsocialstudies.com
IMK.INU
NUlCb Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about Theodore Roosevelt’s presidency.
When muckraking journalist Upton Sinclair began research for a novel in 1904, his focus was the human condition in the stock-yards of Chicago. Sinclair intended his novel to reveal "the breaking of human hearts by a system [that] exploits the labor of men and women for profits." What most shocked readers in Sinclair's book The Jungle (1906), however, was the sickening conditions of the meatpacking industry.
A
Personal Voice upton Sinclair “ There would be meat that had tumbled out on the floor, In the dirt and sawdust, where the workers had tramped and spit uncounted billions of consumption [tuberculosis] germs. There would be meat stored in great piles in rooms; . . . and thousands of rats would race about on it. ... A man could run his hand over these piles of meat and sweep off handfuls of the dried dung of rats. These rats were nuisances, and the packers would put poisoned bread out for them; they would die, and then rats, bread, and meat would go into the hoppers together. —The Jungle
▲
Upton Sinclair poses with his son at the time of the writing of The Jungle.
President Theodore Roosevelt, like many other readers, was nauseated by Sinclair's account. The president invited the author to visit him at the White House, where Roosevelt promised that "the specific evils you point out shall, if their existence be proved, and if I have the power, be eradicated."
A
Rough-Riding President Theodore Roosevelt was not supposed to be president. In 1900, the young governor from New York was urged to run as McKinley's vice-president by the state's political bosses who found Roosevelt impossible to control. The plot to nominate Roosevelt worked, taking him out of state office. However, as vice-president,
The Progressive Era 317
When the president spared a bear cub on a hunting expedition, a toymaker marketed a popular new product, the teddy bear.
Roosevelt stood a heartbeat away from becoming president. Indeed, President McKinley had served barely six months of his second term before he was assassinated, making Roosevelt the most powerful person in the government.
ROOSEVELT’S RISE
Theodore Roosevelt was born into a wealthy New York family in 1858. An asthma sufferer during his childhood, young Teddy drove himself to accomplish demanding physical feats. As a teenager, he mastered marksmanship and horseback riding. At Harvard College, Roosevelt boxed and wrestled. At an early age, the ambitious Roosevelt became a leader in New York politics. After serving three terms in the New York State Assembly, he became New York City's police commissioner and then assistant secretary of the U.S. Navy. The aspiring politician grabbed national attention, advocating war against Spain in 1898. His volunteer cavalry brigade, the Rough
Riders, won public acclaim for its role in the battle at San Juan Hill in Cuba. Roosevelt returned a hero and was soon elected governor of New York and then later won the vice-presidency.
THE MODERN PRESIDENCY
When Roosevelt was thrust into the presidency in 1901, he became the youngest president ever at 42 years old. Unlike previous presidents, Roosevelt soon dominated the news with his many exploits. While in office, Roosevelt enjoyed boxing, although one of his opponents blinded him in the left eye. On another day, he galloped 100 miles on horseback, merely to prove the feat possible. In politics, as in sports, Roosevelt acted boldly, using his personality and popularity to advance his programs. His leadership and publicity campaigns helped create the modern presidency, making him a model by which all future presidents would be measured. Citing federal responsibility for the national welfare, Roosevelt thought the government should assume control whenever states proved incapable of dealing with problems. He explained, "It is the duty of the president to act upon the theory that he is the steward of the people, and ... to assume that he has the legal right to do whatever the needs of the people demand, unless the Constitution or the laws explicitly forbid him to do it."

Teddy Roosevelt enjoyed an active lifestyle, as this 1902 photo reveals.
,318
MAIN IDEA
Roosevelt saw the presidency as a "bully pulpit," from which he could influ-« th ’	ence the news media and shape legislation. If big business victimized workers,
JiWhatactions then President Roosevelt would see to it that the common people received what and characteristics ca^e<^ a Square Deal. This term was used to describe the various progressive of Teddy Roosevelt reforms sponsored by the Roosevelt administration. Jb
contributed to his reputation as the
first modem Using Federal Power
president?	....,	s
Roosevelt's study of history—he published the first of his 44 books at the age of 24 convinced him that modern America required a powerful federal government. "A simple and poor society can exist as a democracy on the basis of sheer individualism," Roosevelt declared, "but a rich and complex industrial society cannot so exist." The young president soon met several challenges to his assertion of federal power.
TRUSTBUSTING
By 1900, trusts—legal bodies created to hold stock in many companies—controlled about four-fifths of the industries in the United States. Some trusts, like Standard Oil, had earned poor reputations with the public by the use of unfair business practices. Many trusts lowered their prices to drive competitors out of the market and then took advantage of the lack of competition to jack prices up even higher. Although Congress had passed the Sherman Antitrust Act in 1890, the act's vague language made enforcement difficult. As a result, nearly all the suits filed against the trusts under the Sherman Act were ineffective. President Roosevelt did not believe that all trusts were harmful, but he sought to curb the actions of those that hurt the public interest. The president concentrated his efforts on filing suits under the Sherman Antitrust Act. In 1902, Roosevelt made newspaper headlines as a trustbuster when he ordered the Justice Department to sue the Northern Securities Company, which had established a monopoly over northwestern railroads. In 1904, the Supreme Court dissolved the company. Although the Roosevelt administration filed 44 antitrust suits, winning a number of them and breaking up some of the trusts, it was unable to slow the merger movement in business.
iCK
HISTORY
VIDEO
Teddy Roosevelt vs. Corporate America
I
Political Cartoons )- “THE LION-TAMER”
As part of his Square Deal, President Roosevelt aggressively used the Sherman Antitrust Act of 1890 to attack big businesses engaging in unfair practices. His victory over his first target, the Northern Securities Company, earned him a reputation as a hard-hitting trustbuster committed to protecting the public interest. This cartoon shows Roosevelt trying to tame the wild lions that symbolize the great and powerful companies of 1904.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons 1.	What do the lions stand for?
2.	Why are all the lions coming out of a door labeled Wall St. ?
3.	What do you think the cartoonist thinks about trustbusting? Cite details from the cartoon that support your interpretation.
Analyzing
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
THE LION-TAMER
The Progressive Era 319
COAL STRIKE
When 140,000 coal miners in Pennsylvania went on strike and demanded a 20 percent raise, a nine-hour workday, and the right to organize a union, the mine operators refused to bargain. Five months into t e stn e, coa reserves ran low. Roosevelt, seeing the need to intervene, called hot si es o e White House to talk, and eventually settled the strike. Irked by the "extraor mary stupidity and bad temper" of the mine operators, he later confessed that only the dignity of the presidency had kept him from taking one owner "by the seat of t e breeches" and tossing him out of the window.
Faced with Roosevelt's threat to take over the mines, the opposing sides finally agreed to submit their differences to an arbitration commission—a third party that would work with both sides to mediate the dispute. In 1903, the commission issued its compromise settlement. The miners won a 10 percent pay hike and a shorter, nine-hour workday. With this, however, they had to give up their demand for a closed shop—in which all workers must belong to the union and their right to strike during the next three years.
In life as in a	President Roosevelt's actions had demonstrated a new principle.
£ th 11 p thp From then on' when a strike threatened the Public welfare, the fed-fOOWail game, me government was expected to intervene. In addition, Roosevelt's principle . . . IS. „ actions reflected the progressive belief that disputes could be settled in Hit the line hard. ” an orderiy way with the help of experts, such as those on the arbitra-THEODORE ROOSEVELT	tion commission. JEp
RAILROAD REGULATION
Roosevelt's real goal was federal regulation. In 1887, Congress had passed the Interstate Commerce Act, which prohibited wealthy railroad owners from colluding to fix high prices by dividing the business in a given area. The Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC) was set up to enforce the new law but had little power. With Roosevelt's urging, Congress passed the Elkins Act in 1903, which made it illegal for railroad officials to give, and shippers to receive, rebates for using particular railroads. The act also specified that railroads could not change set rates without notifying the public. The Hepburn Act of 1906 strictly limited the distribution of free railroad passes, a common form of bribery. It also gave the ICC power to set maximum railroad rates. Although Roosevelt had to compromise with conservative senators who opposed the act, its passage boosted the government's power to regulate the railroads.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
What was significant about the way the 1902 coal strike was settled?
Vocabulary collude: to act
together secretly to achieve an illegal or deceitful purpose
Health and the Environment
President Roosevelt's enthusiasm and his considerable skill at compromise led to laws and policies that benefited both public health and the environment. He wrote, "We recognize and are bound to war against the evils of today. The remedies are partly economic and partly spiritual, partly to be obtained by laws, and in greater part to be obtained by individual and associated effort."
REGULATING FOODS AND DRUGS
After reading The Jungle by Upton Sinclair, Roosevelt responded to the public's clamor for action. He appointed a commission of experts to investigate the meatpacking industry. The commission issued a scathing report backing up Sinclair's account of the disgusting conditions in the industry. True to his word, in 1906 Roosevelt pushed for passage of the Meat Inspection Act, which dictated strict cleanliness requirements for meatpacken and created the program of federal meat inspection that was in use until it wa< replaced by more sophisticated techniques in the 1990s. The compromise that won the act's passage, however, left the government paying for the inspections and did not require companies to label their cannec goods with date-of-processing information. The compromise also granted meat-packers the right to appeal negative decisions in court.
!0 Chapter 9
Government workers inspect meat as it moves through the packinghouse. ►
A typical late-19th-century product advertisement.
PURE FOOD AND DRUG ACT
Before any federal regulations were established for advertising food and drugs, manufacturers had claimed that their products accomplished everything from curing cancer to growing hair. In addition, popular children's medicines often contained opium, cocaine, or alcohol. In response to concerns about these practices as well as the harmful preservatives that manufacturers added to food, Congress passed the Pure Food and Drug Act in 1906, which halted the sale of contaminated foods and medicines and called for truth in labeling. Although this act did not ban harmful products outright, its requirement of truthful labels reflected the progressive belief that given accurate information, people would act wisely. Along with the Meat Inspection Act, the Pure Food and Drug Act reflects the continuation of the changing relationship between the federal government and private businesses during this period. This act marks the first general pure food and drug law at the federal level. The government's Bureau of Chemistry, which later became the Food and Drug Administration, took responsibility for enforcement of the law. Unfortunately, enforcement met with mixed results. On the whole, the law helped to protect consumers by improving product standards and reducing confusion about the benefits and dangers of various products. However, some critics point out that the law reduced marketplace competition by forcing out smaller producers. Also, efforts to regulate the patent medicine industry were largely unsuccessful until new legislation was passed in 1938.
CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
Before Roosevelt's presidency, the federal government had paid very little attention to the nation's natural resources. In 1872, Yellowstone National Park was established as the country s first national park, and the U.S. Forest Bureau was formed in 1887. The government also set aside 45 million acres of timberlands for a national forest reserve. Despite such measures, the government mostly stood by while private interests gobbled up the shrinking wilderness. MAIN IDEA
Comparing
What
similarities did the Meat Inspection Act and Pure Food and Drug Act share?
Chapter 9
In the late 19th century Americans had shortsightedly exploited their natural environment. Pioneer farmers leveled the forests and plowed up the prairies. Ranchers allowed their cattle to overgraze the Great Plains. Coal companies cluttered the land with refuse from mines. Lumber companies ignored the effect of their logging operations on flood control and neglected to plant trees to replace those they had cut down. Cities dumped untreated sewage and industrial wastes into rivers, poisoning the streams and creating health hazards.
CONSERVATION MEASURES
Roosevelt condemned the view that America's resources were endless and made conservation a primary concern. John Muir, a naturalist and writer with whom Roosevelt camped in California's Yosemite National Park in 1903, persuaded the president to set aside 148 million acres of forest reserves. Roosevelt also set aside 1.5 million acres of water-power sites and another 80 million acres of land that experts from the U.S. Geological Survey would explore for mineral and water resources. Roosevelt also established more than 50 wildlife sanctuaries and several national parks. True to the Progressive belief in using experts, in 1905 the president named Gifford Pinchot as head of the U.S. Forest Service. A professional conservationist, Pinchot had administrative skill as well as the latest scientific and technical information. He advised Roosevelt to conserve forest and grazing lands by keeping large tracts of federal land exempt from private sale.
Conservationists like Roosevelt and Pinchot, however, did not share the views of Muir, who advocated complete preservation of the wilderness. Instead, conservation to them meant that some wilderness areas would be preserved while others would be developed for the common good. Indeed, Roosevelt's federal water projects transformed some dry wilderness areas to make agriculture possible. Under the National Reclamation Act of 1902, known as the Newlands
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1	Region Prior to 1901, which regions had the	—*
greatest amount of conservation lands?
2	Human Environment Interaction Describe ——
’ the effects of Roosevelt’s conservation efforts	\ O
and the impact he had on the environment.	\
The Progressive Era
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT

Act, money from the sale of public lands in the West funded large-scale irrigation projects, such as the Roosevelt Dam in Arizona and the Shoshone Dam in Wyoming. The Newlands Act established the precedent that the federal government would manage the precious water resources of the West.
Roosevelt and Civil Rights
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
Summarize Roosevelt’s approach to environmental problems.


YOSEMITE NATIONAL PARK
The naturalist John Muir visited the Yosemite region of central California in 1868 and made it his home base for a period of six years while he traveled throughout the West.
Muir was the first to suggest that Yosemite’s spectacular land formations had been shaped by glaciers. Today the park’s impressive cliffs, waterfalls, lakes, and meadows draw sports enthusiasts and tourists in all seasons.
Roosevelt's concern for the land and its inhabitants was not matched in the area of civil rights. Though Roosevelt's father had supported the North, his mother, Martha, may well have been the model for the Southern belle Scarlett O'Hara in Margaret Mitchell's famous novel, Gone with the Wind. In almost two terms as president, Roosevelt—like most other progressives—failed to support civil rights for African Americans. He did, however, support a few individual African Americans.
Despite opposition from whites, Roosevelt appointed an African American as head of the Charleston, South Carolina, customhouse. In another instance, when some whites in Mississippi refused to accept the black postmistress he had appointed, he chose to close the station rather than give in. In 1906, however, Roosevelt angered many African Americans when he dismissed without question an entire regiment of African-American soldiers accused of conspiracy in protecting others charged with murder in Brownsville, Texas.
As a symbolic gesture, Roosevelt invited Booker T. Washington to dinner at the White House. Washington-head of the Tuskegee Normal and Industrial Institute, an all-
black training school—was then the African-American leader most respected by powerful whites. Washington faced opposition, however, from other African
Civil rights leaders gather at the 1905 Niagara Falls conference. ►
14 Chapter 9
J
ij
Vocabulary
accommodation:
adapting or making
adjustments in order to satisfy someone else
Background
The Niagara Movement was comprised of 29 black intellectuals. They met secretly in 1905 to compose a civil rights manifesto.
Americans, such as W. E. B. Du Bois, for his accommodation of segregationists and for blaming black poverty on blacks and urging them to accept discrimination.
Persistent in his criticism of Washington's ideas, Du Bois renewed his demands for immediate social and economic equality for African Americans. In his 1903 book The Souls of Black Folk, Du Bois wrote of his opposition to Washington's position.
A
Personal Voice w. e. b. du bois “ So far as Mr. Washington preaches Thrift, Patience, and Industrial Training for the masses, we must hold up his hands and strive with him. . . . But so far as Mr. Washington apologizes for injustice, North or South, does not rightly value the privilege and duty of voting, belittles the emasculating effects of caste distinctions, and opposes the higher training and ambition of our brighter minds,—so far as he, the South, or the Nation, does this,—we must unceasingly and firmly oppose them. ’ ’ —The Souls of Black Folk
Du Bois and other advocates of equality for African Americans were deeply upset by the apparent progressive indifference to racial injustice. In 1905 they held a civil rights conference in Niagara Falls, and in 1909 a number of African Americans joined with prominent white reformers in New York to found the NAACP—the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People. The NAACP, which had over 6,000 members by 1914, aimed for nothing less than full equality among the races. That goal, however, found little support in the Progressive Movement, which focused on the needs of middle-class whites. The two presidents who followed Roosevelt also did little to advance the goal of racial equality.
^V.Y PLAY£#
W. E. B. DU BOIS 1868-1963
In 1909, W. E. B. Du Bois helped to establish the NAACP and entered into the forefront of the early U.S. civil rights movement. However, in the 1920s, he faced a power struggle with the NAACP’s executive secretary, Walter White.
Ironically, Du Bois had retreated to a position others saw as dangerously close to that of Booker T. Washington. Arguing for a separate economy for African Americans, Du Bois made a distinction, which White rejected, between enforced and voluntary segregation. By mid-century, Du Bois was outside the mainstream of the civil rights movement. His work remained largely ignored until after his death in 1963.
i
t ■
i, i
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Upton Sinclair	•Theodore Roosevelt	*Meat Inspection Act	• conservation
• The Jungle	• Square Deal	• Pure Food and Drug Act	• NAACP
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create five problem-solution diagrams like the one below to show how the following problems were addressed during Roosevelt’s presidency:
(a) 1902 coal strike, (b) Northern Securities Company monopoly,
(c)	unsafe meat processing,
(d)	exploitation of the environment, and (e) racial injustice.
Problems
■>
Solutions
Write headlines announcing the solutions.
CRITICAL THINKING
FORMING GENERALIZATIONS
How do you think the progressive belief in using experts shaped Roosevelt’s reforms? Think About:
•	Roosevelt’s use of experts to help him tackle problems
•	how experts’ findings affected legislative actions
IDENTIFYING ROLES
How did the responsibility of managing the environment shift from private citizens to government entities during Roosevelt’s presidency?
5.	EVALUATING
Describe how the Pure Food and Drug Act reflected the changing relationship between the federal government and private business. What were the costs and the benefits of the act?
ANALYZING ISSUES
Why did W. E. B. Du Bois oppose Booker T. Washington’s views on racial discrimination?
The Progressive Era 325
L
AMERICAN LITERATURE
(1902-1917) The Muckrakers
The tradition of the investigative reporter uncovering corruption was established early in the 20th century by the writers known as muckrakers. Coined by President Theodore Roosevelt, the term muckraker alludes to the English author John Bunyan's famous 17th-century religious allegory The Pilgrim's Progress, which features a character too busy raking up the muck to see a heavenly crown held over him. The originally negative term soon was applied to many writers whose reform efforts Roosevelt himself supported. The muckraking movement spilled over from journalism as writers such as Upton Sinclair made use of the greater dramatic effects of fiction.
IDA M. TARBELL
Ida M. Tarbell’s “The History of the Standard Oil Company” exposed the ruthlessness with which John D. Rockefeller had turned his oil business into an all-powerful monopoly. Her writing added force to the trustbusting reforms of the early 20th century. Here Tarbell describes how Standard Oil used lower transportation rates to drive out smaller refineries, such as Hanna, Baslington and Company.
Mr. Hanna had been refining since July, 1869. . . . Some time in February, 1872, the Standard Oil Company asked [for] an interview with him and his associates. They wanted to buy his works, they said. "But we don't want to sell," objected Mr. Hanna. "You can never make any more money, in my judgment," said Mr. Rockefeller. "You can't compete with the Standard. We have all the large refineries now. If you refuse to sell, it will end in your being crushed." Hanna and Baslington were not satisfied. They went to see . . . General Devereux, manager of the Lake Shore road. They were told that the Standard had special rates; that it was useless to try to compete with them. General Devereux explained to the gentlemen that the privileges granted the Standard were the legitimate and necessary advantage of the larger shipper over the smaller.. • • General Devereux says they "recognised the propriety" of his excuse. They certainly recognised its authority. They say that they were satisfied they could no longer get rates to and from Cleveland which would enable them to live, and "reluctantly" sold out. It must have been reluctantly, for they had paid $75,000 for their works, and had made thirty per cent, a year on an average on their investment, and the Standard appraiser allowed them $45,000.
Ida M. Tarbell, The History of the Standard Oil Company" (19^
LINCOLN STEFFENS
Lincoln Steffens is usually named as a leading figure of the muckraking movement He published exposes of business and government corruption in McClure's Magazine and other magazines. These articles were then collected in two books:
The Shame of the Cities and The Struggle for Self-Government. Below is a section from an article Steffens wrote to expose voter fraud in Philadelphia.
The police are forbidden by law to stand within thirty feet of the polls, but they are at the box and they are there to see that the [Republican political] machine's orders are obeyed and that repeaters whom they help to furnish are permitted to vote without "intimidation" on the names they, the police, have supplied.
The editor of an anti-machine paper who was looking about for himself once told me that a ward leader who knew him well asked him into a polling place. "I'll show you how it's done," he said, and he had the repeaters go round and round voting again
and again on the names handed them on slips. . . . The business proceeds with very few hitches; there is more jesting than fighting. Violence in the past has had its effect; and is not often necessary nowadays, but if it is needed the police are there to apply it.
—Lincoln Steffens, The Shame of the Cities (1904)
UPTON SINCLAIR
Upton Sinclair’s chief aim in writing The Jungle was to expose the shocking conditions that immigrant workers endured. The public, however, reacted even more strongly to the novel’s revelations of unsanitary conditions in the meatpacking industry. Serialized in 1905 and published in book form one year later, The Jungle prompted a federal investigation that resulted in passage of the Meat Inspection Act in 1906.
Jonas had told them how the meat that was taken out of pickle would often be found sour, and how they would rub it up with [baking] soda to take away the smell, and sell it to be eaten on free-lunch counters; also of all the miracles of chemistry which they performed, giving to any sort of meat, fresh or salted, whole or chopped, any color and any flavor and any odor they chose. . . .
It was only when the whole ham was spoiled that it came into the department of Elzbieta. Cut up by the two-thousand-revolu-tions-a-minute flyers, and mixed with half a ton of other meat, no odor that ever was in a ham could make any difference. There was never the least attention paid to what was cut up for sausage; there would come all the way back from Europe old sausage that had been rejected, and that was moldy and white—it would be dosed with borax and glycerine, and dumped into the hoppers, and made over again for home consumption.
—Upton Sinclair, The Jungle (1906)
thinking critically
1. Comparing and Contrasting State the main idea of each of these selections. What role do details play in making the passages convincing?
hmhsocialstudies.com
INTERNET ACTIVITY
X®TUMY
Visit the links for American Literature: The Muckrakers to learn more about the muckrakers. What topics did they investigate? How did they affect public opinion? What legal changes did they help to bring about? Write a summary of the muckrakers’ impact on society.
The Progressive Era 327
Taft’s ambivalent approach to progressive reform led to a split in the Republican Party and the loss of the presidency to the Democrats.
Third-party candidates continue to wrestle with how to become viable candidates.
Gifford Pinchot William Howard Taft
Payne-Aldrich
Tariff
• Bull Moose Party •Woodrow Wilson
OneAmerican'sStbry
hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about difficulties during Taft’s presidency.
Early in the 20th century, Americans' interest in the preservation of the country's wilderness areas intensified. Writers proclaimed the beauty of the landscape, and new groups like the Girl Scouts gave city children the chance to experience a different environment. The desire for preservation clashed with business interests that favored unrestricted development. Gifford Pinchot (pin'shcf), head of the U.S. Forest Service under President Roosevelt, took a middle ground.
He believed that wilderness areas could be scientifically managed to yield public enjoyment while allowing private development.
A
Personal Voice gifford pinchot 66 The American people have evidently made up their minds that our natural resources must be conserved. That is good. But it settles only half the question. For whose benefit shall they be conserved— for the benefit of the many, or for the use and profit of the few? . . . There is no other question before us that begins to be so important, or that will be so difficult to straddle, as the great question between special Interest and equal opportunity, between the privileges of the few and the rights of the many, between government by men for human welfare and government by money for profit. ”
—The Fight for Conservation
President Roosevelt, a fellow conservationist, favored Pinchot's multi-use land program. However, when he left office in 1909, this approach came under increasing pressure from business people who favored unrestricted commercial development.
▲
Gifford Pinchot
Taft Becomes President
After winning the election in 1904, Roosevelt pledged not to run for reelection in 1908. He handpicked his secretary of war, William Howard Taft, to run against William Jennings Bryan, who had been nominated by the Democrats for the third
Unnler phe SlTn "V°te f°r tWS time' Y°U Can vote for Bryan any time,”
latt and the Republicans won an easy victory.
128 Chapter 9
TA A" STUMBLES
As president, Taft pursued a cautiously progressive agenda, seeking to consolidate rather than to expand Roosevelt's reforms. He received little credit for his accomplishments, however. His legal victories, such as busting 90 trusts in a four-year term, did not bolster his popularity. Indeed, the new president confessed in a letter to Roosevelt that he never felt like the president. "When I am addressed as 'Mr. President,"' Taft wrote, "I turn to see whether you are not at my elbow." The cautious Taft hesitated to use the presidential bully pulpit to arouse public opinion. Nor could he subdue troublesome members of his own party. Tariffs and conservation posed his first problems.
THE PAYNE-ALDRICH TARIFF
Taft had campaigned on a platform of lowering tariffs, a staple of the progressive agenda. When the House passed the Payne Bill, which lowered rates on imported manufactured goods, the Senate proposed an alternative bill, the Aldrich Bill, which made fewer cuts and increased many rates. Amid cries of betrayal from the progressive wing of his party, Taft signed the Payne-Aldrich Tariff, a compromise that only moderated the high rates of the Aldrich Bill. This angered progressives who believed Taft had abandoned progressivism. The president made his difficulties worse by clumsily attempting to defend the tariff, calling it "the best [tariff] bill the Republican party ever passed." DIFFICULT
pKCISIONs
CONTROLLING RESOURCES
Historically, conservationists such as Gifford Pinchot have stood for the balanced use of natural resources, preserving some and using others for private industry. Free-market advocates like Richard Ballinger pressed for the private development of wilderness areas. Preservationists such as John Muir advocated preserving all remaining wilderness.
1.	Examine the pros and cons of each position. With which do you agree? What factors do you think should influence decisions about America’s wilderness areas?
2.	If you’d been asked in 1902
to decide whether to develop or preserve America’s wilderness areas, what would you have decided? Why?
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
$ How did Taft’s appointee Richard Ballinger anger conservationists?
DISPUTING PUBLIC LANDS
Next, Taft angered conservationists by appointing as his secretary of the interior Richard A. Ballinger, a wealthy lawyer from Seattle. Ballinger, who disapproved of conservationist controls on western lands, removed 1 million acres of forest and mining lands from the reserved list and returned it to the public domain. When a Department of the Interior official was fired for protesting Ballinger's actions, the fired worker published a muckraking article against Ballinger in Collier's Weekly magazine. Pinchot added his voice. In congressional testimony he accused Ballinger of letting commercial interests exploit the natural resources that rightfully belonged to the public. President Taft sided with Ballinger and fired Pinchot from the U.S. Forest Service.
The Republican Party Splits
Taft's cautious nature made it impossible for him to hold together the two wings of the Republican Party: progressives who sought change and conservatives who did not. The Republican Party began to fragment.
PROBLEMS WITHIN THE PARTY
Republican conservatives and progressives split over Taft's support of the political boss Joseph Cannon, House Speaker from Illinois. A rough-talking, tobacco-chewing politician, "Uncle Joe" often disregarded seniority in filling committee slots. As chairman of the House Rules Committee, which decides what bills Congress considers, Cannon often weak-ened or ignored progressive bills. Reform-minded Republicans decided that their only alternative was to strip Cannon of his power. With the help of Democrats, they succeeded in March 1910 with a resolution that called for the entire House to elect the Committee on Rules and excluded the Speaker from membership in the committee.
William Howard Taft
The Progressive Era 329
WILLIAM HOWARD TAFT 1857-1930
William Howard Taft never wanted to be president. After serving one term, Taft left the White House, which he called "the lonesomest place in the world,” and taught constitutional law at Yale for eight years.
In 1921, President Harding named Taft chief justice of the Supreme Court. The man whose family had nicknamed him “Big Lub” called this appointment the highest honor he had ever received. As chief justice, Taft wrote that “in my present life I don’t remember that I ever was President.”
However, Americans remember Taft for, among many other things, initiating in 1910 the popular presidential custom of throwing out the first ball of the major league baseball season.
By the midterm elections of 1910, however, the Republican Party was in shambles, with the progressives on one side and the "old guard" on the other. Voters voiced concern over the rising cost of living, which they blamed on the Payne-Aldrich Tariff. They also believed Taft to be against conservation. When the Republicans lost the election, the Democrats gained control of the House of Representatives for the first time in 18 years.
THE BULL MOOSE PARTY
After leaving office, Roosevelt headed to Africa to shoot big game. He returned in 1910 to a hero's welcome, and responded with a rousing speech proposing a "New Nationalism," under which the federal government would exert its power for "the welfare of the people." By 1912, Roosevelt had decided to run for a third term as president. The primary elections showed that Republicans wanted Roosevelt, but Taft had the advantage of being the incumbent—that is, the holder of the office. At the Republican convention in June 1912, Taft supporters maneuvered to replace Roosevelt delegates with Taft delegates in a number of delegations. Republican progressives refused to vote and formed a new third party, the Progressive Party. They nominated Roosevelt for president.
The Progressive Party became known as the Bull Moose Party, after Roosevelt's boast that he was "as strong as a bull moose." The party's platform called for the direct election of senators and the adoption in all states of the initiative, referendum, and recall. It also advocated woman suffrage, workmen's compensation, an eight-hour workday, a minimum wage for women, a federal law against child labor, and a federal trade commission to regulate business. jay
The split in the Republican ranks handed the Democrats their first real chance at the White House since the election of Grover Cleveland in 1892. In the 1912 presidential election, they put forward as their candidate a reform governor of New Jersey named Woodrow Wilson.
Vocabulary “old guard”:
conservative members of a group
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
What were the differences between Taft's and Roosevelt’s campaign platforms?
Democrats Win in 1912
Under Governor Woodrow Wilson's leadership, the previously conservative New Jersey legislature had passed a host of reform measures. Now, as the Democratic presidential nominee, Wilson endorsed a progressive platform called the New Freedom. It demanded even stronger antitrust legislation, banking reform, and reduced tariffs.
The split between Taft and Roosevelt, former Republican allies, turned nasty during the fall campaign. Taft labeled Roosevelt a "dangerous egotist ” while Roosevelt branded Taft a "fathead" with the brain of a "guinea pig." Wilson distanced himself, quietly gloating, "Don't interfere when your enemy is destroying himself."	1	°
The election offered voters several choices: Wilson's New Freedom Taft's con-
servatism, Roosevelt's progressivism, or the Socialist Party policies of Eugene V
Debs. Both Roosevelt and Wilson supported a stronger government role in eco-
nomic affairs but differed over strategies. Roosevelt supported government action
supervise lg business but did not oppose all business monopolies, while Debs
JO
Chapter 9 called for an end to capitalism. Wilson supported small business and free-market competition and characterized all business monopolies as evil. In a speech, Wilson explained why he felt that all business monopolies were a threat.
A
Personal Voice WOODROW WILSON
“ If the government is to tell big business men how to run their business, then don’t you see that big business men have to get closer to the government even than they are now? Don’t you see that they must capture the government, in order not to be restrained too much by it? ... I don’t care how benevolent the master is going to be, I will not live under a master. That Is not what America was created for. America was created in order that every man should have the same chance as every other man to exercise mastery over his own fortunes. ”
—quoted in The New Freedom
Presidential Election of 1912
Party	Candidate Electoral votes Popular vote
Democratic	Woodrow Wilson	435	6,296,547
■	Progressive	Theodore Roosevelt 88	4,118,571
■	Republican	William H. Taft	8	3,486,720
Socialist	Eugene V. Debs	0	900,672
MAIN IDEA
Predicting
Effects
Q)
What might be one of Wilson’s first issues to address as president? Although Wilson captured only 42 percent of the popular vote, he won an overwhelming electoral victory and a Democratic majority in Congress. As a third-party candidate, Roosevelt defeated Taft in both popular and electoral votes. But reform claimed the real victory, with more than 75 percent of the vote going to the reform candidates—Wilson, Roosevelt, and Debs. In victory, Wilson could claim a mandate to break up trusts and to expand the government's role in social reform. w
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance. •Gifford Pinchot	• Payne-Aldrich Tariff	•Woodrow Wilson
•William Howard Taft	’Bull Moose Party
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Re-create the chart below on your paper. Then fill in the causes Taft supported that made people question his leadership.
Which causes do you think would upset most people today? Explain.
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	HYPOTHESIZING
What if Roosevelt had won another term in office in 1912? Speculate on how this might have affected the future of progressive reforms. Support your answer. Think About:
•	Roosevelt’s policies that Taft did not support
•	the power struggles within the Republican Party
•	Roosevelt’s perception of what is required of a president
FORMING AND SUPPORTING OPINIONS
Both Roosevelt and Taft resorted to mudslinging during the 1912 presidential campaign. Do you approve or disapprove of negative campaign tactics? Support your opinion.
5.	EVALUATING
Evaluate the impact of the Progressive Party as a third party.
The Progressive Era 331
Wilson's New Freedom
MAIN IDEA
H
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
Woodrow Wilson established a strong reform agenda as a progressive leader.
The passage of the Nineteenth Amendment during Wilson’s administration granted women the right to vote.
•	Carrie Chapman Catt
•	Clayton Antitrust Act
•	Federal Trade Commission (FTC)
i hmhsocialstudies.com
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes about progressivism during Wilson’s first term.
One.American'sStory.
On March 3, 1913, the day of Woodrow Wilson's inauguration, 5,000 , woman suffragists marched through hostile crowds in Washington, D.C.
Alice Paul and Lucy Burns, the parade's organizers, were members of the National American Woman Suffrage Association (NAWSA). As police failed to restrain the rowdy gathering and congressmen demanded an investigation, Paul and Burns could see the momentum building for suffrage.
By the time Wilson began his campaign for a second term in 1916, the NAWSA's president, Carrie Chapman Catt, saw victory on the horizon.
Catt expressed her optimism in a letter to her friend Maud Wood Park.
A
Personal Voice carrie chapman catt “ I do feel keenly that the turn of the road has come. ... I really believe that we might pull off a campaign which would mean the vote within the next six years if we could secure a Board of officers who would have sufficient momentum, confidence and working power in them. . . . Come! My dear Mrs. Park, gird on your armor once more. ”
—letter to Maud Wood Park
> monetary policy
*	Federal Reserve System
•	Nineteenth Amendment
▲
Carrie Chapman Catt
Catt called an emergency suffrage convention in September 1916, and invited President Wilson, who cautiously supported suffrage. He told the convention, "There has been a force behind you that will... be triumphant and for which you can afford. ... to wait.” They did have to wait, but within four years, the passage of the suffrage amendment became the capstone of the progressive movement.
Chapter 9
Wilson Wins Financial Reforms
Like Theodore Roosevelt, Woodrow Wilson claimed progressive ideals, but he
had a different idea for the federal government. He believed in attacking large
concentrations of power to give greater freedom to average citizens. As president
Wilson moved to enact his program, the "New Freedom," and planned his attack
on what he called the triple wall of privilege: the trusts, tariffs, and high finance
Vocabulary injunction: a court order prohibiting a party from a specific course of action
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What was the impact of the two antitrust measures?
WILSON’S BACKGROUND
Wilson grew up in the South during the Civil War and Reconstruction. The son of a Presbyterian minister, he received a strict upbringing. Before entering politics, Wilson worked as a lawyer, a history professor, and later as president of Princeton University. In 1910, he became governor of New Jersey, where he supported progressive legislation such as a direct primary, worker’s compensation, and the regulation of public utilities and railroads. TWO KEY ANTITRUST MEASURES
"Without the watchful . . . resolute interference of the government," Wilson said, "there can be no fair play between individuals and such powerful institutions as the trusts. Freedom today is something more than being let alone." During Wilson’s administration, Congress enacted two key antitrust measures. The first, the Clayton Antitrust Act of 1914, sought to strengthen the Sherman Antitrust Act of 1890. The Clayton Act prohibited corporations from acquiring the stock of another if doing so would create a monopoly; if a company violated the law, its officers could be prosecuted. The Clayton Act also specified that labor unions and farm organizations not only had a right to exist but also would no longer be subject to antitrust laws. Therefore, strikes, peaceful picketing, boycotts, and the collection of strike benefits became legal. In addition, injunctions against strikers were prohibited unless the strikers threatened damage that could not be remedied. Samuel Gompers, president of the American Federation of Labor (AFL), saw great value to workers in the Clayton Act. He called it a Magna Carta for labor, referring to the English document, signed in 1215, in which the English king recognized that he was bound by the law and that the law granted rights to his subjects.
The second major antitrust measure, the Federal Trade Commission Act of 1914, set up the Federal Trade Commission (FTC). This "watchdog" agency was given the power to investigate possible violations of regulatory statutes, to require periodic reports from corporations, and to put an end to a
number of unfair business practices. Under Wilson, the FTC administered almost 400 cease-and-desist orders to companies engaged in illegal activity.
Critics of antitrust laws contend that the federal government should not regulate private businesses. They argue that such regulation punishes the businesses that have been most successful in outperforming their competition, leading to inefficiency. They believe such regulation also needlessly consumes government resources. Supporters argue that such regulation is necessary to ensure that markets stay competitive.
A NEW TAX SYSTEM
In an effort to curb the power of big business, Wilson worked to lower tariff rates, knowing that supporters of big business hadn’t allowed such a reduction under Taft. Wilson lobbied hard in 1913 for the Underwood Act, which would substantially reduce tariff rates for the first time since the Civil War. He summoned Congress to a special session to plead his case, and established a precedent of delivering the State of the Union message in person. Businesses lobbied too, looking to block tariff reductions.
When manufacturing lobbyists—people hired by manufacturers to present their case to government officials-descended on the capital to urge senators to vote no, passage seemed unlikely. Wilson denounced the lobbyists and urged voters to monitor their senators' votes. Because of the new president's use of the bully pulpit, the Senate voted to cut tariff rates even more deeply than the House had done.
sow THEfr
DEREGULATION
In recent years the railroad, airline, and telecommunications industries have all been deregulated, or permitted to compete without government control. It is hoped that this will improve their efficiency and lower prices.
During the Progressive Era, reformers viewed regulation as a necessary role of government to ensure safety and fairness for consumers as well as industrial competitors. Opponents of regulation, however, believed that government regulation caused inefficiency and high prices.
Modern critics of deregulation argue that deregulated businesses may skimp on safety. They may also neglect hard-to-serve populations, such as elderly, poor, or disabled people, while competing for more profitable customers.
The Progressive Era 333
Revenue from Individual Federal Income Tax, 1915-1995
Total
Sources: Historical Statistics of the United States; Statistical Abstract of the United States, 1987,1995,1999
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Graphs 1.	About what year did income tax revenues first begin to rise sharply?
2.	About how much revenue did the income tax bring in 1995?
FEDERAL INCOME TAX
With lower tariff rates, the federal government had to replace the revenue that tariffs had previously supplied. Ratified in 1913, the Sixteenth Amendment legalized a federal income tax, which provided revenue by taxing individual earnings and corporate profits. Under this graduated tax, larger incomes were taxed at higher rates than smaller incomes. The tax began with a modest tax on family incomes over $4,000, and ranged from 1 percent to a maximum of 6 percent on incomes over $500,000. Initially, few congressmen realized the potential of the income tax, but by 1917, the government was receiving more money on the income tax than it had ever gained from tariffs. Today, income taxes on corporations and individuals represent the federal government’s main source of revenue.
FEDERAL RESERVE SYSTEM
Next, Wilson turned his attention to financial reform. The nation needed a way to strengthen the ways in which banks were run, as well as a way to quickly adjust the amount of money in circulation. Both credit availability and money supply had to keep pace with the economy. Wilson's solution was to establish a decentralized private banking system under federal control. The Federal Reserve Act of 1913 divided the nation into 12 districts and established a central bank in each district. These "banker's banks" then served the other banks within the district. The federal reserve banks could issue new paper currency in emergency situations, and member banks could use the new currency to make loans to their customers. Federal reserve banks could transfer funds to member banks in trouble, saving the banks from closing and protecting customers' savings. This marked the emergence of monetary policy, in which changes are made to the money supply in order to influence the economy. By 1923, roughly 70 percent of the nation's banking resources were part of the Federal Reserve System. One of Wilson's most enduring achievements, this system still serves as the basis of the nation's banking system.
Women Win Suffrage
While Wilson pushed hard for reform of trusts, tariffs, and banking, determined women intensified their push for the vote. The educated, native-born, middle-class women who had been active in progressive movements had grown increasingly impatient about not being allowed to vote. As of 1910, women had federal voting rights only in Wyoming, Utah, Colorado, Washington, and Idaho.
Determined suffragists pushed on, however. They finally saw success come within reach as a result of three developments: the increased activism of local groups, the use of bold new strategies to build enthusiasm for the movement, and the rebirth of the national movement under Carrie Chapman Catt.
LOCAL SUFFRAGE BATTLES
The suffrage movement was given new strength by growing numbers of college-educated women. Two Massachusetts organiza-
tions, the Boston Equal Suffrage Association for Good Government and the
College Equal Suffrage League, used door-to-door campaigns to reach potential
MAIN IDEA
Evaluating
Why were tariff reform and the Federal Reserve System important?
14 Chapter 9
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Events
Why do you think women won the right to vote in 1920, after earlier efforts had failed?
Vocabulary appease: pacify by granting concessions
supporters. Founded by Radcliffe graduate Maud Wood Park, the Boston group spread the message of suffrage to poor and working-class women. Members also took trolley tours where, at each stop, crowds would gather to watch the unusual sight of a woman speaking in public.
Many wealthy young women who visited Europe as part of their education became involved in the suffrage movement in Britain. Led by Emmeline Pankhurst, British suffragists used increasingly bold tactics, such as heckling government officials, to advance their cause. Inspired by their activism, American women returned to the United States armed with similar approaches in their own campaigns for suffrage.
CATT AND THE NATIONAL MOVEMENT
Susan B. Anthony's successor as president of NAWSA was Carrie Chapman Catt, who served from 1900 to 1904 and resumed the presidency in 1915. When Catt returned to NAWSA after organizing New York's Women Suffrage Party, she concentrated on five tactics: (1) painstaking organization;
(2)	close ties between local, state, and national workers;
(3)	establishing a wide base of support; (4) cautious lobbying; and (5) gracious, ladylike behavior.
Although suffragists saw victories, the greater number of failures led some suffragists to try more radical tactics.
Lucy Burns and Alice Paul formed their own more radical organization, the Congressional Union, and its successor, the National Woman's Party. They pressured the federal government to pass a suffrage amendment, and by 1917 Paul had organized her followers to mount a round-the-clock picket line around the White House. Some of the picketed were arrested, jailed, and even force-fed when they attempted a hunger strike.
These efforts, and America's involvement in World War I, finally made suffrage inevitable. Patriotic American women who headed committees, knitted socks for soldiers, and sold liberty bonds now claimed their overdue reward for supporting the war effort. In 1919, Congress passed the Nineteenth Amendment, granting women the right to vote. The amendment won final ratification in August 1920—72 years after women had first convened and demanded the vote at the Seneca Falls convention in 1848.
The Limits of Progressivism
Despite Wilson's economic and political reforms, he disappointed Progressives who favored social reform. In particular, on racial matters Wilson's Southern prejudices led him to appease conservative Southern Democratic voters but disappoint his Northern white and black supporters. He placed segregationists in charge of federal agencies, thereby expanding racial segregation in the federal government, the military, and Washington, D.C.
WILSON AND CIVIL RIGHTS
Like Roosevelt and Taft, Wilson retreated on civil rights once in office. During the presidential campaign of 1912, he won the support of the NAACP's black intellectuals and white liberals by promising to treat blacks equally and to speak out against lynching. EMMELINE PANKHURST
American women struggling for suffrage received valuable tutoring from their English counterparts, whose bold maneuvers had captured media coverage.
The noted British suffragist Emmeline Pankhurst, who helped found the National Women’s Social and Political Union, often engaged in radical tactics. Pankhurst and other suffragists staged parades, organized protest meetings, endured hunger strikes, heckled candidates for Parliament, and spat on policemen who tried to quiet them. They were often imprisoned for their activities, before Parliament granted them the right to vote in 1928.
The Progressive Era 335
History Through
| Architecture}—
FROM SPLENDOR TO SIMPLICITY
The progressive movement, which influenced numerous aspects of society, also impacted the world of American architecture. One of the most prominent architects of the time was Frank Lloyd Wright, who studied under the renowned designer Louis Sullivan. In the spirit of progressivism, Wright sought to design buildings that were orderly, efficient, and in harmony with the world around them.
Architecture of the Gilded Age featured ornate decoration and detail, as seen here in this Victorian-style house built between 1884 and 1886. Wright rejected these showy and decorative styles in favor of more simplistic designs.
▲
Wright's "prairie style" design features a low, horizontal, and well-defined structure made predominantly of wood, concrete, brick, and other simple materials. Shown here is the Robie House (1909), one of Wright's most famous prairie-style structures, which incorporates these architectural qualities.
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Visual Sources 1.	What are the most striking differences between the two houses? Cite examples that contrast the two buildings.
2.	How does Wright’s style reflect the progressive spirit?
As president, however, Wilson opposed federal antilynching legislation, arguing that these crimes fell under state jurisdiction. In addition, the Capitol and the federal offices in Washington, D.C., which had been desegregated during Reconstruction, resumed the practice of segregation shortly after Wilson's election.
Wilson appointed to his cabinet fellow white Southerners who extended segregation. Secretary of the Navy Josephus Daniels, for example, proposed at a cabinet meeting to do away with common drinking fountains and towels in his department. According to an entry in Daniels's diary, President Wilson agreed because he had "made no promises in particular to negroes, except to do them justice." Segregated facilities, in the president's mind, were just.
African Americans and their liberal white supporters in the NAACP felt betrayed. Oswald Garrison Villard, a grandson of the abolitionist William Lloyd Garrison, wrote to Wilson in dismay, "The colored men who voted and worked for you in the belief that their status as American citizens was safe in your hands are deeply cast down." Wilson's response—that he had acted "in the interest of the negroes" and "with the approval of some of the most influential negroes I know"— only widened the rift between the president and some of his former supporters
336 Chapter 9
On November 12, 1914, the president's reception of an African-American delegation brought the confrontation to a bitter climax. William Monroe Trotter, editor-in-chief of the Guardian, an African-American Boston newspaper, led the delegation. Trotter complained that African Americans from 38 states had asked the president to reverse the segregation of government employees, but that segregation had since increased. Trotter then commented on Wilson's inaction.
A
Personal Voice william monroe trotter Only two years ago you were heralded as perhaps the second Lincoln, and now the Afro-American leaders who supported you are hounded as false leaders and traitors to their race. ... As equal citizens and by virtue of your public promises we are entitled at your hands to freedom from discrimination, restriction, imputation, and insult in government employ. Have you a ‘new freedom’ for white Americans and a new slavery for your Afro-American fellow citizens’? God forbid! ”
—address to President Wilson, November 12, 1914
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
What actions of Wilson disappointed civil rights advocates?
Wilson found Trotter's tone infuriating. After an angry Trotter shook his finger at the president to emphasize a point, the furious Wilson demanded that the delegation leave. Wilson's refusal to extend civil rights to African Americans pointed to the limits of progressivism under his administration. America's involvement in the war raging in Europe would soon reveal other weaknesses. Jg)
THE TWILIGHT OF PROGRESSIVISM
After taking office in 1913, Wilson had said, "There's no chance of progress and reform in an administration in which war plays the principal part." Yet he found that the outbreak of World War I in Europe in 1914 demanded America's involvement. Meanwhile, distracted Americans and their legislators allowed reform efforts to stall. As the pacifist and reformer Jane Addams mournfully reflected, "The spirit of fighting burns away all those impulses .. . which foster the will to justice." International conflict was destined to be part of Wilson's presidency. During the early years of his administration, Wilson had dealt with issues of imperialism that had roots in the late 19th century. However, World War I dominated most of his second term as president. The Progressive Era had come to an end.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Carrie Chapman Catt	•Federal Trade Commission • monetary policy	• Nineteenth Amendment
•Clayton Antitrust Act	(FTC)	-Federal Reserve System
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a time line of key events relating to Progressivism during Wilson’s first term. Use the dates already plotted on the time line below as a guide.
1913	1914	1915	1916
Write a paragraph explaining which event you think best demonstrates progressive reform.
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING PRIMARY SOURCES
Wilson said, “Without the watchful . . . resolute interference of the government, there can be no fair play between individuals and ... the trusts.” How does this statement reflect the changing relationship between the federal government and private business?
4.	analyzing effects
Describe how the Federal Reserve Act
of 1913 affected the emergence of
monetary policy in the United States.
ANALYZING MOTIVES
Why do you think Wilson failed to push for equality for African Americans? Think About:
•	other progressive presidents
•	Wilson’s background
•	the primary group of people progressive reforms targeted
6.	EVALUATING
What was the impact of the Nineteenth Amendment? Was it an effective means of achieving equality of political rights? Explain.
The Progressive Era 337
CHAPTER
ASSESSMENT
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name below, ing its connection to the Progressive Era.
1.	progressive movement
2.	muckraker
3.	suffrage
4.	Susan B. Anthony
5.	Theodore Roosevelt
6.	NAACP
write a sentence explain-Era.
7.	Gifford Pinchot
8.	Woodrow Wilson
9.	Clayton Antitrust Act
10.	Federal Reserve System
MAIN IDEAS
! r
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
The Origins of Progressivism (pages 306-312)
1.	What were the four goals that various progressive reform movements struggled to achieve?
2.	Evaluate the impact of muckrakers on American society.
3.	How did government change during the Progressive Era? How were these changes important?
Women in Public Life (pages 313-316)
4.	In the late 1890s, what job opportunities were available to uneducated women without industrial skills?
5.	Give two examples of national women’s organizations committed to social activism. Briefly describe their progressive missions.
Teddy Roosevelt's Square Deal (pages 317-32:
6.	What scandalous practices did Upton Sinclair expose in his novel The Jungle? How did the American public, Roosevelt, and Congress respond?
7.	How did Roosevelt earn his reputation as a trust-buster?
Progressivism Under Taft (pages 328-331)
8.	As a progressive, how did Taft compare with Roosevelt?
9.	Why did the Republican Party split during Taft’s administration?
Wilson's New Freedom (pages 332-337)
10.	How did the Clayton Antitrust Act benefit labor?
11.	What are the costs and benefits of antitrust acts?
12.	What was the impact of the passage of the Sixteenth Amendment?
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a Venn diagram to show some of the similarities and differences between Roosevelt’s Square Deal and Wilson’s New Freedom. DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
How did the Nineteenth Amendment fit into the historical development of the civil rights movement in the 20th century? Support your answer with details from the text.
338
<

r
TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the quotation and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
“ Labor began to organize itself in Trade Unions and to confront the industrialists with a stiff bargaining power. These developments were to lead to a period of protest and reform in the early twentieth century. The gains conferred by large-scale industry were great and lasting, but the wrongs that had accompanied their making were only gradually righted. ”
—Winston Churchill, The Great Republic:
A
History of America 1.	In the passage, Winston Churchill attempts to explain what prompted Progressive Era reformers. The passage explains the actions of which of the following labor reform leaders?
A
Maria Mitchell B Carry Nation C Susan B. Anthony D Florence Kelley 2.	The muckrakers served Progressivism by —
F informing people about abuses so that they could protest.
G enacting legislation to prevent political corruption.
H cleaning up unhealthy meat processing plants. J filing and prosecuting antitrust lawsuits.
3.	In the presidential election of 1912, three candidates attempted to win the liberal, progressive vote. Which candidate for president in 1912 ran on a conservative platform?
A
Woodrow Wilson B William Taft C Theodore Roosevelt D Eugene V. Debs 71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
'"J'WriteSmart COLLABORATIVE LEARNI

Think about the issues you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. As a class, discuss what progressive reformers did to bring about changes in government and society. Consider what else they might have done to be more effective. Rank their efforts in order of effectiveness and offer suggestions for improvement. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write out your suggestions.
XgEtjTURY
Imagine you are a reporter covering a 1912 congressional hearing investigating labor conditions in a textile mill. Work with a partner to write two newspaper articles—one that shows bias in favor of the mill workers, and one that shows bias in favor of the mill. Share the articles with the class and analyze how language can affect the reporting of information.
my WriteSmart
Conservation of natural resources became a focus of federal attention in the early 1900s. Write an explanation of the two different perspectives on conservation advocated by Gifford Pinchot and John Muir. Then decide which position you agree with and explain why. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your explanation.
The Progressive Era 339
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Creating Written Presentations
DEFINING THE SKILL
Written presentations are in-depth reports on a topic in history. Often, written presentations take a stand on an issue or try to support a specific conclusion or point of view on a social studies issue or event. To successfully report on an event or to make a point, your writing needs to be clear, concise, and supported by factual details.
Historians must perform careful research and cite all sources in written presentations. They also narrow their focus to a specific part of an issue or event. For example, a historian might choose to write about one aspect of the Progressive Era rather than the whole time period. As a student, a written presentation is one way for you to present information on a topic you have researched. You can identify and support a point of view about a social studies issue or event using historical evidence to back up your thoughts.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: MAKE AN OUTLINE
When planning a presentation, identify your point of view on an issue or event and narrow your focus to relevant information. Then use an outline like the one shown below to organize the information to communicate your point of view with details and facts supported by historical evidence. o Identify a topic that you wish to research. Focus on one or more questions that you hope to answer about the topic. Then research the topic using library and Internet sources.
& Formulate a hypothesis. This will serve as the main idea, or thesis, of your presentation. Analyze the information in your sources and develop a hypothesis that answers your questions about the topic.
0 Organize the facts and supporting details around your main idea. These facts and examples should be presented in a way that helps you build a logical case to prove your point.
0 To express your ideas clearly, use standard grammar, spelling, sentence structure, and punctuation. Proofread your work to make sure it is well organized and grammatically correct.
^^The Goals of Progressivism 1.0AII progressive reforms had one of four goals.
A.
Protecting Social Welfare 0 1. Social Gospel movement sought to help the poor.
2.	Settlement houses provided aid to poor city dwellers.
S.
Promoting Moral Improvement 1.	Reformers sought to improve Americans’ personal behavior.
2.	WCTU worked for prohibition.
C.
Creating Economic Reform 1.	Writers criticized capitalism.
2.	The American Socialist Party formed.
3.	Muckrakers exposed corruption in business and government.
D.
Fostering Efficiency 1.	Businesses introduced scientific management in the workplace.
2.	Manufacturers developed the assembly line.
39 SKI
; I.
STRATEGY: EDIT AND REVISE
Once you have completed your first draft, read through it and make corrections to improve your writing so that you communicate your ideas as clearly as possible. | The Goals of Progressivism
As America approached the 20th century a number of citizens tried to reform society. Their efforts formed what become known as the progressive movement. Progressive reformers had the following four goal^gsocial welfare, moral improvement, economic reform, and efficiency.
Many reformers sought to promote social welfare—especially in the
crowded, run-down, and unhealthy areas of the cities. The Social Gospel
movement inspired followers to erect churches in poor communities. It
also persuaded business leaders to treat workers more fairather reform- k
s
ers established settlement housejn slum neighborhoods to provide educational, cultural, and social services to people—especially to immigrants.
Another group of reformers felt that the lives of poor people could be improved through moral instruction. These reformers offer programs to I-improve personal behavior. The Women's Christian Temperence Union, for [-	,
instance, promoted prohibition. It believed that alcohol was the root of many of society's problems.
Other progressives, such as Henry George and Edward Bellamy, blamed the competitive nature of capitalism for creating a large underclass. Some Americans, especially workers, embraced^dal^nr Eugene Debs helped organize the_american socialistparty^^dvocatea communal living and a classless society. During the e~arly 20th century, joumalists^xposed the corrupt side of business and politics^)
(known as muckraker^------------------------------
Meanwhile, some tried to make American society more efficient.
Frederick Winslow Taylor popularized scientific management, the effort to improve efficiency in the workplace by applying scientific principles. Out of this concept emerged the assembly line, which required workers to perform the same task over and over, and thus sped up production.
Through their hard work, the progressives reformed many levels of society and helped Americans live better lives.	J
<	_________ I,,,	,1 i „ n	....

(-h
Use punctuation marks for their correct purposes. A colon precedes a list.
Use the correct parts of speech. An adverb modifies a verb. Check for common agreement errors. Subjects and verbs must agree in person and number.
Use consistent verb tense. Use past tense for events in the past.
Check spelling with both an electronic spell checker and a dictionary.
Capitalize all proper nouns, including names of political parties.
Use correct sentence structure. Every sentence needs a subject and a verb.
Be sure sentence structure leads clearly from one phrase to the next. Correct misplaced modifiers..
applying the skill
Identify your point of view on a social studies issue or event and create a two-page written presentation on that topic, supported with historical evidence. Use the strategies to help you create your presentation.
339 SK2
' > -J
Essential Question
Which individuals and events moved
the United States into the role of a world power?
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
2D,4A,4B, 12A, 15C, 15D,29A,29D
SECTION 1: Imperialism and America Main Idea Beginning in 1867 and continuing through the century, global competition caused the United States to expand.
SECTION 2: The Spanish-American War
Main Idea In 1898, the United States went to war to help Cuba win its independence from Spain.
SECTION 3: Acquiring New Lands
Main Idea In the early 1900s, the United States engaged in conflicts in Puerto Rico, Cuba, and the Philippines.
SECTION 4: America as a World Power
Main Idea The Russo-Japanese War, the Panama Canal, and the Mexican Revolution added to America's military and economic power.
USA
WORLD
erica Claims mpire
w * '







This lithograph of Roosevelt leading the Rough Riders at San Juan Hill shows the men on horseback, although they actually fought on foot
: i.1893] Business - groups, aided by j U.S. marines, over-: throw Hawaii’s : Queen Liliuokalani.
U.S.S.
Maine : explodes and : sinks. The Spanish-: .Arner!ca.n War begins. : [X90X] Theodore
•	Roosevelt ‘ becomes
: president
•	after McKinley
•	is assassinated.
: 1908] William : Howard Taft is : elected president.
: [19121 : Woodrow J Wilson is : elected : president.

]l914j The Panama Canal opens.
1890
1900
1910
•	1X895j Guglielmo
: Marconi develops : the technology that
*	led to the modern : radio.
1898;
: Marie Curie • discovers I : radium.
1900 In China, the Boxers rebel.
1903 Panama: declares its :
independence .
from Colombia.:
1910 The Mexican Revolution begins.
: [1914] World : War I begins : in Europe.
WAKE UR AMERICA!
r da
£3§J|P I
cnnuzAT ion calls
fVtRY milWOtlAHaCHIUli

myNotebouk !
INTERACT
WITH HISTORY
In the late 1890s, American newspapers are running sensational stories about Spain's harsh rule of Cuba. Such articles anger Americans. Among those willing to fight for Cuba's freedom are a group of volunteers, the Rough Riders. Led by future president Theodore Roosevelt, the Rough Riders become a model for others to follow. As you read the chapter and explore the issues below, use the annotation tools in your eBook to record your thoughts.
Explore the Issues
•	When should the U.S. intervene in the affairs of another country?
•	In what ways do dramatic headlines influence American opinion?
: [19171 Puerto Ricans : become U.S. citizens.
: [I917i The United - States enters World : War I.
1920
i 1917] Mexico revises and adopts its constitution.
America Claims an Empire 341
J40
Chapter 10 
Imperialism and America
MAIN IDEA
Beginning in 1867 and continuing through the century, global competition caused the United States to expand.
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
During this time period, the United States acquired Hawaii and Alaska, both of which became states in 1959.
Terms & Names
»Queen Llliuokalanl
•	imperialism
•	Alfred T. Mahan
•William Seward • Pearl Harbor •Sanford B. Dole
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on events and concepts that illustrate the roots of imperialism.
One American's Story
In 1893 Queen Liliuokalani (b-le'a-o-ka-la'ne) realized that her reign in Hawaii had come to an end. More than 160 U.S. sailors and marines stood ready to aid the haoles (white foreigners) who planned to overthrow the Hawaiian monarchy. In an eloquent statement of protest, the proud monarch surrendered to the superior force of the United States.
A
Personal Voice queen liliuokalani 661, Liliuokalani,... do hereby solemnly protest against any and all acts done against myself and the constitutional government of the Hawaiian Kingdom... . Now, to avoid any collision of armed forces and perhaps the loss of life, I do under this protest. . . yield my authority until such time as the Government of the United States shall... undo the action of its representatives and reinstate me In the authority which I claim as the constitutional sovereign of the Hawaiian Islands. ” —quoted in Those Kings and Queens of Old Hawaii
U.S. ambassador to Hawaii John L. Stevens informed the State Department, "The Hawaiian pear is now fully ripe, and this is the golden hour for the United States to pluck it." The annexation of Hawaii was only one of the goals of America's empire builders in the late 19th century.
Hawaii’s “Queen LSI” announced that if restored to power, she would behead those who had conspired to depose her.
American Expansionism
Americans had always sought to expand the size of their nation, and throughout the 19th century they extended their control toward the Pacific Ocean. However, by the 1880s, many American leaders had become convinced that the United States should join the imperialist powers of Europe and establish colonies overseas. Imperialism—the policy in which stronger nations extend their economic, political, or military control over weaker territories—was already a trend around the world.
142 Chapter 10
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
How did European imperialism affect Africa?
Background
In the late 1800s, new farm
machinery greatly improved grain production. For example, plows, harrows, threshing machines, and reapers increased corn production by 264 percent and the wheat harvest by 252 percent.
PLAYER
In the early 1900s, the Navy’s Great White Fleet, so named because its ships were painted white, was a sign of America’s growing military power. ►
GLOBAL COMPETITION
European nations had been establishing colonies for centuries. In the late 19th century Africa had emerged as a prime target of European expansionism. By the early 20th century, only two countries in all of Africa—Ethiopia and Liberia—remained independent. Imperialists also competed for territory in Asia, especially in China. In its late-19th-century reform era, Japan replaced its old feudal order with a strong central government. Hoping that military strength would bolster industrialization, Japan joined European nations in competition for China in the 1890s.
Most Americans gradually warmed to the idea of expansion overseas. With a belief in manifest destiny, they already had pushed the U.S. border to the Pacific Ocean. Three factors fueled the new American imperialism:
•	desire for military strength
•	thirst for new markets
•	belief in cultural superiority
DESIRE FOR MILITARY STRENGTH
Seeing that other nations were establishing a global military presence, American leaders advised that the United States build up its own military strength. One such leader was Admiral Alfred T. Mahan of the U.S. Navy. Mahan urged government officials to build up American naval power in order to compete with other powerful nations. As a result of the urging of Mahan and others, the United States built nine steel-hulled cruisers between 1883 and 1890. The construction of modern battleships such as the Maine and the Oregon transformed the country into the world's third largest naval power. THIRST FOR NEW MARKETS
In the late 19th century, advances in technology enabled American farms and factories to produce far more than American citizens could consume. Now the United States needed raw materials for its factories and new markets for its agricultural and manufactured goods. Imperialists viewed foreign trade as the solution to American overproduction and the related problems of unemployment / and economic depression.
ADMIRAL ALFRED T. MAHAN 1840-1914

BELIEF IN CULTURAL SUPERIORITY
Cultural factors also were used to justify imperialism. Some Americans combined the philosophy of Social Darwinism—a belief that free-market competition would lead to the survival of the fittest—wit a belief in the racial superiority of Anglo-Saxons. Some people therefore considered it a social responsibility to "civilize" the inhabitants of less developed countries and spread the benefits of Western society. In addition, Protestant Christian missionaries felt they had a moral duty to convert others to their beliefs. The United States Acquires Alaska
An early supporter of American expansion was William Seward, Secretary of State under presidents Abraham Lincoln and Andrew Johnson. In 1867, Seward arranged for the U.S. to buy Alaska from the Russians for $7.2 million. Seward had some trouble persuading the House of Representatives to approve funding for the purchase. Some people thought it was silly to buy what they called "Seward's Icebox" or "Seward's folly." Time showed how wrong they were. In 1959, Alaska became a state. For about two cents an acre, the United States had acquired a land rich in timber, minerals, and, as it turned out, oil. JBj
The United States Takes Hawaii

MAIN IDEA
Developing
Historical
Perspective
How did time prove that the purchase of Alaska was not an act of folly?
Hawaii’s Changing Population 1853-1920
■	Native Hawaiian
■	Caucasian
■	Other (mostly Asian)
Source: Robert C. Schmitt,
Demographic Statistics of Hawaii, 1778-1965
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Graphs 1.	What were the most dramatic changes in Hawaiian population between 1853 and 1920?
2.	How might these changes have affected the political climate there?
In 1867, the same year in which Alaska was purchased, the United States took over the Midway Islands, which lie in the Pacific Ocean about 1300 miles north of Hawaii. No one lived on the islands, so the event did not attract much attention.
Hawaii was another question. The Hawaiian Islands
____________________ had been economically important to the United States
for nearly a century. Since the 1790s, American merchants had stopped there on their way to China and East India. In the 1820s, Yankee missionaries founded Christian schools and churches on the islands. Their children and grandchildren became sugar planters who sold most of their crop to the United States.
THE CRY FOR ANNEXATION
In the mid-19th century, American-owned sugar plantations accounted for about three-quarters of the islands' wealth. Plantation owners imported thousands of laborers from Japan, Portugal, and China. By 1900, foreigners and immigrant laborers outnumbered native Hawaiians about three to one. White planters profited from close ties with the United States. In 1875, the United States agreed to import Hawaiian sugar duty-free. Over the next 15 years, Hawaiian sugar production increased nine times. Then the McKinley Tariff of 1890 provoked a crisis by eliminating the duty-free status of Hawaiian sugar. As a result, Hawaiian sugar growers faced competition in the American market. American planters in Hawaii called for the United States to annex the islands so they wouldn't have to pay the duty.
U.S. military and economic leaders already understood the value of the islands. In 1887, they pressured Hawaii to allow the United States to build a naval base at Pearl Harbor, the kingdom's best port. The base became a refueling station for American ships.
Vocabulary annex: to
incorporate territory into an existing country or state
144 Chapter 10
180°
160°W
140°W
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Events
$ What factors led to the annexation of Hawaii in 1898?
THE END OF A MONARCHY
Also in that year, Hawaii's King Kalakaua had been strong-armed by white business leaders. They forced him to amend Hawaii's constitution, effectively limiting voting rights to only wealthy land-owners. But when Kalakaua died in 1891, his sister Queen Liliuokalani came to power with a "Hawaii for Hawaiians" agenda. She proposed removing the property-owning qualifications for voting. To prevent this from happening, business groups—encouraged by Ambassador John L. Stevens—organized a revolution. With the help of marines, they overthrew the queen and set up a government headed by Sanford B. Dole.
President Cleveland directed that the queen be restored to her throne.
When Dole refused to surrender power,
Cleveland formally recognized the Republic of Hawaii. But he refused to consider annexation unless a majority of Hawaiians favored it.
In 1897, William McKinley, who favored annexation, succeeded Cleveland as president. On August 12, 1898, Congress
proclaimed Hawaii an American territory, although Hawaiians had never had the chance to vote. In 1959, Hawaii became the 50th state of the United States.
i L
Si
Alaska, 1867, and Hawaii, 1898
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1. Location Where do the Hawaiian Islands lie in relation to the United States? Human-Environment Interaction Given their geographic location, why were Hawaii and Alaska of value to the United States?
-0°—
□
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Queen Liliuokalani	• Alfred T. Mahan	• Pearl Harbor
•Imperialism	•William Seward	*Sanford B. Dole
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Copy this web on your paper and fill it in with events and concepts that illustrate the roots
of imperialism.
<^Roots of U.S. Imperialism^
Choose one event to explain further in a paragraph.
CRITICAL THINKING
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
Manifest destiny greatly influenced American policy during the first half of the 19th century. How do you think manifest destiny set the stage for American imperialism at the end of the century?
4.	SUMMARIZING
Explain the efforts of significant people to move the United States into the position of a world power. Think About:
•	Alfred T. Mahan
•	Sanford B. Dole
•	Christian missionaries
ANALYZING PRIMARY SOURCES
In the following passage, how does Indiana Senator Albert J. Beveridge explain the need for the U.S. to acquire new territories?
44 Fate has written our policy for us; the trade of the world must and shall be ours. ... We will establish trading posts throughout the world as distributing points for American products. .. Great colonies governing themselves, flying our flag and trading with us, will grow about our posts of trade.99
—quoted in Beveridge and the Progressive Era
America Claims an Empire 345
TEKS2D,4A,15D
The Spanish-American War
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
In 1898, the United States went to war to help Cuba win its independence from Spain.
U.S. involvement in Latin America and Asia increased greatly as a result of the war and continues today.
•	Jose Marti	• George Dewey
•	Valerlano Weyler • Rough Riders
•	yellow Journalism • San Juan Hill
U.S.S.
Maine • Treaty of Paris 
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the pros and cons of annexing the Philippines.
Early in 1896, James Creelman traveled to Cuba as a New York World reporter, covering the second Cuban war for independence from Spain. While in Havana, he wrote columns about his observations of the war. His descriptions of Spanish atrocities aroused American sympathy for Cubans.
A
Personal Voice james creelman “No man’s life, no man’s property is safe [in Cuba]. American citizens are imprisoned or slain without cause. American property is destroyed on all sides. . . . Wounded soldiers can be found begging in the streets of Havana. . . . The horrors of a barbarous struggle for the extermination of the native population are witnessed in all parts of the country. Blood on the roadsides, blood in the fields, blood on the doorsteps, blood, blood, blood! ... Is there no nation wise enough, brave enough to aid this blood-smitten land?” —New York World, May 17, 1896
Newspapers during that period often exaggerated stories like Creelman's to boost their sales as well as to provoke American intervention in Cuba.
▲
Cuban rebels bum the town of WWW in March 189®'
Cubans Rebel Against Spain
By the end of the 19th century, Spain—once the most powerful colonial nation on earth—had lost most of its colonies. It retained only the Philippines and the island of Guam in the Pacific, a few outposts in Africa, and the Caribbean islands of Cuba and Puerto Rico in the Americas.
AMERICAN INTEREST IN CUBA
.	ine Unitecl States had long held an interest i
Cuba which lies only 90 miles south of Florida. In 1854, diplomats recommen,
ed to President Franklin Pierce that the United States buy Cuba from Spain. T1
Spanish responded by saying that they would rather see Cuba sunk in the ocea
346 Chapter 10
Vocabulary guerrilla: a
member of a military force that harasses the enemy
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
H
Why did Jos6 Martf encourage Cuban rebels to destroy sugar mills and plantations? But American interest in Cuba continued. When the Cubans rebelled against Spain between 1868 and 1878,
American sympathies went out to the Cuban people.
The Cuban revolt against Spain was not successful, but in 1886 the Cuban people did force Spain to abolish slavery.
After the emancipation of Cuba's slaves, American capitalists began investing millions of dollars in large sugar cane plantations on the island.
THE SECOND WAR FOR INDEPENDENCE
Anti-Spanish sentiment in Cuba soon erupted into a second war for independence. Jose Marti, a Cuban poet and journalist in exile in New York, launched a revolution in 1895. Marti organized Cuban resistance against Spain, using an active guerrilla campaign and deliberately destroying property, especially American-owned sugar mills and plantations. Marti counted on provoking U.S. intervention to help the rebels achieve Cuba Libre!—a free Cuba.
Public opinion in the United States was split. Many business people wanted the government to support Spain in order to protect their investments. Other Americans, however, were enthusiastic about the rebel cause. The cry "Cuba Libre!" was, after all, similar in sentiment to Patrick Henry's "Give me liberty or give me death!"
War Fever Escalates
In 1896, Spain responded to the Cuban revolt by sending General Valeriano Weyler to Cuba to restore order.
Weyler tried to crush the rebellion by herding the entire rural population of central and western Cuba into barbed-wire concentration camps. Here civilians could not give aid to rebels. An estimated 300,000 Cubans filled these camps, where thousands died from hunger and disease.
HEADLINE WARS
Weyler's actions fueled a war over newspaper circulation that had developed between the American newspaper tycoons William Randolph Hearst and Joseph Pulitzer. To lure readers, Hearst's New York Journal and Pulitzer's New York World printed exaggerated accounts—by reporters such as James Creelman____of "Butcher" Weyler's brutality. Stories of poisoned wells and of
children being thrown to the sharks deepened American sympathy for the rebels. This sensational style of writing, which exaggerates the news to lure and enrage readers, became known as yellow journalism.
Hearst and Pulitzer fanned war fever. When Hearst sent the gifted artist Frederic Remington to Cuba to draw sketches of reporters' stories, Remington informed the publisher that a war between the United States and Spain seemed very unlikely. Hearst reportedly replied, "You furnish the pictures and I'll furnish the war."
THE DE LOME LETTER
American sympathy for "Cuba Libre!" grew with each day's headlines When President William McKinley took office in 1897, demands for American intervention in Cuba were on the rise. Preferring to avoid war with Spain McKinley tried diplomatic means to resolve the crisis. At first, his efforts appeared to succeed. Spain recalled General Weyler, modified the policy regarding concentration camps, and offered Cuba limited self-government. JOSE MARTI 1853-1895
The Cuban political activist Jos6 Martf dedicated his life to achieving independence for Cuba. Expelled from Cuba at the age of 16 because of his revolutionary activities, Marti earned a master’s degree and a law degree.
He eventually settled in the United States.
Wary of the U.S. role in the Cuban struggle against the Spanish, Martf warned, “I know the Monster, because I have lived in its lair.” His fears of U.S. imperialism turned out to have been well-founded. U.S. troops occupied Cuba on and off from 1906 until 1922.
Martf died fighting for Cuban independence in 1895. He is revered today in Cuba as a hero and martyr.
America Claims an Empire 347
In February 1898, however, the New York Journal published a private letter written by Enrique Dupuy de Lome, the Spanish minister to the United States. A Cuban rebel had stolen the letter from a Havana post office and leaked it to the newspaper, which was thirsty for scandal. The de Lome letter criticized President McKinley, calling him "weak" and "a bidder for the admiration of the crowd." The embarrassed Spanish government apologized, and the minister resigned. Still, Americans were angry over the insult to their president.
THE U.S.S. MAINE EXPLODES
Only a few days after the publication of the de Lome letter, American resentment toward Spain turned to outrage. Early in 1898, President McKinley had ordered the U.S.S. Maine to Cuba to bring home American citizens in danger from the fighting and to protect American property. On February 15, 1898, the ship blew up in the harbor of Havana. More than 260 men were killed. At the time, no one really knew why the ship exploded; however, American newspapers claimed that the Spanish had blown up the ship. The Journal's headline read "The warship Maine was split in two by an enemy's secret infernal machine." Hearst's paper offered a reward of $50,000 for the capture of the Spaniards who supposedly had committed the outrage.
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
What events increased the tension between the United States and Spain?
War with Spain Erupts
Now there was no holding back the forces that wanted war. "Remember the Maine!" became the rallying cry for U.S. intervention in Cuba. It made no difference that the Spanish government agreed, on April 9, to almost everything the United States demanded, including a six-month cease-fire.
When the L/.S.S. Maine exploded in the harbor of Havana, newspapers like the New vnru Journal were quick to place the blame on Spain.	K
348 Chapter 10
J

The Spanish-American War, 1898
! i
h-;»
War in the Caribbean
PACIFIC
OCEAN
Philippine > Islands
War in the Philippines
300 miles
100 300 kilometers
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Location Where does Cuba lie in relation to the United States?
2.	Location Look at the location of the Philippines. How does the map help explain why Spain was surprised by the American attack in the Philippines?
U.S.
Forces Battle 0	100	200 miles
0 100 200 kilometers
*1 u
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Events
How did the Spanish try to avoid war with the United States?
Despite the Spanish concessions, public opinion favored war. On April 11, McKinley asked Congress for authority to use force against Spain. After a week of debate, Congress agreed, and on April 20 the United States declared war.
THE WAR IN THE PHILIPPINES
The Spanish thought the Americans would invade Cuba. But the first battle of the war took place in a Spanish colony on the other side of the world—the Philippine Islands. On April 30, the American fleet in the Pacific steamed to the Philippines. The next morning, Commodore George Dewey gave the command to open fire on the Spanish fleet at Manila, the Philippine capital. Within hours, Dewey's men had destroyed every Spanish ship there. Dewey's victory allowed U.S. troops to land in the Philippines.
Dewey had the support of the Filipinos who, like the Cubans, also wanted freedom from Spain. Over the next two months, 11,000 Americans joined forces with Filipino rebels led by Emilio Aguinaldo. In August, Spanish troops in Manila surrendered to the United States.
THE WAR IN THE CARIBBEAN
In the Caribbean, hostilities began with a naval blockade of Cuba. Admiral William T. Sampson effectively sealed up the Spanish fleet in the harbor of Santiago de Cuba.
Dewey's victory at Manila had demonstrated the superiority of United States naval forces. In contrast, the army maintained only a small professional force, supplemented by a larger inexperienced and ill-prepared volunteer force. About
America Claims an Empire 349
125,000 Americans had volunteered to fight. The new soldiers were sent to training camps that lacked adequate supplies and effective leaders. Moreover there were not enough modern guns to go around, and the troops were out itte wit heavy woolen uniforms unsuitable for Cuba's tropical climate. In addition, t e officers—most of whom were Civil War veterans—had a tendency to spend their time recalling their war experiences rather than training the volunteers.
ROUGH RIDERS
Despite these handicaps, American forces landed in Cuba in June 1898 and began to converge on the port city of Santiago. The army of 17,000 included four African-American regiments of the regular army and the Rough Riders, a volunteer cavalry under the command of Leonard Wood and Theodore Roosevelt. Roosevelt, a New Yorker, had given up his job as Assistant Secretary of the Navy to lead the group of volunteers. He would later become president of the United States. The most famous land battle in Cuba took place near Santiago on July 1. The first part of the battle, on nearby Kettle Hill, featured a dramatic uphill charge by the Rough Riders and two African-American regiments, the Ninth and Tenth
____	Cavalries. Their victory cleared
the way for an infantry attack on the strategically important San Juan Hill. Although Roosevelt and his units played only a minor role in the second victory, U.S. newspapers declared him the hero of San Juan Hill.
Two days later, the Spanish fleet tried to escape the American blockade of the harbor at Santiago. The naval battle that followed, along the Cuban coast, ended in the destruction of the Spanish fleet. On the heels of this victory, American troops invaded Puerto Rico on July 25.
TREATY OF PARIS
The United States and Spain signed an armistice, or cease-fire agreement, on August 12. It ended what Secretary of State John Hay called "a splendid little war." The actual fighting in the war had lasted only 15 weeks. On December 10, 1898, the United States and Spain met in Paris to agree on a treaty. The
terms of the peace treaty proved costly for Spain. The Spanish had to give up all claims to Cuba and cede Puerto Rico in the West Indies and the Pacific island of Guam to the United States. Spain also turned control of the Philippines over to the United States in exchange for a $20 million payment.
On the whole, the American victory in the Spanish-American War was sweet. Still, the United States paid a heavy toll for the war. The monetary costs amounted to roughly $250 million. In addition, some 2,000 soldiers died, not from battle wounds but from yellow fever.
Despite the lives lost and the dollars spent, the Spanish-American War had a
not8eedPthya°t alth ^bVb^	HeMy Cabot Lodge °f Massachusetts
noted that although the war was very brief, “its results were many, startling and
of world-wide meaning."	7 <uuuig,<uiu
Background
The Rough Riders trained as cavalry but fought on foot because their horses didn’t reach Cuba in time.
These African-American troops prepare for battle during the Spanish-American War.
Summarizing
to What were the
terms of the Treaty
of Paris?
The United States now moved into the ranks of imperialist nations. Its new overseas territories gave it more bases for trade and for resupplying its navy. Within a year, it would capitalize on its new economic and military strength to acquire the Pacific island of Samoa. Expansionists expressed delight over the country's growing power, but the quest for empire troubled many Americans.
DEBATE OVER THE TREATY
The Treaty of Paris touched off a great debate in the United States. Some people who favored annexation believed that the United States had a duty to spread its values overseas. President McKinley told a group of Methodist ministers that he had prayed for guidance on Philippine annexation and had concluded "that there was nothing left for us to do but to take them all [the Philippine Islands], and to educate the Filipinos, and uplift and Christianize them." In fact, most Filipinos had been Christian for centuries. Strengthening the position of the United States as a world power was a key issue in the debate. Many Americans wanted the Philippines for their economic and strategic value. Located on the route to China, the Philippines would be useful as a place to refuel and resupply ships. As a result, many expansionists wanted to annex the Philippines before they fell into the hands of Germany, Japan, or another nation.
Other prominent Americans presented a variety of arguments—political, moral, and economic—against annexation. Some felt that the treaty violated the Declaration of Independence by denying self-government to the newly acquired territories. The African-American educator Booker T. Washington argued that the United States should settle race-related issues at home before taking on social problems elsewhere. The labor leader Samuel Gompers feared that Filipino immigrants would compete for American jobs.
On February 6, 1899, the annexation question was settled with the Senate's approval of the Treaty of Paris. The United States now had an empire that included Guam, Puerto Rico, and the Philippines. The next question Americans faced was how and when the United States would add to its dominion.
Jose Marti Valeriano Weyler
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
yellow Journalism U.S.S. Maine
San Juan Hill Treaty of Paris
George Dewey Rough Riders
MAIN IDEA 2. USING YOUR NOTES
CRITICAL THINKING 3. MAKING INFERENCES
ANALYZING EFFECTS
In 1898, a debate raged in the United States over whether the U.S. had the right to annex the
What do you think were the unstated
editorial policies of yellow journalism? Support your answer with evidence from the text.
Think About:
Many anti-imperialists worried that imperialism might threaten the
American democratic system. How might this happen?
EXPLAINING IMPACT
Philippines. Use a graphic organizer like the one below to summarize the
pros and cons of this debate.
• Hearst’s remark to Remington
• the Journal headline about the explosion of the battleship Maine
Which side do you support? Why?
• James Creelman’s account of Spanish atrocities against Cubans (page 346)
Why did significant events move the United States into the position of a world power? How did the Spanish-American War factor into this shift?
America Claims an Empire 351
Acquiring New Lands
MAIN IDEA
j WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
In the early 1900s, the United States engaged in conflicts in Puerto Rico, Cuba, and the Philippines.
Today, the United States maintains a strong military and political presence in strategic worldwide locations.
•	Foraker Act	• John Hay
•	Platt Amendment ’Open Door notes
•	protectorate	• Boxer Rebellion
•	Emilio Agulnaldo

MBSSSSSBK
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on key events relating to U.S. relations with Cuba, Puerto Rico, and the Philippines.
When Puerto Rico became part of the United States after the Spanish-American War, many Puerto Ricans feared that the United States would not give them the measure of self-rule that they had gained under the Spanish. Puerto Rican statesman and publisher Luis Munoz Rivera was one of the most vocal advocates of Puerto Rican self-rule. Between 1900 and 1916, he lived primarily in the United States and continually worked for the independence of his homeland. Finally, in 1916, the U.S. Congress, facing possible war in Europe and wishing to settle the issue of Puerto Rico, invited Mufioz Rivera to speak. On May 5, 1916, Munoz Rivera stood before the U.S. House of Representatives to discuss the future of Puerto Rico.
A
Personal Voice luis munoz rivera a “You, citizens of a free fatherland, with its own laws, Its own Institutions, and its LU> own flag, can appreciate the unhappiness of the small and solitary people that must await its laws from your authority. .. . when you acquire the certainty that you can found in Puerto Rico a republic like that founded in Cuba and Panama . . . give us our independence and you will stand before humanity as ... a great creator of new nationalities and a great liberator of oppressed peoples. ”
—quoted in The Puerto Ricans
Munoz Rivera returned to Puerto Rico where he died in November 1916. Three months later, the United States made Puerto Ricans U.S. citizens.
Ruling Puerto Rico
Not all Puerto Ricans wanted independence, as Munoz Rivera did. Some wanted
statehood, while still others hoped for some measure of local self-government as
an American territory. As a result, the United States gave Puerto Ricans no prom-
ises regarding independence after the Spanish-American War.
PUERTO RICO
Ever since their transfer under the Treaty of Paris from Spain to the United States, Puerto Ricans have debated their status, as shown above. In 1967, 1993, and 1998, Puerto Ricans rejected both statehood and independence in favor of commonwealth, a status given the island in 1952.
As members of a commonwealth, Puerto Ricans are U.S. citizens. They can move freely between the island and the mainland and are subjected to the military draft but cannot vote in U.S. presidential elections. A majority of Puerto Ricans have rejected statehood because they fear it would mean giving up their Latino culture.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Issues
Why was Puerto Rico important to the United States?
Background
Yellow fever damages many body parts, especially the liver. Dr. Carlos Finlay discovered that the disease is carried by mosquitoes.
Clearing out the mosquitos’ breeding places helped eliminate the disease in Cuba.
MILITARY RULE
During the Spanish-American War, United States forces, under General Nelson A. Miles, occupied the island. As his soldiers took control, General Miles issued a statement assuring Puerto Ricans that the Americans were there to "bring you protection, not only to yourselves but to your property, to promote your prosperity, and to bestow upon you the immunities and blessings of the liberal institutions of our government." For the time being, Puerto Rico would be controlled by the military until Congress decided otherwise.
RETURN TO CIVIL GOVERNMENT
Although many Puerto Ricans had dreams of independence or statehood, the United States had different plans for the island's future. Puerto Rico was strategically important to the United States, both for maintaining a U.S. presence in the Caribbean and for protecting a future canal that American leaders wanted to build across the Isthmus of Panama. In 1900, Congress passed the Foraker Act, which ended military rule and set up a civil government. The act gave the president of the United States the power to appoint Puerto Rico's governor and members of the upper house of its legislature. Puerto Ricans could elect only the members of the legislature's lower house.
In 1901, in the Insular Cases, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that the Constitution did not automatically apply to people in acquired territories. Congress, however, retained the right to extend U.S. citizenship, and it granted that right to Puerto Ricans in 1917. It also gave them the right to elect both houses of their legislature.
Cuba and the United States
When the United States declared war against Spain in 1898, it recognized Cuba's independence from Spain. It also passed the Teller Amendment, which stated that the United States had no intention of taking over any part of Cuba. The Treaty of Paris, which ended the war, further guaranteed Cuba the independence that its nationalist leaders had been demanding for years.
AMERICAN SOLDIERS
Though officially independent, Cuba was occupied by American troops when the war ended. Jose Martf, the Cuban patriot who had led the movement for independence from Spain, had feared that the United States would merely replace Spain and dominate Cuban politics. In some ways, Marti's prediction came true. Under American occupation, the same officials who had served Spain remained in office. Cubans who protested this policy were imprisoned or exiled. On the other hand, the American military government provided food and clothing for thousands of families, helped farmers put land back into cultivation, and organized elementary schools. Through improvement of sanitation and medical research, the military government helped eliminate yellow fever, a disease that had killed hundreds of Cubans each year.
America Claims an Empire 353
PLATT AMENDMENT
In 1900 the newly formed Cuban government wrote a constitution for an independent Cuba. The constitution, however, did not specify the relationship between Cuba and the United States. Consequently, in 1901, the United States insisted that Cuba add to its constitution several provisions, known as the Platt Amendment, stating that •	Cuba could not make treaties that might limit its independence or permit a foreign power to control any part of its territory
•	the United States reserved the right to intervene in Cuba
•	Cuba was not to go into debt that its government could not repay
•	the United States could buy or lease land on the island for naval stations and refueling stations
The United States made it clear that its army would not withdraw until Cuba adopted the Platt Amendment. In response, a torchlight procession marched on the residence of Governor-General Leonard Wood in protest. Some protestors even called for a return to arms to defend their national honor against this American insult. The U.S. government stood firm, though, and Cubans reluctantly ratified the new constitution. In 1903, the Platt Amendment became part of a treaty between the two nations, and it remained in effect for 31 years. Under the terms of the treaty, Cuba became a U.S. protectorate, a country whose affairs are partially controlled by a stronger power.
PROTECTING AMERICAN BUSINESS INTERESTS
The most important reason for the United States to maintain a strong political presence in Cuba was to protect American businesses that had invested in the island's sugar, tobacco, and mining industries, as well as in its railroads and public utilities. Analyzing
Political Cartoons)-
Vocabulary
ratify: to make valid by approving
I HARDLY KNOW WHICH TO TAKE FIRST!”
Throughout the early 1900s, the United States intervened in the affairs of its Latin American neighbors several times. American troops withdrew from Cuba in 1902 but later returned three times to quell popular uprisings against conservative leaders. The U.S. also intervened in Nicaragua and Haiti. Not surprisingly, few Latin Americans welcomed United States intervention. As the cartoon shows, the United States had a different point of view.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons
1.	What is on the bill of fare, or menu, in this restaurant?
2.	Which president does the waiter portray?
3.	What seems to be Uncle Sam’s attitude toward the offerings on the menu?
54 Chapter 10
Although many businesspeople were convinced that annexing and imposing colonial rule on new territories was necessary to protect American business interests, some were concerned about colonial entanglements. The industrialist Andrew Carnegie argued against the taking of nations as colonies.
A
Personal Voice Andrew carnegie The exports of the United States this year [1898] are greater than those of any other nation in the world. Even Britain’s exports are less, yet Britain ‘possesses’ ... a hundred ‘colonies’ . . . scattered all over the world. The fact that the United States has none does not prevent her products and manufactures from Invading ... all parts of the world in competition with those of Britain. ’’
—quoted in Distant Possessions
Despite such concerns, the U.S. state department continued to push for control of its Latin American neighbors. In the years to come, the United States would intervene time and again in the affairs of other nations in the Western Hemisphere.
U.S. military action in the Philippines resulted in suffering for Filipino civilians. About 200,000 people died as a result of malnutrition, disease, and such guerrilla tactics as the burning of villages.
Filipinos Rebel
In the Philippines, Filipinos reacted with outrage to the Treaty of Paris, which called for American annexation of the Philippines. The rebel leader Emilio Aguinaldo (e-meUyo a'ge-nal'dlo) believed that the United States had promised independence.
When he and his followers learned the terms of the treaty, they vowed to fight for freedom.
PHILIPPINE-AMERICAN WAR
In February 1899, the Filipinos, led by Aguinaldo, rose in revolt. The United States assumed almost the same role that Spain had played, imposing its authority on a colony that was fighting for freedom. When Aguinaldo turned to guerrilla tactics, the United States forced Filipinos to live in designated zones, where poor sanitation, starvation, and disease killed thousands. This was the very same practice that Americans had condemned Spain for using in Cuba. During the occupation, white American soldiers
looked on the Filipinos as inferiors. However, many of the 70,000 U.S. troops sent to the Philippines were African Americans. When African-American newspapers questioned why blacks were helping to spread racial prejudice to the Philippines, some African-American soldiers deserted to the Filipino side and developed bonds of friendship with the Filipinos.
It took the Americans nearly three years to put down the rebellion. About 20,000 Filipino rebels died fighting for independence. The war claimed 4,000 American lives and cost $400 million—20 times the price the United States had paid to purchase the islands.
MAIN IDEA
Contrasting
4^ What were the aims of the Filipinos? of the Americans?
AFTERMATH OF THE WAR
After suppressing the rebellion, the United States set up a government similar to the one it had established for Puerto Rico. The U.S. president would appoint a governor, who would then appoint the upper house of the legislature. Filipinos would elect the lower house. Under American rule, the Philippines moved gradually toward independence and finally became an independent republic on July 4, 1946. America Claims an Empire 355
6°
U.S.
Imperialism, 1867-1906 Bering Sea, 1893 International tribunal denies U.S. claims to exclusive rights to waters of Bering Sea.
^Waki Island 1899
PACIFIC OCEAN
150°W
\ Alaska
120°W
Alaskan Boundary Crisis, 1902-1903
After gold is discovered in Klondike, Canadians want to redraw boundary to Alaskan Panhandle. A tribunal settles in , favor of U.S.	_________
Pearl Harbor, 1887 Hawaii gives U.S. exclusive rights to build a naval base. ^Midway Island
Tn—
^IfCRlCA
> Hawaiian Islands 1838
- Equator -
TyiVESSH
' Big Stick Diplomacy, 1904
Roosevelt sends warships to Morocco when local authorities detain a Greek citizen with dis-& puted U.S. citizenship.
Panama Canal Zone 1903
Samoa, 1889-1899 Hurricane destroys U.S., British, and German ships, preventing armed clash over control of Samoa. Ten years later, the U.S. splits islands with Germany.
Congo Conference, 1885
U.S. persuades European powers to agree to freedom of trade and abolition of slave trade in central Africa.
STATES
	t MO	r6cco\J
		
J	jerto Rico 198	Bi
	s	ATLANTIC	
OCEAN


GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1.	Location On what islands does Pearl Harbor lie?
2.	Human-Environment Interaction What events show the United States acting as a mediator in international disputes? What does this role indicate about the status of the U.S. in the world?
Foreign Influence in China
U.S. imperialists saw the Philippines as a gateway to the rest of Asia, particularly to China. China was seen as a vast potential market for American products. It also presented American investors with new opportunities for large-scale railroad construction.
Weakened by war and foreign intervention, China had become known as the "sick man of Asia." France, Germany, Britain, Japan, and Russia had established prosperous settlements along the coast of China. They also had carved out spheres of influence, areas where each nation claimed special rights and economic privileges.
JOHN HAY’S OPEN DOOR NOTES
The United States began to fear that China would be carved into colonies and American traders would be shut out. To protect American interests, U.S. Secretary of State John Hay issued, in 1899, a series of policy statements called the Open Door notes. The notes were letters addressed to the leaders of imperialist nations proposing that the nations share their trading rights with the United States, thus creating an open door. This meant that no single nation would have a monopoly on trade with any part of China. The other imperialist powers reluctantly accepted this policy. > MAIN IDEA
Analyzing Causes
Ci Why did Secretary of State John Hay issue the policy statements known
~	_ nnnr

Vocabulary martial arts:
combat or self-defense arts that originated in East Asia, such as judo or karate
During the Boxer Rebellion, shown here in this Chinese print, Chinese patriots demanded that all foreigners be expelled from the country. The Boxers surrounded the European section of Beijing and kept it under siege for several months.
THE BOXER REBELLION IN CHINA
Although China kept its freedom, Europeans dominated most of China's large cities. Resentment simmered beneath the surface as some Chinese formed secret societies pledged to rid the country of "foreign devils." The most famous of these secret groups were the Boxers, so named by Westerners because members practiced martial arts. The Boxers killed hundreds of missionaries and other foreigners, as well as Chinese converts to Christianity. In August 1900, troops from Britain, France, Germany, and Japan joined about 2,500 American soldiers and marched on the Chinese capital. Within two months, the international forces put down the Boxer Rebellion. Thousands of Chinese people died during the fighting.
PROTECTING AMERICAN RIGHTS
After the Boxer Rebellion, the United States feared that European nations would use their victory to take even greater control of China. To prevent this, John Hay issued a second series of Open Door notes, announcing that the United States would "safeguard for the world the principle of equal and impartial trade with all parts of the Chinese Empire." This policy paved the way for greater American influence in Asia. The Open Door policy reflected three deeply held American beliefs about the United States industrial capitalist economy. First, Americans believed that the growth of the U.S. economy depended on exports. Second, they felt the United States had a right to intervene abroad to keep foreign markets open. Third, they feared that the closing of an area to American products, citizens, or ideas threatened U.S. survival. These beliefs became the bedrock of American foreign policy.
HISTORY
VIDEO
China:
Boxer Uprising
VJORLD
STAqj? THE BOXER PROTOCOL
On September 7,1901, China and 11 other nations signed the Boxer Protocol—a final settlement of the Boxer Rebellion.
The Qing government agreed to execute some Chinese officials, to punish others, and to pay about $332 million in damages. The United States was awarded a settlement of $24.5 million.
It used about $4 million to pay American citizens for actual losses incurred during the rebellion. In 1908, the U.S. government returned the rest of the money to China to be used for the purpose of educating Chinese students in their own country and in the United States.
America Claims an Empire 357
The Impact of U.S. Territorial Gains __
In 1900, Republican William McKinley, a reluctant but confirmed imperialist, was elected to a second term against Democrat William Jennings Bryan, who staunchly opposed imperialism. McKinley's reelection confirmed that a majority of Americans favored his policies. Under McKinley, the United States had gained an empire that boosted its economy and marked its debut on the world stage.
Yet even before McKinley was reelected, an Anti-Imperialist League had sprung into being. The league included some of the most prominent people in America, such as former president Grover Cleveland, industrial leader Andrew Carnegie, the social worker Jane Addams, and many leading writers. Anti-imperialists had different and sometimes conflicting reasons for their opposition, but all agreed that it was wrong for the United States to rule other people without their consent. The novelist Mark Twain questioned the motives for imperialism in a satirical piece written in 1901.
A
Personal Voice mark twain “Shall we go on conferring our Civilization upon the peoples that sit in darkness, or shall we give those poor things a rest? . . . Extending the Blessings of Civilization to our Brother who Sits in Darkness has been a good trade and has paid well, on the whole; and there is money in it yet.. . but not enough, in my judgment, to make any considerable risk advisable. ”
—quoted in To the Person Sitting in Darkness
As a novelist, Twain had great influence on American culture but little influence on foreign policy. In the early 20th century, the United States under President Theodore Roosevelt and President Woodrow Wilson would continue to exert its power around the globe
Mark Twain
ASSESSMENT
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•	Foraker Act
•	Platt Amendment
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a time line of key events relating to U.S. relations with Cuba, Puerto Rico, and the Philippines.
Use the dates already plotted on the time line below as a guide.
Which event do you think was most significant? Why?
• protectorate •Emilio Aguinaldo
•John Hay •Open Door notes
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	EVALUATING
How did American rule of Puerto Rico harm Puerto Ricans? How did it help Puerto Ricans? Do you think the benefits outweighed the harmful effects? Why or why not?
4.	COMPARING
How was U.S. policy toward China different from U.S. policy toward the Philippines? To what can you attribute the difference?
• Boxer Rebellion
ANALYZING ISSUES
Explain how U.S. foreign policy at the turn of the century affected economic issues. Think About:
•	why the United States wanted access to China's markets
•	the purpose of the Open Door notes
•	the U.S. response to the Boxer Rebellion
358 Chapter 10
TEKS 4A,12A,15C
America as a World Power
MAIN IDEA
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
The Russo-Japanese War, the Panama Canal, and the Mexican Revolution added to America’s military and economic power.
American involvement in conflicts around 1900 led to involvement in World War I and later to a peacekeeper role in today’s world.
•	Panama Canal
•	Roosevelt Corollary
•dollar diplomacy
•	Francisco “Pancho” Villa
•	Emiliano Zapata •John J. Pershing
r One American's Story 1
hmhsocialstudies.coml
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on how Teddy Roosevelt and Woodrow Wilson used American power around the world.
Joseph Bucklin Bishop, a policy adviser to the canal's chief engineer, played an important role in the building of the Panama Canal. As editor of the Canal Record, a weekly newspaper that provided Americans with updates on the project, Bishop described a frustrating problem that the workers encountered.
A
Personal Voice Joseph bucklin bishop “ The Canal Zone was a land of the fantastic and the unexpected. No one could say when the sun went down what the condition of the Cut would be when [the sun] rose. For the work of months or even years might be blotted out by an avalanche of earth or the toppling over of a mountain of rock. It was a task to try men’s souls; but it was also one to kindle in them a joy of combat. . . and a faith in ultimate victory which no disaster could shake. ” Workers digging the Panama Canal faced hazardous landslides and death from disease.
—quoted in The Impossible Dream: The Building of the Panama Canal
The building of the Panama Canal reflected America's new role as a world power. As a technological accomplishment, the canal represented a confident nation's refusal to let any physical obstacle stand in its way.
Teddy Roosevelt and the World
The assassination of William McKinley in 1901 thrust Vice-President Theodore Roosevelt into the role of a world leader. Roosevelt was unwilling to allow the imperial powers of Europe to control the world's political and economic destiny. In 1905, building on the Open Door notes to increase American influence in East Asia, Roosevelt mediated a settlement in a war between Russia and Japan.
America Claims an Empire 359
Ky.y PLAYER
THEODORE ROOSEVELT 1858-1919
Rimless glasses, a bushy mustache, and prominent teeth made Roosevelt easy for cartoonists to caricature. His great enthusiasm for physical activity—boxing, tennis, swimming, horseback riding, and hunting—provided cartoonists with additional material.
Some cartoons portrayed Roosevelt with the toy teddy bear that he inspired.
Roosevelt had six children, who became notorious for their rowdy antics. Their father once sent a message through the War Department, ordering them to call off their “attack” on the White House. Roosevelt thrived on the challenges of the presidency. He wrote, “I do not believe that anyone else has ever enjoyed the White House as much as I have.”
ROOSEVELT THE PEACEMAKER
In 1904, Russia and Japan, Russia's neighbor in East Asia, were both imperialist powers, and they were competing for contro of Korea. The Japanese took the first action in what would become the Russo-Japanese War with a sudden attack on the Russian Pacific fleet. To everyone s surprise, Japan destroyed it. Japan then proceeded to destroy a second fleet sent as reinforcement. Japan also won a series of land battles, securing Korea and Manchuria. As a result of these battles, Japan began to run out of men and money, a fact that it did not want to reveal to Russia. Instead, Japanese officials approached President Roosevelt in secret and asked him to mediate peace negotiations. Roosevelt agreed, and in 1905, Russian and Japanese delegates convened in Portsmouth, New Hampshire.
The first meeting took place on the presidential yacht. Roosevelt had a charming way of greeting people with a grasp of the hand, a broad grin, and a hearty "Dee-lighted. Soon the opposing delegates began to relax and cordially shook hands.
The Japanese wanted Sakhalin Island, off the coast of Siberia, and a large sum of money from Russia. Russia refused. Roosevelt persuaded Japan to accept half the island and forgo the cash payment. In exchange, Russia agreed to let Japan take over Russian interests in Manchuria and Korea. The successful efforts in negotiating the Treaty of Portsmouth won Roosevelt the 1906 Nobel Peace Prize.
As U.S. and Japanese interests expanded in East Asia, the two nations continued diplomatic talks. In later agreements, they pledged to respect each other's possessions and interests in East Asia and the Pacific. &
PANAMA CANAL
By the time Roosevelt became president, many Americans, including Roosevelt, felt that the United States needed a canal cutting across Central America. Such a canal would greatly reduce travel time for commercial and military ships by providing a shortcut between the Atlantic and Pacific oceans. As early as 1850, the United States and Britain had agreed to share the rights to such a canal. In the Hay-Pauncefote Treaty of 1901, however, Britain gave the United States exclusive rights to build and control a canal through Central America. Engineers identified two possible routes for the proposed canal. One, through Nicaragua, posed fewer obstacles because much of it crossed a large lake. The other route crossed through Panama (then a province of Colombia) and was shorter and filled with mountains and swamps. Site selection was influenced as much by human geographic factors as physical. In the late 1800s, a French company had tried to build a canal in Panama. After ten years, the company gave up. It sent an agent, Philippe Bunau-Varilla, to Washington to convince the United States to buy its claim. In 1903, the president and Congress decided to use the Panama route and agreed to buy the French company's route for $40 million.	7
Before beginning work on the Panama Canal, the United States had to get
permission from Colombia, which then ruled Panama. When these negotiations
broke down, Bunau-Varilla helped organize a Panamanian rebellion against
Colombra. On November 3, 1903, nearly a dozen U.S. warships were present as
Panama declared ,ts independence. Fifteen days later, Panama and the United
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
What were the results of Roosevelt’s negotiations with the Japanese and Russians?
360 Chapter 10
TeHchnatagig
When the water has risen, the upper gates are opened, and the ship passes through the lock to the next level.
This photo shows a ship that has entered the canal from the Pacific Ocean side and is heading north through the Miraflores Locks. Ships and boats can also enter the canal through the Atlantic Ocean side and head south through the Gatun Locks.
THE PANAMA CANAL
Locks are used to raise and lower ships a total of 170 feet during the 51-mile trip through the Panama Canal. For example, ships from the Atlantic Ocean are lifted by the Gatun Locks to the level of Gatun Lake. The ships cross the human-made lake, then move through another waterway, the Gaillard Cut. The Pedro Miguel and Miraflores locks then lower the ships to the level of the Pacific Ocean.
Gold Hill
MAIN IDEA
Identifying
Problems
Si What Problems did canal workers encounter in constructing the canal?
States signed a treaty in which the United States agreed to pay Panama $10 million plus an annual rent of $250,000 for an area of land across Panama, called the Canal Zone. The payments were to begin in 1913.
CONSTRUCTING THE CANAL
Due to the challenging physical geography its builders faced, construction of the Panama Canal ranks as one of the world's greatest engineering feats. Builders fought diseases, such as yellow fever and malaria, and soft volcanic soil that proved difficult to remove. Work clearing brush and draining swamps began in 1904. By 1913, the height of construction, more than 43,400 workers were employed. Some had come from Italy and Spain; three-quarters were blacks from the British West Indies. More than 5,600 workers died from accidents or disease. The total cost to the United States was about $380 million. 5/ On August 15 1914/ the canal opened for business, and more than 1,000 merchant ships passed through during its first year. U.S.-Latin American relations, however, had been damaged by American support of the rebellion in Panama. The resulting ill will lasted for decades, despite Congress's paying Colombia $25 million in 1921 to compensate the country for its lost territory.
HISTORY
VIDEO
Panama Canal: Locks
io
America Claims an Empire 361
Analyzing
Political Cartoons J
WORLD’S CONSTABLE”
This cartoon, drawn by Louis Dalrymple in 1905, shows Teddy Roosevelt implementing his new world diplomacy. The cartoon implies that Roosevelt has the right to execute police power to keep the countries of Europe (shown on the right) out of the affairs of Latin American countries (shown on the left).
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons
1.	How does the cartoonist portray President Roosevelt?
2.	Why is “The World’s Constable” a good title for this cartoon?
“Speak softly and carry a big stick; you will go far. ”
THEODORE ROOSEVELT
THE ROOSEVELT COROLLARY
Financial factors drew the United States further into Latin American affairs. In the late 19th century, many Latin American nations had borrowed huge sums from European banks to build railroads and develop industries. Roosevelt feared that if these nations defaulted on their loans, Europeans might intervene. He was determined to make the United States the predominant power in the Caribbean and Central America.
Roosevelt reminded European powers of the Monroe Doctrine, which had been issued in 1823 by President James Monroe. The Monroe Doctrine demanded that European countries stay out of the affairs of Latin American nations. Roosevelt based his Latin America policy on a West African proverb that said, "Speak softly and carry a big stick." In his December 1904 message to Congress, Roosevelt added the Roosevelt Corollary to the Monroe Doctrine. He warned that disorder in Latin Vocabulary America might "force the United States ... to the exer- actional cise of an international police power.” In effect, the statement that corollary said that the United States would now use follows logically force to protect its economic interests in Latin America. from the f,rst
DOLLAR DIPLOMACY
During the next decade, the United States exercised its police power on several occasions. For example, when a 1911 rebellion in Nicaragua left the nation near bankruptcy, President William H. Taft, Roosevelt's successor, arranged for American bankers to loan Nicaragua enough money to pay its debts.
In return, the bankers were given the right to recover their money by collecting
Nicaragua's customs duties. The U.S. bankers also gained control of Nicaragua's
state-owned railroad system and its national bank. When Nicaraguan citizens
heard about this deal, they revolted against President Adolfo Diaz. To prop up
162 Chapter 10
Diaz s government, some 2,000 marines were sent to Nicaragua. The revolt was put down, but some marine detachments remained in the country until 1933.
The Taft administration followed the policy of using the U.S. government to guarantee loans made to foreign countries by American businesspeople. This policy was called dollar diplomacy by its critics and was often used to justify keeping European powers out of the Caribbean.
Woodrow Wilson’s Missionary Diplomacy
The Monroe Doctrine, issued by President James Monroe in 1823, had warned other nations against expanding their influence in Latin America. The Roosevelt Corollary asserted, in 1904, that the United States had a right to exercise international police power in the Western Hemisphere. In 1913, President Woodrow Wilson gave the Monroe Doctrine a moral tone.
According to Wilson's "missionary diplomacy," the United States had a moral responsibility to deny recognition to any Latin American government it viewed as oppressive, undemocratic, or hostile to U.S. interests. Prior to this policy, the United States recognized any government that controlled a nation, regardless of that nation's policies or how it had come to power. Wilson's policy pressured nations in the Western Hemisphere to establish democratic governments. Almost immediately, the Mexican Revolution put Wilson's policy to the test.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Motives
$ Why did President Wilson refuse to
recognize Huerta’s government?
THE MEXICAN REVOLUTION
Mexico had been ruled for more than three decades by a military dictator, Porfirio Diaz. A friend of the United States, Diaz had long encouraged foreign investments in his country. As a result, foreigners, mostly Americans, owned a large share of Mexican oil wells, mines, railroads, and ranches. While foreign investors and some Mexican landowners and politicians had grown rich, the common people of the country were desperately poor. In 1911, Mexican peasants and workers led by Francisco Madero overthrew Diaz. Madero promised democratic reforms, but he proved unable to satisfy the conflicting demands of landowners, peasants, factory workers, and the urban middle class. After two years, General Victoriano Huerta took over the government. Within days Madero was murdered. Wilson refused to recognize the government that Huerta formed. He called it "a government of butchers.''
! J
K K
HISTORY
VIDEO
The Peasant Revolution
/F hmhsocialstudies.coml
:!
INTERVENTION IN MEXICO
Wilson adopted a plan of "watchful waiting," looking for an opportunity to act against Huerta. The opportunity came in April 1914, when one of Huerta's officers arrested a small group of American sailors in Tampico, on Mexico's eastern shore. The Mexicans quickly released them and apologized, but Wilson used the incident as an excuse to intervene in Mexico and ordered U.S. Marines to occupy Veracruz, an important Mexican port. Eighteen Americans and at least 200 Mexicans died during the invasion. The incident brought the United States and Mexico close to war. Argentina, Brazil, and Chile stepped in to mediate the conflict. They proposed that Huerta step down and that U S. troops withdraw without paying Mexico for damages. Mexico rejected the plan, and Wilson refused to recognize a government that had come to power as a result of violence. The Huerta regime soon collapsed, however, and Venustiano Carranza, a nationalist leader, became president in 1915. Wilson withdrew the troops and formally recognized the Carranza government.
Vt.RSPECTfV/.
INTERVENTION IN MEXICO
Most U.S. citizens supported American intervention in Mexico. Edith O’Shaughnessy, wife of an American diplomat in Mexico City, had another perspective. After touring Veracruz, O’Shaughnessy wrote to her mother:
“I think we have done a great wrong to these people; instead of cutting out the sores with a clean, strong knife of war. . . and occupation,... we have only put our fingers in each festering wound and inflamed it further.”
America Claims an Empire 363
History Through

I
I
I
i
ZAPATISTAS (1931)
Jose Orozco, one of Mexico’s foremost artists, painted these Zapatistas (followers of Zapata), to honor the peasant men and women who fought in the Mexican revolution. Orozco did many paintings in support of the revolution. What aspects of the image does the artist use to convey strength and unity?
REBELLION IN MEXICO
Carranza was in charge, but like others before him, he did not have the support of all Mexicans. Rebels under the leadership of Francisco "Pancho" Villa (ve's) andEmiliano Zapata (e-mel-va'no za-pa'ta) opposed Carranza's provisional government. Zapata—son of a mestizo paasant— was dedicated to land reform. "It is better to die on your feet than live on your knees,” Zapata told the peasants who joined him. Villa, a fierce nationalist, had frequently courted the support and aid of the United States. A
Personal Voice pancho villa “ [A]s long as I have anything to do with the affairs In Mexico there will be no further friction between my country and my friends of the North ... To President Wilson, the greatest American, I stand pledged to do what I can to keep the faith he has In my people, and if there is anything he may wish I will gladly do it, for I know It will be for the good of my country. ”
—New York Times, January 11, 1915
Despite Villa's talk of friendship, when President Wilson recognized Carranza's government, Villa threatened reprisals against the United States. In January 1916, Carranza invited American engineers to operate mines in northern Mexico. Before they reached the mines, however, Villa's men took the Americans off a train and shot them. Two months later, some of Villa's followers raided Columbus, New Mexico, and killed 17 Americans. Americans held Villa responsible.
I
CHASING VILLA
With the American public demanding revenge, President Wilson ordered Brigadier General John J. Pershing and an expeditionary force of about 15,000 soldiers into Mexico to capture Villa dead or alive. For almost a year, Villa eluded Pershing's forces. Wilson then called out 150,000 National Guardsmen and stationed them along the Mexican border. In the meantime, 164 Chapter 10
Mexicans grew angrier over the U.S. invasion of their land. In June 1916, U.S. troops clashed with Carranza's army, resulting in deaths on both sides.
Carranza demanded the withdrawal of U.S. troops, but Wilson refused. War seemed imminent. However, in the end, both sides backed down. The United States, facing war in Europe, needed peace on its southern border. In February 1917, Wilson ordered Pershing to return home. Later that year,
Mexico adopted a constitution that gave the government control of the nation's oil and mineral
resources and placed strict regulations on foreign investors.
Although Carranza had called for the constitution of 1917, he failed to carry out its measures. Instead, he ruled oppressively until 1920 when a moderate named Alvaro Obregon came to power. Obregon's presidency marked the end of civil war and the beginning of reform.
U.S. intervention in Mexican affairs provided a clear model of American imperialist attitudes in the early years of the 20th century. Americans believed in the superiority of free-enterprise democracy, and the American government attempted to extend the reach of this economic and political system, even through armed intervention.
The United States pursued and achieved several foreign policy goals in the early 20th century. First, it expanded its access to foreign markets in order to ensure the continued growth of the domestic economy. Second, the United States built a modern navy to protect its interests abroad. Third, the United States exercised its international police power to ensure dominance in Latin America.
▲
Pancho Villa directs a column of his troops through northern Mexico in 1914.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its significance. •Panama Canal	• dollar diplomacy	•Emlliano Zapata
•Roosevelt Corollary	• Francisco “Pancho” Villa *John J. Pershing
SUMMARIZING
USING YOUR NOTES
In a two-column chart, list ways Teddy Roosevelt and Woodrow Wilson used American power around the world during their presidencies.
Using American Power	
Roosevelt	Wilson
	
Choose one example and discuss its impact with your classmates.
CRITICAL THINKING
COMPARING AND CONTRASTING
What do you think were the similarities and differences between Roosevelt’s Big Stick policy and Wilson’s missionary diplomacy? Use evidence from the text to support your response. Think About:
•	the goal of each of these foreign policies
•	how the policies defined the role of U.S. intervention in international affairs
•	how the policies were applied
EVALUATING DECISIONS
In your opinion, should the United States have become involved in the affairs of Colombia, Nicaragua, and Mexico during the early 1900s? Support your answer with details. Think About:
•	the effect of the Roosevelt Corollary
•	the results of dollar diplomacy
•	the implication of Wilson’s missionary diplomacy
America Claims an Empire 365
GEOGRAPHY SPOTLIGHT
The Panama Canal: Funnel for Trade
By the late 19th century the U.S. position in global trade was firmly established. A glance at a world map during that time revealed the trade advantages of cutting through the world's great landmasses at two strategic points. The first cut, through the Isthmus of Suez in Egypt, was completed in 1869 and was a spectacular success. A second cut, this one through Panama, in Central America, would be especially advantageous to the United States. Such a cut, or canal, would substantially reduce the sailing time between the nation's Atlantic and Pacific ports.
It took the United States ten years, from 1904 to 1914, to build the Panama Canal. By 1999, more than 700,000 vessels, flying the flags of about 70 nations, had passed through its locks. On December 31, 1999, Panama assumed full control of the canal.
INTERCOASTAL TRADE
The first boat through the canal heralded the arrival of increased trade between the Atlantic and Pacific ports of the United States.
San Francisco r/	** ‘,j r ‘f 'V?
NewP Orleans
San
Francisco
1 13,000 mi. ■ 5,200 ini.



X


Panama Canal

NUMBERS TELL THE STORY
A ship sailing from New York to San Francisco by going around South America^ travels 13,000 miles; the canal shortens ' the journey to 5,200 miles.
Panama is a narrow stretch of land—-or isthmus —that connects North and South
, America. In building the canal, | engineers took advantage of natural waterways. Moving ships through the mountains
of the Continental Divide required the use of massive locks. Locks allow a section of the canal to be closed off so that the water level can be raised or lowered.
Chapter 10
OCEANGOING VESSELS
Ships, like this one, must be of a certain dimension in order to fit through the canal's locks. These container ships must be no more than 106 feet across and 965 feet in length, with a draft (the depth of the vessel below the water line when fully loaded) of no more than 39.5 feet. Each ship pays a toil based on its size, its cargo, and the number of passengers it carries.
Hi
1
NEW YORK CITY
New York City and other U.S. Atlantic ports accounted for about 60 percent of the traffic using the Panama Canal in the early decades of its existence.

St
NEW ORLEANS
Since its founding in 1718, New Orleans has served as a major port for the products of the areas along the Mississippi River. In 1914, the Panama Canal brought Pacific markets into its orbit.
America Claims an Empire 367
CHAPTER
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name below, write a sentence explaining its significance to U.S. foreign policy between 1890 and 1920.
1.	Queen Liliuokalani
2.	imperialism
3.	Jose Martf
4.	yellow journalism
U.S.S.
Maine 6.	protectorate
7.	Open Door notes
8.	Boxer Rebellion
9.	Panama Canal 10. Roosevelt Corollary
American Imperialism
The U.S. purchased Alaska in 1867. The U.S. annexed Hawaii in 1898.
In 1898, the U.S. helped Cuba win independence from Spain.
In the Treaty of Paris, the U.S. gained Puerto Rico, Guam, and the Philippine Islands.
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
Imperialism and America (pages 342-345)
1.	What three factors spurred American imperialism?
2.	How did Queen Liliuokalani’s main goal conflict with American imperialists’ goals?
The Spanish-American War (pages 346-351)
3.	Why was American opinion about Cuban independence divided?
4.	How did the Spanish-American War affect the U.S. economy?
Acquiring New Lands (pages 352-358)
5.	Why was the U.S. interested in events in Puerto Rico?
6.	What led to the Boxer Rebellion and how did it end?
7.	What three key beliefs about America’s industrial capitalist economy were reflected in the Open Door policy?
America as a World Power (pages 359-365)
8.	What conflict triggered the war between Russia and Japan?
9.	Analyze the impact of human and physical geographic factors on the Panama Canal.
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
Create a Venn diagram like the one below to show the similarities and differences between Jose Martf of Cuba and Emilio Aguinaldo of the Philippines. Following the Spanish-American War, the U.S.
-reorganized the government of Puerto Rico -established a protectorate over Cuba -crushed a revolt in Philippines In 1899, the Open Door policy established U.S. trading rights in China.
In the early 1900s, President Roosevelt initiated plans for the Panama Canal and asserted the right of the U.S. to exercise police power in the Western Hemisphere. President Wilson pressured Mexico and other countries in the Western Hemisphere to establish democratic governments.
HYPOTHESIZING
Would Cuba have won its independence in the late 19th century if the United States had not intervened there? Support your opinion with details from the text. INTERPRETING MAPS
Look carefully at the Caribbean map® page 349 and the world map on page 356. Why do you thinK American naval bases in the Caribbean and the Pacific were beneficial to the United States? EXPLAINING TURNING POINTS
What is the significance -year 1898 as a turning point in American history? Explain oftt
18 Chapter 10

TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the cartoon and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 1.
1. What is the cartoonist’s point of view concerning the relationship between the United States and Cuba?
A
The United States wishes to be friends with Cuba. B
The United States will devour Cuba. C
The United States is wasting its time fighting over such a small area.
D
The United States has no interest in Cuba. Use the map and your knowledge of U.S. history to answer question 2.
2. How did the building of the Panama Canal support United States efforts to become a world power?
F
It gave the United States a colony in Central America. G
It prevented Japan and China from attacking Hawaii. H
It opened up a new avenue for trade with China. J By providing a shortcut between the Atlantic Ocean and Pacific Ocean, it opened up new trading opportunities.
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
^WriteSmart MULTIMEDIA ACTIVITY 
Recall the issues that you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Suppose you are a journalist at the end of the Spanish-American War. You work for William Randolph Hearst’s New York Journal. Write a newspaper editorial that presents your point of view about whether or not the Senate should ratify the Treaty of Paris, thus annexing the Philippines. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your editorial.

I;-';?'1-” >
mv WriteSmart
Imagine you are a worker on the Panama Canal.
Write a diary entry giving details about the work you are doing, the hardships you face, and why you think the project is worthwhile. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your diary entry.
In the late 1800s and early 1900s, a policy of expansionism led the United States to acquire new territories. How did these acquisitions affect the United States? How did this policy move the United States into the position of a world power? Do you think the United States was right to pursue such a policy? Use Internet resources to research opinions on expansionism between 1895 and 1920. Choose a document that reflects your point of view. Then use the document to help you write a speech that specifies and explains that point of view. Provide details to make your arguments clear and convincing while also addressing opposing concerns. Present your speech to the class.
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
America Claims an Empire 369
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Using Primary and Secondary Sources
DEFINING THE SKILL
Primary sources are accounts written or created by people who were present at historical events, either as participants or as observers. Primary sources include letters, diaries, journals, speeches, some news articles, eyewitness accounts, government data, statutes, court opinions, and autobiographies.
Secondary sources are based on primary sources and are produced by people who were not present at the original events. They are written after the event occurred. They often combine information from a number of different accounts and contain an interpretation of the event. The interpretation is the historian’s understanding of what actually happened and why. Secondary sources include history books, historical essays, some news articles, and biographies.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: EVALUATE THE INFORMATION IN EACH TYPE OF SOURCE
Examine a source and identify the author to determine if he or she was at the event or not. If the author was at the event, evaluate his or her credentials. How is the speaker connected to the events? What opinions, biases, assumptions, and points of view can you identify in the source? If it is a secondary source, analyze the information to see if there are details and information missing from primary sources. The following passage describes views of American expansionism in regards to the annexation of Hawaii. It is mainly a secondary source, but it quotes eyewitness accounts that are primary sources. ©Views on American Expansionism
During the late 1800s, Hawaii was swept up in American expansionism.©On one side, native f Hawaiians were shocked by the manipulation and eventual overthrow of their monarchy. On the other side, leaders in the United States wanted more control of the economic benefits and strategic location of Hawaii. By 1893, cries of annexation led to differing attitudes about the situation.
©After Queen Liliuokalani was overthrown, her niece, Princess Kaiulani, made a plea to President | Cleveland in 1893 to restore the Hawaiian monarchy. In her plea, she wrote:	I
"Seventy years ago, Christian America sent over Christian men and women to give religion and | civilization to Hawaii... Today, I a poor weak girl, with not one of my people near me, and all these j Hawaiian statesmen against me, have strength to stand up for the rights of my people. Even now I can hear the wail in my heart, and it gives me strength and courage ... the strength that the seventy	j
millions of people who are in this free land will hear my cry, and will refuse to let their flag cover	!
dishonor to mine."	j
©At the time, John L. Stevens was U.S. minister to Hawaii. In his brief "A Plea for Annexation" within an article called "The Hawaiian Situation," Stevens described the Hawaiian monarchy as extinct and argued that it was imperative that the United States annex Hawaii. He explained his reasoning:
"A paramount reason why annexation should not be long postponed is that, if it soon takes place, the crown and government lands will be cut up and sold to American and Christian Caucasian people, thus preventing the Islands from being submerged and overrun by Asiatics, putting an end to Japanese ambitions stimulated by our strong European rival."
President Cleveland tried in vain to restore the monarchy unable to secure annexation at the time but managed to keep Only five years later, Hawaii was named a U.S. territory.
in Hawaii. ©Business leaders were control of the Hawaiian government.

0 Locate sources. The catalog in your school library or local public library lists resources alphabetically by subject, title, and author. Most of these are secondary sources but may contain copies or excerpts of primary sources. Articles in a general print or online encyclopedia such as Encyclopedia Britannica or World Book can give you an overview of a topic and usually provide references to additional sources.
0 Secondary Source: Look for information collected from several sources. This information can help provide a context for the primary source.
© Primary Source: Identify the title and author and evaluate his or her credentials. What assumptions and biases does the author reveal? What qualifies the writer to report on the event? Here Princess Kaiulani is part of the Hawaiian monarchy and Stevens serves as minister to Hawaii.
0 Secondary source: Look for information collected after the event. A secondary source provides perspective that is typically missing in a primary source.
STRATEGY: MAKE A CHART
Summarize information from primary and secondary sources in a chart. Primary Source	Primary Source	Secondary Source
Author. Princess Kaiulani	Author: John L. Stevens	Author, history textbook
Qualifications: main figure	Qualifications: main figure in	Qualifications: had access
in the events described	the events described	to multiple accounts of event
Information: describes	Information: detailed	Information: describes a
how she feels about the situation, sensory observations, feeling of strength and certainty	consequences of inaction	range of points of view and information available only after event; puts events into historical perspective
APPLYING THE SKILL
Make your own chart. Read Chapter 10, Section 3, "One American's Story" to learn more about Luis Munoz Rivera and Puerto Rican self-rule. Use a chart like the one above to summarize the information from the primary and secondary sources.
1.	Locating sources	.
What is the primary source you can use in this passage? What is the secondary source?
2.	Secondary source	, „	.	.
What information do you think has been collected from several sources.
Who is the author of this quote? What are his or her credentials? What qualifies this individual to report on this event?
4' XdnformSn was collected after the event? What Coes this help you learn about the historical perspective of the quotation.
369 SK2
The First World War
Essential Question
myNotebook
How did World War I affect the United States and Europe?
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
2D, 4C, 4D, 4E,4F,4G, 12B, 13A, 15D, 19B,
A, 25A, 27B, 29B
USA
WORLD
11914; Hollywood,
: California, becomes • the center of movie : production in the U.S.
1914
: [1914] Archduke Franz : Ferdinand and his wife : are assassinated.
[£g£5j German U-boats
:sink the Lusitania, and : 1,198 people die.
: [1915] Alexander Graham : Bell makes first transcon-• tinental telephone call.
1916 Woodrow Wilson is reelected president.
|1914j Germany declares war on Russia and France. Great Britain declares war on Germany and Austria-Hungary.
•	Albert Einstein
: proposes his general : theory of relativity.
1916 The battles of Verdun and the Somme claim millions of lives.
1917 Russia withdraws from the war.
119181 The Bolsheviks establish
a Communist regime in Russia.
[1918] The First World War ends.
INFLUENZA
nttawimy wdowns with
PNEUMONIA
K PS0WW M
ia£ [MMHtlT MKIIItt ISJ THEME B &MHM6 ’« BtPttTMEMF «F KO. YOU MUST DO THE SAME
"tlSaw"» ™ w!«‘“ S'wutK
119191A worldwide influenza epidemic kills over 30 million.
The First World War 371
HELp US TO BEEP CHICAGO THE HEALTHIEST CITY M TSE WORLD
World War I Begins
MAIN IDEA
WHY ITT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
As World War I intensified, the United States was forced to abandon its neutrality.
The United States remains involved in European and world affairs.
•	nationalism »militarism
•	Allies
•	Central Powers •Archduke Franz
Ferdinand
•	no man’s land
•	trench warfare
•	Lusitania
•	Zimmermann note

Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the causes of World War I.
It was about 1:00 e .Q.on April 6, 1917, and the members of the U.S. House of Representatives were tired. For the past 15 hours they had been debating President Wilson's request for a declaration of war against Germany. There was a breathless hush as Jeannette Rankin of Montana, the first woman elected to Congress, stood up. Rankin declared, "I want to stand by my country but I cannot vote for war. I vote no." Later she reflected on her action.
A
Personal Voice jeannette rankin “ I believe that the first vote I cast was the most significant vote and a most significant act on the part of women, because women are going to have to stop war. I felt at the time that the first woman [in Congress] should take the first stand, that the first time the first woman had a chance to say no to war she should say it.” —quoted in Jeannette Rankin: First Lady in Congress
After much debate as to whether the United States should join the fight, Congress voted in favor of U.S. entry into World War I. With this decision, the government abandoned the neutrality that America had maintained for three years. What made the United States change its policy in 1917?
Jeannette Rankin was the only member of the House to vote against the U.S. entering both World War I and World War II.
Causes of World War I
Although many Americans wanted to stay out of the war, several factors made American neutrality difficult to maintain. As an industrial and imperial power, the United States felt many of the same pressures that had led the nations of Europe into devastating warfare. Historians generally cite four long-term causes of the First World War: nationalism, imperialism, militarism, and the formation of a system of alliances.
-HAPTER 11
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Causes
How did
nationalism and imperialism lead to conflict in Europe?
Vocabulary alliance: a formal agreement or union between nations
NATIONALISM
Throughout the 19th century, politics in the Western world were deeply influenced by the concept of nationalism—a devotion to the interests and culture of one's nation. Often, nationalism led to competitive and antagonistic rivalries among nations. In this atmosphere of competition, many feared Germany's growing power in Europe. In addition, various ethnic groups resented domination by others and longed for their nations to become independent. Many ethnic groups looked to larger nations for protection. Russia regarded itself as the protector of Europe's Slavic peoples, no matter which government they lived under. Among these Slavic peoples were the Serbs. Serbia, located in the Balkans, was an independent nation, but millions of ethnic Serbs lived under the rule of Austria-Hungary. As a result, Russia and Austria-Hungary were rivals for influence over Serbia.
IMPERIALISM
For many centuries, European nations had been building empires, slowly extending their economic and political control over various peoples of the world. Colonies supplied the European imperial powers with raw materials and provided markets for manufactured goods. As Germany industrialized, it competed with France and Britain in the contest for colonies. MILITARISM
Empires were expensive to build and to defend. The growth of nationalism and imperialism led to increased military spending. Because each nation wanted stronger armed forces than those of any potential enemy, the imperial powers followed a policy of militarism—the development of armed forces and their use as a tool of diplomacy. By 1890 the strongest nation on the European continent was Germany, which had set up an army reserve system that drafted and trained young men. Britain was not initially alarmed by Germany's military expansion. As an island nation, Britain had always relied on its navy for defense and protection of its shipping routes— and the British navy was the strongest in the world. However, in 1897, Wilhelm II, Germany's kaiser, or emperor, decided that his nation should also become a major sea power in order to compete more successfully against the British. Soon British and German shipyards competed to build the largest battleships and destroyers. France, Italy, Japan, and the United States quickly joined the naval arms race.
ALLIANCE SYSTEM
By 1907 there were two major defense alliances in Europe. The Triple Entente, later known as the Allies, consisted of France, Britain, and Russia. The Triple Alliance consisted of Germany, Austria-Hungary, and Italy. German Emperor Wilhelm II (center) marches with two of his generals, Hindenburg (left) and Ludendorff, during World War I.
373
Germany and Austria-Hungary, together with the Ottoman Empire—an empire o mostly Middle Eastern lands controlled by the Turks—were later known as e Central Powers. The alliances provided a measure of international security because nations were reluctant to disturb the balance of power. As it turned out, a spark set off a major conflict.
An Assassination Leads to War
That spark flared in the Balkan Peninsula, which was known as the powder keg of Europe.” In addition to the ethnic rivalries among the Balkan peoples, Europe s leading powers had interests there. Russia wanted access to the Mediterranean Sea. Germany wanted a rail link to the Ottoman Empire. Austria-Hungary, which had taken control of Bosnia in 1878, accused Serbia of subverting its rule over Bosnia. The "powder keg” was ready to explode.
In June 1914, Archduke Franz Ferdinand, heir to the Austrian throne, visited the Bosnian capital Sarajevo. As the royal entourage drove through the city, Serbian nationalist Gavrilo Princip stepped from the crowd and shot the Archduke and his wife Sophie. Princip was a member of the Black Hand, an organization promoting Serbian nationalism. The assassinations touched off a diplomatic crisis. On July 28, Austria-Hungary declared what was expected to be a short war against Serbia.
The alliance system pulled one nation after another into the conflict. On August 1, Germany, obligated by treaty to support Austria-Hungary, declared war on Russia. On August 3, Germany declared war on Russia's ally France. After Germany invaded Belgium, Britain declared war on Germany and Austria-Hungary. The Great War had begun.
CRISIS IN THE BALKANS
After World War I, Bosnia became part of a country that eventually became known as Yugoslavia. Although Yugoslavia included various religious and ethnic groups, the government was dominated by Serbs.
In 1991, Yugoslavia broke apart, and Bosnia declared independence in 1992. However, Serbs wanted Bosnia to remain part of Serbian-controlled Yugoslavia.
A bloody civil war broke out.
This war became notorious for the mass murder and deportation of Bosnian Muslims, a process known as “ethnic cleansing.” In 1995, the United States helped negotiate a cease-fire.
But peace in the Balkans did not last. In the late 1990s, Albanians in the province of Kosovo also tried to break away from Serbia. Serbia’s violent response, which included the “ethnic cleansing” of Albanians, prompted NATO to intervene. Kosovo declared its independence in 2008, despite Serbia’s opposition.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
Why were so many European nations pulled into the conflict?
The Fighting Starts
On August 3, 1914, Germany invaded Belgium, following a strategy known as the Schlieffen Plan. This plan called for a holding action against Russia, combined with a quick drive through Belgium to Paris; after France had fallen, the two German armies would defeat Russia. As German troops swept across Belgium, thousands of civilians fled in terror. In Brussels, the Belgian capital, an American war correspondent described the first major refugee crisis of the 20th century.
A
Personal Voice richard harding davis “[We] found the side streets blocked with their carts. Into these they had thrown mattresses, or bundles of grain, and heaped upon them were families of three generations. Old men in blue smocks, white-haired and bent, old women in caps, the daughters dressed in their one best frock and hat, and clasping in their hands all that was left to them, all that they could stuff into a pillow-case or flour-sack. . . . Heart-broken, weary, hungry, they passed in an unending caravan. ”
—from Hooray for Peace, Hurrah for War
Vocabulary refugee: a person who flees in search of protection or shelter, as in times of war or religious persecution
’4 Chapter 11

The Western Front 1914-1916


the first time.
Verdun, Feb.-July 1916
French hold the line in longest battle of the war.
Somme, 1st battle, July-Nov. 1916
Disastrous British offensive.
Unable to save Belgium, the Allies retreated to the Marne River in France, where they halted the German advance in September 1914. After struggling to outflank each other's armies, both sides dug in for a long siege. By the spring of 1915, two parallel systems of deep, rat-infested trenches crossed France from the Belgian coast to the Swiss Alps. German soldiers occupied one set of trenches, Allied soldiers the other. There were three main kinds of trenches—front line, support, and reserve. Soldiers spent a period of time in each kind of trench. Dugouts, or underground rooms, were used as officers' quarters and command posts. Between the trench complexes lay "no man's land"—a barren expanse of mud pockmarked with shell craters and filled with barbed wire. Periodically, the soldiers charged enemy lines, only to be mowed down by machine gun fire.
The scale of slaughter was horrific. During the First Battle of the Somme— which began on July 1, 1916, and lasted until mid-November—the British suffered 60,000 casualties the first day alone. Final casualties totaled about 1.2 million, yet only about seven miles of ground changed hands. This bloody trench warfare, in which armies fought for mere yards of ground, continued for over three years. It led to a stalemate wherein neither side could gain an advantage.
f..MAtN IDEA*
Drawing
Conclusions
sgj Why do you think soldiers were rotated in the trenches?
IA». HISTORY
VIDEO
J
Vocabulary emigrate: to leave one’s country or region to settle in another; to move
main idea
Analyzing
Motives
© Why did the United States begin to favor Britain and France?
Americans Question Neutrality
In 1914, most Americans saw no reason to join a struggle 3,000 miles away. The war did not threaten American lives or property. This does not mean, however, that individual Americans were indifferent to who would win the war. Public opinion was strong—but divided.
DIVIDED LOYALTIES
Socialists criticized the war as a capitalist and imperialist struggle between Germany and England to control markets and colonies in China, Africa, and the Middle East. Pacifists, such as lawyer and politician William Jennings Bryan, believed that war was evil and that the United States should set an example of peace to the world. Many Americans simply did not want their sons to experience the horrors of warfare, as a hit song of 1915 conveyed.
“I didn't raise my boy to be a soldier,
I brought him up to be my pride and joy.
Who dares to place a musket on his shoulder,
To shoot some other mother's darling boy?”
Millions of naturalized U.S. citizens followed the war closely because they still had ties to the nations from which they had emigrated. For example, many Americans of German descent sympathized with Germany. Americans of Irish descent remembered the centuries of British oppression in Ireland and saw the war as a chance for Ireland to gain its independence.
On the other hand, many Americans felt close to Britain because of a common ancestry and language as well as similar democratic institutions and legal systems. Germany's aggressive sweep through Belgium increased American sympathy for the Allies. The Germans attacked civilians, destroying villages, cathedrals,
libraries, and even hospitals. Some atrocity stories—spread by British propaganda— later proved to be false, but enough proved true that one American magazine referred to Germany as "the bully of Europe."
More important, America's economic ties with the Allies were far stronger than its ties with the Central Powers. Before the war, American trade with Britain and France was more than double its trade with Germany. During the first two years of the war, America's transatlantic trade became even more lopsided, as the Allies flooded American manufacturers with orders for all sorts of war supplies, including dynamite, cannon powder, submarines, copper wire and tubing, and armored cars. The United States shipped millions of dollars of war supplies to the Allies, but requests kept coming. By 1915, the United States was experiencing a labor shortage. $
Y.CONO.M/f BACKGROUND
TRADE ALLIANCES
Maintaining neutrality proved difficult for American businesses. Trade with Germany became increasingly risky. Shipments were often stopped by the British blockade. In addition, President Wilson and others spoke out against German atrocities and warned of the threat that the German Empire posed to democracy.
From 1912 to 1917, U.S. trade relationships with European countries shifted dramatically. From 1914 on, trade with the Allies quadrupled, while trade with Germany fell to near zero.
Also, by 1917, American banks had loaned $2.3 billion to the Allies, but only $27 million to the Central Powers. Many U.S. leaders, including Treasury Secretary William McAdoo, felt that American prosperity depended upon an Allied victory.
U.S.
Exports to Europe, 1912-1917 I
France Great Britain
■ All Other European Countries
Germany
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Graphs 1.	By how much did total U.S. exports to Europe rise or fall between 1914 and 1917?
2.	What trends does the graph show before the start of the war, and during the war?
The First World War 377
i !t
This image of a U-boat crew machine-gunning helpless survivors of the Lusitania was clearly meant as propaganda.
In fact, U-boats seldom lingered after an attack.
The War Hits Home
Although the majority of Americans favored victory for the Allies rather than the Central Powers, they did not want to join the Allies' fight. By 1917, however, America had mobilized for war against the Central Powers for two reasons: to ensure Allied repayment of debts to the United States and to prevent the Germans from threatening U.S. shipping.
THE BRITISH BLOCKADE
As fighting on land continued, Britain began to make more use of its naval strength. It blockaded the German coast to prevent weapons and other military supplies from getting through. However, the British expanded the definition of contraband to include food. They also extended the blockade to neutral ports and mined the entire North Sea. The results were twofold. First, American ships carrying goods for Germany refused to challenge the blockade and seldom reached their destination. Second, Germany found it increasingly difficult to import foodstuffs and fertilizers for crops. By 1917, famine stalked the country. An estimated 750,000 Germans starved to death as a result of the British blockade.
Americans had been angry at Britain's blockade, which threatened freedom of the seas and prevented American goods from reaching German ports. However, Germany's response to the blockade soon outraged American public opinion.
GERMAN U-BOAT RESPONSE
Germany responded to the British blockade with a counterblockade by U-boats (from Unterseeboot, the German word for a submarine). Any British or Allied ship found in the waters around Britain would be sunk—and it would not always be possible to warn crews and passengers of an attack. One of the worst disasters occurred on May 7, 1915, when a U-boat sank the British liner Lusitania (loo'si-ta'ne-a) off the southern coast of Ireland Of the 1,198 persons lost, 128 were Americans. The Germans defended their action on the grounds that the liner carried ammunition. Despite Germany's explanation Americans became outraged with Germany because of the loss of life American public opinion turned against Germany and the Central Powers.
EUROPE via LIVER?®1
LUSITANIA
Fastest and Largest Steamer , now in Atlantic Service Sai I SATURDAY, MAYt.WM Transylvania, Fri., May J J' Orduna, - • Tuesday 1,1 J Tuscania, •» - Fri., May.i, J "• LUSITANIA, Sat., May: ,! Transylvania. Fri-,_J_une A Gibraltar-Genoa-Naples-j5;^ S.S. Carpathia. Tliur., May 1V5®
Through booklnc*

THE
WORLDjOUfS klnc» <» J"'!!’"'1' urnji"	w *
«i«t*
NOTICE!
TRAVELLERS intendinptj
embark on lb? ' ft are reminded Hun a J war exist?, mid her allies am and her allies: that t * war includes He rout to the BriliRh W in accordance with form I ,lcc given by the Impe« f
man Government,
the flag of Great any of her allies, ahE destruction in tll0% ftihf that travellers war-tone on *b PJ0 f() -• Britain or her ttlbca ilieir own risk. IMPERIAL GERMAN El
tosHivtcrox, n. c.
Arab-"
Chapter 11
A newspaper ad for the Lusitania included a warning fromthe German Embassy-
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
How did the German U-boat campaign affect U.S. public opinion?
Despite this provocation, President Wilson ruled out a military response in favor of a sharp protest to Germany. Three months later, in August 1915, a U-boat sank another British liner, the Arabic, drowning two Americans. Again the United States protested, and this time Germany agreed not to sink any more passenger ships. But in March 1916 Germany broke its promise and torpedoed an unarmed French passenger steamer, the Sussex. The Sussex sank, and about 80 passengers, including Americans, were killed or injured. Once again the United States warned that it would break off diplomatic relations unless Germany changed its tactics. Again Germany agreed, but there was a condition: if the United States could not persuade Britain to lift its blockade against food and fertilizers, Germany would consider renewing unrestricted submarine warfare,
THE 1916 ELECTION In November 1916 came the U.S. presidential election. The Democrats renominated Wilson, and the Republicans nominated Supreme Court Justice Charles Evans Hughes. Wilson campaigned on the slogan "He Kept Us Out of War." Hughes pledged to uphold America's right to freedom of the seas but also promised not to be too severe on Germany.
The election returns shifted from hour to hour. In fact, Hughes went to bed believing he had been elected. When a reporter tried to reach him with the news of Wilson's victory, an aide said, "The president can't be disturbed." "Well," replied the reporter, "when he wakes up, tell him he's no longer president."
The United States Declares War
Wilson campaign button
After the election, Wilson tried to mediate between the warring alliances. The attempt failed. In a speech before the Senate in January 1917, the president called for "a peace without victory. ... a peace between equals," in which neither side would impose harsh terms on the other. Wilson hoped that all nations would join in a "league for peace" that would work to extend democracy, maintain freedom of the seas, and reduce armaments.
GERMAN PROVOCATION
The Germans ignored Wilson's calls for peace. Germany's leaders hoped to defeat Britain by resuming unrestricted submarine warfare. On January 31 the kaiser announced that U-boats would sink all ships in British waters—hostile or neutral—on sight. Wilson was stunned. The German decision meant that the United States would have to go to war. However, the president held back, saying that he would wait for "actual overt acts" before declaring war. main idea I
Making
Inferences
$ Why did the Zimmermann note alarm the U.S. government?
The overt acts came. First was the Zimmermann note, a telegram from the German foreign minister to the German ambassador in Mexico that was intercepted by British agents. The telegram proposed an alliance between Mexico and Germany and promised that if war with the United States broke out, Germany would support Mexico in recovering "lost territory in Texas, New Mexico, and Arizona." Next came the sinking of four unarmed American merchant ships, with a loss of 36 lives.
Finally, events in Russia removed the last significant obstacle to direct U.S. involvement in the war. In March, the oppressive Russian monarchy was
Alliances During WWI		
Allies		Central Powers
Australia	India	Austria-Hungary
Belgium	Italy	Bulgaria
British Colonies	Japan	Germany
Canada &	Montenegro	Ottoman Empire
Newfoundland	New Zealand	
France	Portugal	
French North	Romania	
Africa & French	Russia	
Colonies	Serbia	
Great Britain	South Africa	
Greece	United States	
Although not all of the countries listed above sent troops into the war, they all joined the war on the Allied side at		
various times.		
The First World War 379
aajORLDSTAgp
REVOLUTION IN RUSSIA
At first, the Russians surprised the Germans by mobilizing rapidly. Russian troops advanced quickly into German territory but were turned back at the Battle of Tannenberg in August 1914.
Throughout 1915, the Russians endured defeats and continued to retreat. By the end of 1915 they had suffered about 2.5 million casualties. The war also caused massive bread shortages in Russia.
Revolutionaries ousted the czar in March 1917 and established a provisional government. In November, the Bolsheviks, led by Lenin and Trotsky, overthrew the provisional government. They set up a Communist state and sought peace with the Central Powers.
replaced with a representative government. Now supporters of American entry into the war could claim that this was a war of democracies against brutal monarchies.
AMERICA ACTS A
light drizzle fell on Washington on April 2, 1917, as senators, representatives, ambassadors, members of the Supreme Court, and other guests crowded into the Capitol building to hear President Wilson deliver his war resolution. A
Personal Voice woodrow wilson “Property can be paid for; the lives of peaceful and Innocent people cannot be. The present German submarine warfare against commerce is a warfare against mankind. ... We are glad ... to fight... for the ultimate peace of the world and for the liberation of its peoples. . . . The world must be made safe for democracy. ... We have no selfish ends to serve. We desire no conquest, no dominion. We seek no indemnities. ... It is a fearful thing to lead this great peaceful people into war. . . . But the right Is more precious than peace. ”
—quoted in American Voices
Congress passed the resolution a few days later. With the hope of neutrality finally shattered, U.S. troops would follow the stream of American money and munitions that had been heading to the Allies throughout the war. But Wilson's plea to make the world "safe for democracy" wasn't just political posturing. Indeed, Wilson and many Americans truly believed that the United States had to join the war to pave the way for a future order of peace and freedom. A resolved but anxious nation held its breath as the United States prepared for war.
-W
ASSESSMENT
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance, •nationalism	•Central Powers	»no man’s land
•militarism	•Archduke Franz Ferdinand • trench warfare
•Allies
•Lusitania •Zimmermann note
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one shown, list the causes for the outbreak of World War I.
Causes of WWI
Which was the most significant cause? Explain your answer.
CRITICAL THINKING
3.	SYNTHESIZING
Describe some ways in which World War I threatened the lives of civilians on both sides of the Atlantic.
4.	SUMMARIZING
Why were America’s ties with the Allies stronger than its ties with the Central Powers?
ANALYZING IMPACT
How did trench warfare result in a stalemate on the Western Front?
ANALYZING ISSUES
Why do you think Germany escalated its U-boat attacks in 1917? Think About:
•	Germany’s military buildup
•	the effects of the British blockade
•	Germany’s reason for using submarine warfare

Chapter 11
American Power Tips the Balance
MAIN IDEA
The United States mobilized a large army and navy to help the Allies achieve victory.
]£
WHY IT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Names
During World War I, the United States military evolved into the powerful fighting force that it remains today.
•Eddie Rickenbacker •Selective Service Act
•convoy system •American Expeditionary Force
•General John J. Pershing •Alvin York •conscientious objector •armistice

One; American's Story;
hmhsocialstudies.com ]
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on American responses to the war.
Eddie Rickenbacker, famous fighter pilot of World War I, was well known as a racecar driver before the war. He went to France as a driver but transferred to the aviation division. He learned to fly on his own time and eventually joined the U.S. Army Air Service. Rickenbacker repeatedly fought the dreaded Flying Circus—a German air squadron led by the "Red Baron," Manfred von Richthofen.
i
A
Personal Voice eddie rickenbacker “1 put In six or seven hours of flying time each day. ... My narrowest escape came at a time when I was fretting over the lack of action. . . . Guns began barking behind me, and sizzling tracers zipped by my head. ... At least two planes were on my tail. . . . They would expect me to dive. Instead I twisted upward in a corkscrew path called a ‘chandelle.’ I guessed right. As I went up, my two attackers came down, near enough for me to see their faces. I also saw the red noses on those Fokkers [German planes]. I was up against the Flying Circus again.”
—Rickenbacker: An Autobiography
World War I flying ace Eddie Rickenbacker
After engaging in 134 air battles and downing 26 enemy aircraft, Rickenbacker won fame as the Allied pilot with the most victories—"American ace of aces."
America Mobilizes
The United States was not prepared for war. Only 200,000 men were in service when war was declared, and few officers had combat experience. Drastic measures were needed to build an army large and modem enough to make an impact in Europe.
The First World War 381
FOR U.S.ARNY
NEAREST RECRUITING STATION
Drafted men line up for service at Camp Travis in San Antonio, Texas, around 1917.
Vocabulary
separated or isolated from others

James Montgomery Flagg’s portrayal of Uncle Sam became the most famous recruiting poster in American history.
RAISING AN ARMY
To meet the government's need for more fighting power, Congress passed the Selective Service Act in May 1917. The act required men to register with the government in order to be randomly selected for military service. By the end of 1918, 24 million men had registered under the act. Of this number, almost 3 million were called up. About 2 million troops reached Europe before the truce was signed, and three-fourths of them saw actual combat. Most of the inductees had not attended high school, and about one in five was foreign-born. About 400,000 African Americans served in the armed forces. More than half of them served in France. African American soldiers served in segregated units and were excluded from the navy and marines. Most African Americans were assigned to noncombat duties, although there were exceptions. The all-black 369th Infantry Regiment saw more continuous duty on the front lines than any other American regiment. Two soldiers of the 369th, Henry Johnson and Needham Roberts, were the first Americans to receive France's highest military honor, the Croix de Guerre—the "cross of war."
The eight-month training period took place partly in the United States and partly in Europe. During this time the men put in 17-hour days on target practice, bayonet drill, kitchen duty, and cleaning up the grounds. Since real weapons were in short supply, soldiers often drilled with fake weapons—rocks instead of hand grenades, or wooden poles instead of rifles.
Although women were not allowed to enlist, the army reluctantly accepted women in the Army Corps of Nurses, but denied them army rank, pay, and benefits. Meanwhile, some 13,000 women accepted noncombat positions in the navy and marines, where they served as nurses, secretaries, and telephone operators, with full military rank.
MASS PRODUCTION
In addition to the vast army that had to be created and trained, the United States had to find a way to transport men, food, and equipment over thousands of miles of ocean. It was an immense task, made more difficult by German submarine activity, which by early 1917 had sunk twice as much ship tonnage as the Allies had built. In order to expand its fleet, the U.S. govern-ment took four crucial steps. Summarizing
& How did the United States raise an army for the war?
►2 Chapter 11
MAIN IDEA
Summarizing
How did the United States expand its navy so quickly?
First, the government exempted many shipyard workers from the draft and gave others a "deferred" classification, delaying their participation in the draft. Second, the U.S. Chamber of Commerce joined in a public relations campaign to emphasize the importance of shipyard work. They distributed service flags to families of shipyard workers, just like the flags given to families of soldiers and sailors. They also urged automobile owners to give shipyard employees rides to and from work, since streetcars were so crowded. Third, shipyards used prefabrication techniques. Instead of building an entire ship in the yard, standardized parts were built elsewhere and then assembled at the yard. This method reduced construction time substantially. As a result, on just one day—July 4, 1918—the United States launched 95 ships. Fourth, the government took over commercial and private ships and converted them for transatlantic war use.
America Turns the Tide
German U-boat attacks on merchant ships in the Atlantic were a serious threat to the Allied war effort. American Vice Admiral William S. Sims convinced the British to try the convoy system, in which a heavy guard of destroyers escorted merchant ships back and forth across the Atlantic in groups. By fall of 1917, shipping losses had been cut
in half.
The U.S. Navy also helped lay a 230-mile barrier of mines across the North Sea from Scotland to Norway. The barrier was designed to bottle up the U-boats that sailed from German ports and keep them out of the Atlantic Ocean.
By early 1918 the Germans found it increasingly difficult to replace their losses and to staff their fleet with trained submariners. Of the almost 2 million Americans who sailed to Europe during the war, only 637 were lost to U-boat attacks.
World War I Convoy System

merchant ships
	
defensive boundary	
r - ’’i »	<
enemy
submarine
FIGHTING IN EUROPE
After two and a half years of fighting, the Allied forces were exhausted and demoralized. One of the main contributions that American troops made to the Allied war effort, apart from their numbers, was their freshness and enthusiasm. They were determined to hit the Germans hard. Twenty-two-year-old Joseph Douglas Lawrence, a U.S. Army lieutenant, remarked on the importance of American enthusiasm when he described his first impression of the trenches. A
Personal Voice Joseph douglas Lawrence “ I have never seen or heard of such an elaborate, complete line of defense as the British had built at this point. There was a trench with dugouts every three hundred yards from the front line In Ypres back four miles to and including Dirty Bucket. Everything was fronted with barbed wire and other entanglements. Artillery was concealed everywhere. Railroad tracks, narrow and standard gauge, reached from the trenches back into the zone of supply. Nothing had been neglected to hold this line, save only one important thing, enthusiasm among the
troops, and that was the purpose of our presence. ”
__Fighting Soldier: The AEF in 1918
Lieutenant Joseph D. Lawrence
The First World War 383

Fighting “Over There”
The American Expeditionary Force (AEF), led by General John J. Pershing, included men from widely separated parts of the country. American infantrymen were nicknamed doughboys, possibly because of the white belts they wore, which they cleaned with pipe clay, or "dough/' Most doughboys had never ventured far from the farms or small towns where they lived, and the sophisticated sights and sounds of Paris made a vivid impression. However, doughboys were also shocked by the unexpected horrors of the battlefield and astonished by modern warfare.
NEW WEAPONS
With fighting bogged down in the trenches, both the Allied and Central Powers began looking for weapons and tactics to gain an advantage. Although some of these weapons were new, others, like the machine gun, had been so refined that they changed the nature of warfare. The two most innovative weapons were the tank and the airplane. Together, they heralded mechanized warfare, or warfare that relies on machines powered by gasoline and diesel engines. Tanks ran on caterpillar treads and were built of steel so that bullets bounced off. The British first used tanks during the 1916 Battle of the Somme, but not very effectively. By 1917, the British had learned how to drive large numbers of tanks through barbed wire defenses, clearing a path for the infantry.
The early airplanes were so flimsy that at first both sides limited their use to scouting. After a while, the two sides used tanks to fire at enemy planes that were gathering information. Early dogfights, or individual air combats, like the one described by Eddie Rickenbacker, resembled duels. Pilots sat in their open cockpits and shot at each other with pistols. Because it was hard to fly a plane and shoot a pistol at the same time, planes began carrying mounted machine guns. But the planes' propeller blades kept getting in the way of the bullets. Then the Germans introduced an interrupter gear that permitted the stream of bullets to avoid the whirring blades.
^V.v player
GENERAL JOHN J. PERSHING 1860-1948
When General Pershing, the commander of the American Expeditionary Force (AEF), arrived in France, he found that the Allies intended to use American troops simply as reinforcements.
Pershing, however, urged that the AEF operate as an independent fighting force, under American command.
Pershing believed in aggressive combat and felt that three years of trench warfare had made the Allies too defensive. Under Pershing, American forces helped to stop the German advance, ca|> turing important enemy positions. After the war, Pershing was made General of the Armies of the United States—the highest rank given to an officer.
MAIN IDEA
Forming
Generalizations
How did World War I change the nature of warfare?
Background
When the U.S. entered the war, its air power was weak. Then, in July 1917, Congress appropriated a hefty $675 million to build an air force.
Technology)-
TECHNOLOGY AT WAR
Both sides in World War I used new technology to attack more soldiers from greater distances than ever before. Aircraft and long-range guns were even used to fire on civilian targets—libraries, cathedrals, and city districts. The biggest guns could shell a city from 75 miles.
Machine Guns
Firepower increased to 600 rounds per minute.
Airships and Airplanes
One of the most famous WWI planes, the British Sopwith Camel, had a front-mountecj machine gun for “dogfights.” Planes were also loaded with bombs, as were the floating gas-filled "airships” called zeppelms-
Meanwhile, airplanes were built to travel faster and carry heavy bomb loads. By 1918 the British had built up a strategic bomber force of 22,000 planes with which to attack German weapons factories and army bases.
Observation balloons were used extensively by both sides. Balloons were so important strategically that they were often protected by aircraft flying close by, and they became prime targets for Rickenbacker and other ace pilots.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
What were the physical and psychological effects of this new kind of warfare?
The War Introduces New Hazards
None of the new technologies provided the hoped-for advantage. Instead, the stalemate continued, and led to horrific injuries and hazards. The fighting men were surrounded by filth, lice, rats, and polluted water that caused dysentery. They inhaled poison gas and smelled the stench of decaying bodies. They suffered from lack of sleep. Constant bombardments and other experiences often led to battle fatigue and "shell shock," a term coined during World War I to describe a complete emotional collapse from which many never recovered.
Physical problems included a disease called trench foot, caused by standing in cold wet trenches for long periods of time without changing into dry socks or boots. First the toes would turn red or blue, then they would become numb, and finally they would start to rot. The only solution was to amputate the toes, and in some cases the entire foot. A painful infection of the gums and throat, called trench mouth, was also common among the soldiers.
Red Cross ambulances, often staffed by American volunteers, carried the wounded from the battlefield to the hospital. An American nurse named Florence Bullard recounted her experience in a hospital near the front in 1918.
A
Personal Voice Florence bullard “The Army is only twelve miles away from us and only the wounded that are too severely injured to live to be carried a little farther are brought here. . . . Side by side I have Americans, English, Scotch, Irish, and French, and apart in the corners are Boche [Germans]. They have to watch each other die side by side. I am sent for everywhere—in the . . . operating-room, the dressing-room, and back again to the rows of men. . . . The cannon goes day and night and the shells are breaking over and around us. ... I have had to write many sad letters to American mothers. I wonder If it will ever end. w
—quoted in Over There: The Story of America’s First Great Overseas Crusade In fact, the end was near, as German forces mounted a final offensive.
The First World War 385
Chateau-Thierry, June 1918
U.S. troops help stop the German advance on Paris.
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
1. Location Did the Germans achieve their goal of capturing Paris in their March 1918 offensive? Why or why not?
Place What geographical feature of northern France made it particularly well suited to trench warfare?
Allied Victories, 1917-1918
5® Chapter 11
Ypres, 3rd battle, July-Nov. 1917
Allied victory costs over half a million casualties.	J
(Cantigny, May 1918 U.S. troops
fill gaps between French and British lines during German offensive.

American Troops Go on the Offensive
When Russia pulled out of the war in 1917, the Germans shifted their armies from the eastern front to the western front in France. By May they were within 50 miles of Paris. The AEF arrived just in time to help stop the German advance at Cantigny in France. Several weeks later, U.S. troops played a major role in throwing back German attacks at Chateau-Thierry and Belleau Wood. In July and August, they helped win the Second Battle of the Marne. The tide had turned against the Central Powers. In September, U.S. soldiers began to mount offensives against the Germans at Saint-Mihiel and in the Meuse-Argonne area. For more than a month, the Allies pushed northward. In the Battle of the Argonne Forest, the Americans suffered some 120,000 casualties. By November, however, they occupied the hills around Sedan, France. £)
AMERICAN WAR HERO
During the fighting in the Meuse-Argonne area, Alvin York became famous as a war hero. York sought exemption as a conscientious objector, a person who opposes warfare on moral grounds, pointing out that the Bible says, "Thou shalt not kill." York eventually decided that it was morally acceptable to fight if the cause was just. On October 8,1918, armed only with a rifle and a revolver, York killed 25 Germans and—with six other doughboys—captured 132 prisoners. General Pershing called him the outstanding soldier of the AEF. For his heroic acts, York was promoted to sergeant and awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor.
THE COLLAPSE OF GERMANY
On November 3, 1918, Austria-Hungary surrendered to the Allies. That same day, German sailors mutinied against government authority. The mutiny spread quickly Everywhere in Germany, groups of soldiers and workers organized revolutionary councils. On November 9, socialist leaders in the capital, Berlin, established a German republic. The kaiser gave up the throne. Drawing
Conclusions
$ How did American forces help the Allies win the war?
I
Although there were no Allied soldiers on German territory and no truly decisive battle had been fought, the Germans were too exhausted to continue fighting. So at the eleventh hour, on the eleventh day, in the eleventh month of 1918, Germany agreed to a cease-fire and signed the armistice, or truce, that ended the war.
THE FINAL TOLL
World War I was the bloodiest war in history up to that time. Deaths numbered about 22 million, more than half of them civilians. In addition, 20 million people were wounded, and 10 million more became refugees. The direct economic costs of the war may have been about $338 billion. The United States lost 48,000 men in battle, with another 62,000 dying of disease. More than 200,000 Americans were wounded. For the Allies, news of the armistice brought great relief. Private John Barkley described the reaction to the news.
A
Personal Voice john l. barkley “ About 9 o’clock in the evening we heard wild commotion in the little town.
The French people, old and young, were running through the streets. Old men and women we’d seen sitting around their houses too feeble to move, were out in the streets yelling, 'Vive la France! Vive la France! Vive I’America!’. .. .
Down the street came a soldier. He was telling everybody the armistice had been signed. I said, 'What’s an armistice?’ It sounded like some kind of machine to me. The other boys around there didn’t know what it meant either.
When the official word came through that it meant peace, we couldn’t believe it. Finally Jesse said, 'Well kid, I guess it really does mean the war is over.’
I said, 'I just can’t believe it’s true.’
But it was. ”
—No Hard Feelings
i
Across the Atlantic, Americans also rejoiced at the news. Many now expected life to return to normal. However, people found their lives at home changed almost as much as the lives of those who had fought in Europe.

1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
•Eddie Rickenbacker •Selective Service Act
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Fill in a web like the one below to show how Americans responded to the war.
Why was the entire population affected by America’s entry into World War I?
•convoy system •American Expeditionary Force
•General John J. Pershing •Alvin York
CRITICAL THINKING
ANALYZING IMPACT
How did specific needs result in technological innovations in the military during World War I? How did these innovations impact fighting and the stalemate on the Western Front?
4.	analyzing events
What were the significant battles of World War I? How did the AEF contribute to Allied victories?
ANALYZING VISUAL SOURCES
This World War I poster shows the role of non-combatants overseas. What is the message in this propaganda poster?
conscientious objector armistice
Back, our 3K55K girls over thenV^
United War Work Campaign ▼
The First World War 387
TEKS4F,13A,19B,21A
The War at Home
MAIN ODEA
WHY IIT MATTERS NOW
Terms & Naumras
World War I spurred social, political, and economic change in the United States.
Such changes increased government powers and expanded economic opportunities.
War Industries Board Bernard M. Baruch propaganda
•George Creel • Espionage and Sedition Acts •Great Migration
?| hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on how World War I changed American life.
r One American's Story j
The suffragist Harriot Stanton Blatch visited a munitions plant in New Jersey during World War I and proudly described women at work.
A
Personal Voice Harriot stanton blatch “The day I visited the place, In one of the largest shops women had only Just been put on the work, but it was expected that In less than a month they would be found handling all of the twelve hundred machines under that one roof alone. The skill of the women staggers one. After a week or two they master the operations on the 'turret/ gauging and routing machines. The best worker on the 'facing’ machine is a woman. She is a piece worker, as many of the women are. . . . This woman earned, the day I saw her, five dollars and forty cents. She tossed about the fuse parts, and played with that machine, as I would with a baby. ” —quoted in We, the American Women
Before World War I, women had been excluded from many jobs. However, the wartime need for labor brought over a million more women into the work force. For women, as for the rest of society, World War I brought about far-reaching changes.
Congress Gives Power to Wilson
Harriot Stanton Blatch followed in the footsteps of her famous mother, Elizabeth Cady Stanton.
Winning the war was not a job for American soldiers alone. As Secretary of War Newton Baker said, "War is no longer Samson with his shield and spear and sword, and David with his sling. It is the conflict of smokestacks now the combat of the driving wheel and the engine." Because World War I was such an immense conflict, the entire economy had to be refocused on the war effort The shift from producing consumer goods to producing war supplies was too complicated and important a job for private industry to handle on its own so business and government collaborated in the effort. In the process, the power of government was greatly expanded. Congress gave President Wilson direct control over much of the economy, including the power to fix prices and to regulate—even to nationalize—certain war-related industries.
188 Chapter 11
Background
In 1913 Henry Ford speeded up factory production with a constantly moving assembly line. Wartime production spread this technique throughout the country.
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
Why would labor disputes affect the war effort?
WAR INDUSTRIES BOARD
The main regulatory body was the War Industries Board (WIB). It was established in 1917 and reorganized in 1918 under the leadership of Bernard M. Baruch (bo-rook'), a prosperous businessman. The board encouraged companies to use mass-production techniques to increase efficiency. It also urged them to eliminate waste by standardizing products—for instance, by making only 5 colors of typewriter ribbons instead of 150. The WIB set production quotas and allocated raw materials. Under the WIB, industrial production in the United States increased by about 20 percent. However, the WIB applied price controls only at the wholesale level. As a result, retail prices soared, and in 1918 they were almost double what they had been before the war. Corporate profits soared as well, especially in such industries as chemicals, meatpacking, oil, and steel.
The WIB was not the only federal agency to regulate the economy during the war. The Railroad Administration controlled the railroads, and the Fuel Administration monitored coal supplies and rationed gasoline and heating oil. In addition, many people adopted "gasless Sundays" and "lightless nights" to conserve fuel. In March 1918, the Fuel Administration introduced another conservation measure: daylight-saving time, which had first been proposed by Benjamin Franklin in the 1770s as a way to take advantage of the longer days of summer.
WAR ECONOMY
Wages in most industries rose during the war years. Hourly wages for blue-collar workers—those in the metal trades, shipbuilding, and meatpacking, for example—rose by about 20 percent. A household's income, however, was largely undercut by rising food prices and housing costs. By contrast, stockholders in large corporations saw enormous profits. One industrial manufacturer, the DuPont Company, saw its stock multiply in value 1,600 percent between 1914 and 1918. By that time the company was earning a $68-mil-lion yearly profit. As a result of the uneven pay between labor and management, increasing work hours, child labor, and dangerously "sped-up" conditions, unions boomed. Union membership climbed from about 2.5 million in 1916 to more than 4 million in 1919. More than 6,000 strikes broke out during the war months.
To deal with disputes between management and labor, President Wilson established the National War Labor Board in 1918. Workers who refused to obey board decisions could lose their draft
exemptions. "Work or fight," the board told them. However, the board also worked to improve factory conditions. It pushed for an eight-hour workday, promoted safety inspections, and enforced the child labor ban. &
FOOD ADMINISTRATION
To help produce and conserve food, Wilson set up the Food Administration under Herbert Hoover.
Instead of rationing food, he called on people to follow the "gospel of the clean plate." He declared one day a week "meatless," another "sweetless," two days "wheatless," and two other days "porkless." Restaurants removed sugar bowls from the table and served bread only after the first course.
The War Economy, 1914-1920
Average Annual Income
Consumer Price Index*
Source: Historical Statistics of the United States
1914 1915 1916 1917 1918 1919 1920
*A measure of changes in the prices of goods and services commonly bought by consumers
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Graphs 1.	How did the rise in average annual income compare with the rise in prices from 1914 to 1920?
2.	How might the combined change in wages and prices affect a working family?
The First World War 389
A wartime poster encourages Americans to conserve resources.
Homeowners planted "victory gardens" in their yards. Schoolchildren spent their after-school hours growing tomatoes and cucumbers in public parks. As a result of these and similar efforts, American food shipments to the Allies tripled. Hoover also set a high government price on wheat and other staples. Farmers responded by putting an additional 40 million acres into production. In the process, they increased their income by almost 30 percent.
Selling the War
Once the government had extended its control over the economy, it was faced with two major tasks: raising money and convincing the public to support the war.
WAR FINANCING
The United States spent about $35.5 billion on the war effort. The government raised about one-third of this amount through taxes, including a progressive income tax (which taxed high incomes at a higher rate than low incomes), a war-profits tax, and higher excise taxes on tobacco, liquor, and luxury goods. It raised the rest through public borrowing by selling "Liberty Loan" and "Victory Loan” bonds. The government sold bonds through tens of thousands of volunteers. Movie stars spoke at rallies in factories, in schools, and on street corners. As Treasury Secretary William G. McAdoo put it, only "a friend of Germany" would refuse to buy war bonds. Jg>
COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC INFORMATION
To popularize the war, the government set up the nation's first propaganda agency, the Committee on Public Information (CPI). Propaganda is a kind of biased communication designed to influence people's thoughts and actions. The head of the CPI was a former muckraking journalist named George Creel. Creel persuaded the nation's artists and advertising agencies to create thousands of paintings, posters, cartoons, and sculptures promoting the war. He recruited some 75,000 men to serve as "Four-Minute Men," who spoke about everything relating to the war: the draft, rationing, bond drives, victory gardens and topics such as "Why We Are Fighting" and "The Meaning of America."
Nor did Creel neglect the written word. He ordered a printing of almost 25 million copies of "How the War Came to America"-which included Wilson's war message-in English and other languages. He distributed some 75 million pamphlets, booklets, and leaflets, many with the enthusiastic help of the Boy
Summarizing
jgj How did the government raise money for the war effort?
Chapter 11

Scouts. Creel s propaganda campaign was highly effective. However, while the campaign promoted patriotism, it also inflamed hatred and violations of the civil liberties of certain ethnic groups and opponents of the war.
Attacks on Civil Liberties Increase
Early in 1917, President Wilson expressed his fears about the consequences of war hysteria.
A
Personal Voice woodrow wilson “ Once lead this people into war and they’ll forget there ever was such a thing as tolerance. To fight you must be brutal and ruthless, and the spirit of ruthless brutality will enter into the very fiber of our national life, infecting Congress, the courts, the policeman on the beat, the man in the street. Conformity would be the only virtue, and every man who refused to conform would have to pay the penalty. ”
—quoted in Cobb of "The World"
The president's prediction came true. As soon as war was declared, conformity indeed became the order of the day. Attacks on civil liberties, both unofficial and official, erupted.
MAIN IDEA
Developing
Historical
Perspective
§) What effect did the war have on the lives of recent immigrants?
ANTI-IMMIGRANT HYSTERIA
The main targets of these attacks were Americans who had emigrated from other nations, especially those from Germany and Austria-Hungary. The most bitter attacks were directed against the nearly 2 million Americans who had been born in Germany, but other foreign-born persons and Americans of German descent suffered as well. Many Americans with German names lost their jobs. Orchestras refused to play the music of Mozart, Bach, Beethoven, and Brahms. Some towns with German names changed them. Schools stopped teaching the German language, and librarians removed books by German authors from the shelves. People even resorted to violence against German Americans, flogging them or smearing them
Analyzing
| Political Cartoons )
THE ENEMY WITHIN
After the United States entered the war, government propaganda helped inflame prejudice against recent immigrants. In the suspicious atmosphere of the time, conspiracy theories flourished, and foreign spies were believed to be everywhere. This cartoon reveals the hysteria that gripped the country in 1917.
SKILLBUILDER
Analyzing Political Cartoons 1.	What is happening in this cartoon?
2.	What does the cartoonist suggest will happen to “enemy aliens”?
The First World War 391
Vocabulary
sedition: rebellion
against one's
government;
treason
with tar and feathers. A mob in Collinsville, Illinois, wrapped a German flag around a German-born miner named Robert Prager and lynched him. A jury cleared the mob's leader.
Finally, in a burst of anti-German fervor, Americans changed the name of German measles to "liberty measles." Hamburger—named after the German city of Hamburg—became "Salisbury steak" or "liberty sandwich," depending on whether you were buying it in a store or eating it in a restaurant. Sauerkraut was renamed "liberty cabbage," and dachshunds turned into "liberty pups.
ESPIONAGE AND SEDITION ACTS
In June 1917 Congress passed the Espionage Act, and in May 1918 it passed the Sedition Act. Under the Espionage and Sedition Acts a person could be fined up to $10,000 and sentenced to 20 years in jail for interfering with the war effort or for saying anything disloyal, profane, or abusive about the government or the war effort. Like the Alien and Sedition Acts of 1798, these laws clearly violated the spirit of the First Amendment. Their passage led to over 2,000 prosecutions for loosely defined antiwar activities; of these, over half resulted in convictions. Newspapers and magazines that opposed the war or criticized any of the Allies lost their mailing privileges. The House of Representatives refused to seat Victor Berger, a socialist congressman from Wisconsin, because of his antiwar views. Columbia University fired a distinguished psychologist because he opposed the war. A colleague who supported the war thereupon resigned in protest, saying, "If we have to suppress everything we don't like to hear, this country is resting
a pretty wobbly basis."
The Espionage and Sedition Acts targeted socialists and labor leaders.
Eugene V. Debs was handed a ten-year prison sentence for speaking out against the war and the draft. The anarchist Emma Goldman received a two-year prison sentence and a $10,000 fine for organizing the No Conscription League. When she left jail, the authorities deported her to Russia. "Big Bill" Haywood and other leaders of the Industrial Workers of the World (IWW) were accused of sabotaging the war effort because they urged workers to strike for better conditions and higher pay. Haywood was sentenced to a long prison term. (He later skipped bail and fled to Russia.) Under such federal pressure, the IWW faded away,
j MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
Jgj What impact did the Espionage and Sedition Acts have on free speech?
This Industrial The War Encourages Social Change
Workers of the
World (IWW)	Wars often unleash powerful social forces. The period of World War I was no
sticker encourages exception; important changes transformed the lives of African Americans workers to join and women.
the union.
AFRICAN AMERICANS AND THE WAR
Black public opinion about the war was divided. On one side were people like W. E. B. Du Bois, who believed that blacks should support the war effort. il
4
A
Personal Voice w. e. b. du bois “That which the German power represents today spells death to the aspirations of Negroes and all darker races for equality, freedom and democracy. ... Let us, while this war lasts, forget our special grievances and close our ranks shoulder to shoulder with our own white fellow citizens and the allied nations that are fighting for democracy.”
—“Close Ranks”
Chapter 11
Du Bois believed that African-American support for the war would strengthen calls for racial justice. In contrast, William Monroe Trotter, founder of the Boston Guardian, believed that victims of racism should not support a racist government. Trotter condemned Du Bois's accommodationist approach and favored protest instead. Nevertheless, despite grievances over continued racial inequality in the United States, most African Americans backed the war.
MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
E/
How did the war open opportunities for African Americans? THE GREAT MIGRATION
In concrete terms, the greatest effect of the First World War on African Americans' lives was that it accelerated the Great Migration, the large-scale movement of hundreds of thousands of Southern blacks to cities in the North. This great population shift had already begun before the war in the late 19th century, when African Americans trickled northward to escape the Jim Crow South—but after the turn of the century, the trickle became a tidal wave. Several factors contributed to the tremendous increase in black migration. First, many African Americans sought to escape racial discrimination in the South, which made it hard to make a living and often threatened their lives. Also, a boll weevil infestation, aided by floods and droughts, had
ruined much of the South's cotton fields. In the North, there were more job opportunities. For example, Henry Ford opened his automobile assembly line to black workers in 1914. The outbreak of World War I and the drop in European immigration increased job opportunities for African Americans in steel mills, munitions plants, and stockyards. Northern manufacturers sent recruiting agents to distribute free railroad passes through the South. In addition, the publisher of the black-owned newspaper Chicago Defender bombarded Southern blacks with articles contrasting Dixieland lynchings with the prosperity of African Americans in the North.
History Through
THE MIGRATION OF THE NEGRO, PANEL NO. 1
(1940-41) This painting by Jacob Lawrence shows three of the most common destinations for African Americans leaving the South. Why do you
think the artist has not shown any individual facial features?
The First World War 393
However, racial prejudice against African Americans also existed in the North. The press of new migrants to Northern cities caused overcrowding and intensified racial tensions.
Nevertheless, between 1910 and 1930, hundreds of thousands of African Americans migrated to such cities as Chicago, New York, and Philadelphia. Author Richard Wright described the great exodus.
A
Personal Voice richard wright 46 We are bitter no more; we are leaving! We are leaving our homes, pulling up stakes to move on. We look up at the high southern sky and remember all the sunshine and all the rain and we feel a sense of loss, but we are leaving.
We look out at the wide green fields which our eyes saw when we first came into the world and we feel full of regret, but we are leaving. We scan the kind black faces we have looked upon since we first saw the light of day, and, though pain is in our hearts, we are leaving. We take one last furtive look over our shoulders to the Big House— high upon a hill beyond the railroad tracks—where the Lord of the Land lives, and we feel glad, for we are leaving. ”
—quoted in 12 Million Black Voices
WOMEN IN THE WAR
While African Americans began new lives, women moved into jobs that had been held exclusively by men. They became railroad workers, cooks, dockworkers, and bricklayers. They mined coal and took part in shipbuilding. At the same time, women continued to fill more traditional jobs as nurses, clerks, and teachers. Many women worked as volunteers, serving at Red Cross facilities and encouraging the sale of bonds and the planting of victory gardens. Other women, such as Jane Addams, were active in the peace movement. Addams helped found the Women's Peace Party in 1915 and remained a pacifist even after the United States entered the war. President Wilson acknowledged, "The services of women during the supreme crisis have been of the most signal usefulness and distinction; it is high time that part of our debt should be acknowledged." While acknowledgment of that debt did not include equal pay for equal work, it did help bolster public support for woman suffrage. In 1919, Congress finally passed the Nineteenth Amendment, granting women the right to vote. In 1920 the amendment was ratified by the states.
HISTORICAL
SPOTLIGHT
RACE RIOTS
Racial prejudice against African Americans in the North sometimes took violent forms. In July 1917, a race riot exploded in East St. Louis, Illinois. White workers, furious over the hiring of African Americans as strikebreakers at a munitions plant, rampaged through the streets. Forty blacks and nine whites died.
Another riot erupted in July 1919 in Chicago when a 17-year-old African American swam from the water off a “black beach” to the water off a “white beach.” There, white bathers threw rocks at him until he drowned.
African Americans retaliated, and several riots broke out in the city. Order was restored after several days of violence that involved about 10,000 people.
MAIN IDEA
Analyzing
Effects
What effect did the war have on women’s lives?
Women worked in a variety of jobs during the war. Here, women assemble an aircraft wing.

THE FLU EPIDEMIC
In the fall of 1918, the United States suffered a home- front crisis when an international flu epidemic affected about one-quarter of the
U.S. population. The effect of the epidemic on the economy was devastating.
Mines shut down, telephone service was cut in half, and factories and offices
staggered working hours to avoid contagion. Cities ran short of coffins, and the New York City corpses of poor people lay unburied for as long as a week. The mysterious illness street cleaners seemed to strike people who were otherwise in the best of health, and death wore masks to could come in a matter of days. Doctors did not know what to do, other than to avoid catchinS recommend cleanliness and quarantine. One epidemic survivor recalled that "so inf,uenza-many people died from the flu they just rang the bells; they didn't dare take ▼
j MAIN IDEA
Making
Inferences
6| How did wartime conditions help spread the flu?
[corpses] into the church."
In the army, where living conditions allowed contagious illnesses to spread rapidly, more than a quarter of the soldiers caught the disease. In some AEF units, one-third of the troops died. Germans fell victim in even larger numbers than the Allies. Possibly spread around the world by soldiers, the epidemic killed about 500,000 Americans before it disappeared in 1919. Historians believe that the influenza virus killed as many as 30 million people worldwide. G/
World War I brought death and disease to millions but, like the flu epidemic, the war also came to a sudden end. After four years of slaughter and destruction, the time had come to forge a peace settlement. Americans hoped that this "war to end all wars" would do just that. Leaders of the victorious nations gathered at Versailles outside Paris to work out the terms of peace, and President Wilson traveled to Europe to ensure it.
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance.
• War Industries Board	• propaganda	• Espionage and	• Great Migration
M.
Baruch • George Creel Sedition Acts MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one shown, list some of the changes that the war brought about for each group.
Changes Brought About by the War	
African Americans	
Women	
Immigrants	
Explain how each group benefited from or was disadvantaged by these changes.
CRITICAL THINKING
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
How did the war affect government power? Think About:
•	how private business worked with government
•	how much control the president gained over the economy
•	the Espionage and Sedition Acts
MAKING INFERENCES
Why do you think the flu spread so quickly among the troops?
ANALYZING CAUSES AND EFFECTS
In what ways did the Great Migration change demographic patterns within the United States? What were the effects of this change?
ANALYZING ISSUES
Explain the constitutional issues raised by federal government policy changes during World War I.
The First World War 395

supreme COVA^
i
SCHENCK v. UNITED STATES (1919)
ORIGINS OF THE CASE
Charles Schenck, an official of the U.S. Socialist Party, distributed leaflets that called the draft a "deed against humanity” and compared conscription to slavery, urging conscripts to "assert your rights." Schenck was convicted of sedition and sentenced to prison, but he argued that the conviction, punishment, and even the law itself violated his right to free speech. The Supreme Court agreed to hear his appeal. THE RULING A
unanimous court upheld Schenck’s conviction, stating that under wartime conditions, the words In the leaflets were not protected by the right to free speech. LEGAL REASONING
The Supreme Court's opinion in the Schenck case, written by Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr., has become famous as a guide for how the First Amendment defines the right of free speech. Holmes wrote:
LEGAL SOURCES
LEGISLATION
66 The question in every case is whether the words used are used in such circumstances and are of such a nature as to create a clear and present danger that they will bring about the substantive evils that Congress has a right to prevent. ”
Justice Holmes noted that "in ordinary times" the First Amendment might have protected Schenck, but "[w]hen a nation is at war many things that might be said in time of peace . . . will not be endured."
The analogy that Holmes used to explain why Schenck could be punished for his words has become probably the best-known observation ever made about free speech:
“ Protection of free speech would not protect a man in falsely shouting Tire!’ in a theatre and causing a panic. ”
Writing for the Court, Holmes implied that during wartime, Schenck's leaflet was just that dangerous.
Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr., Supreme Court Justice 1902-1932 >
Chapter 11
U.S. CONSTITUTION, FIRST AMENDMENT
(1791) “Congress shall make no law . . . abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press.”
THE SEDITION ACT
(1918) "(W)hoever. . . shall willfully utter, print, write or publish any disloyal, profane, scurrilous, or abusive language about the form of government,. . . Constitution, . . . military or naval forces,. .. flag,. ■ ■ or the uniform of the Army or Navy of the United States . . . shall be punished by a fine of not more than $10,000 or imprisonment for not more than twenty years, or both."
RELATED CASES
DEBS v. UNITED STATES (MARCH, 1919)
The conviction against Eugene Debs for speaking against the war and the draft is upheld.
FROHWERK v. UNITED STATES (MARCH, 1919)
The publisher of a newspaper that had criticized the war is sentenced with a fine and ten years in prison.
ABRAMS v. UNITED STATES (NOV., 1919)
Leaflets criticizing the U.S. expeditionary force in Russia are found to be unprotected by the First Amendment. Holmes writes a dissenting opinion
calling for the “free trade of ideas.’’
WHY IT MATTERED
During the course of World War I, the federal government brought approximately 2,000 prosecutions for violations of the Espionage Act of 1917 or the Sedition Act of 1918, the same laws under which it convicted Schenck, Debs, and Frohwerk.
By the fall of 1919, however, Holmes had changed his mind. The case of Abrams v. United States concerned leaflets that criticized President Wilson's "capitalistic" government for sending troops to put down the Russian Revolution. Justice Holmes, joined by Justice Louis Brandeis, dissented from the majority of the Court, which upheld the conviction. In his dissent, Holmes emphasized the importance of a free exchange of ideas so that truth will win out in the intellectual marketplace. His reasoning won him acclaim as a protector of free speech.
The belief that truth will eventually win out in the marketplace of ideas has become important legal justification for promoting freedom of speech.
HISTORICAL IMPACT
Disagreements about what kinds of speech are "free" under the First Amendment continue. During the 1950s, when people were jailed for supporting Communism, and during the Vietnam War, when war protestors supported draft resistance, these issues again reached the Supreme Court.
The Court has also been asked to decide if young people in schools have the same First Amendment rights as adults. In Tinker v. Des Moines School District (1969), the Court ordered a school to readmit students who had been suspended for wearing black arm bands in protest of the war in Vietnam.
This so-called symbolic speech, such as wearing an armband or burning a draft card or a flag to express an opinion, has sparked heated debate. In Texas v. Johnson (1989), the Court, by a narrow five to four vote, invalidated a law under which a man who burned an American flag to protest Reagan administration policies had been convicted. The decision so outraged some people that members of Congress considered amending the Constitution to prohibit any "physical desecration" of the flag. The amendment did not pass. Our freedoms of expression continue to depend upon the words in the first article of the Bill of Rights,
written more than 200 years ago.
Eugene Debs was arrested for antiwar speeches like the one he gave at this 1916 presidential campaign stop.
In 1965 Mary Beth Tinker and her brother, John, were suspended from school for wearing armbands that symbolically criticized the Vietnam War.
CONNECT TO HISTORY
1. Analyzing Primary Sources Read Justice Holmes’s dissent in Abrams v. United States. Compare it with the opinion he wrote in Schenck v. United States. Explain the major difference or similarity in the two opinions.
CONNECT TO TODAY
2. Visit the links for Historic Decisions of the Supreme Court to research articles about free speech issues. Select several of these issues—such as whether hate groups have a right to march—to discuss with other students in your class. Choose one issue and, as a group, write down as many arguments as you can on both sides of the issue. Then present a debate to the class.
hmhsocialstudies.com
INTERNET ACTIVITY
The First World War 397
I
Wilson Fights for Peace
MAIN IDEA
European leaders opposed most of Wilson’s peace plan, and the U.S. Senate failed to ratify the peace treaty.
f WHY ITT MATTERS NOW
Many of the nationalist issues left unresolved after World War I continue to trouble the world today.
Terms & Names
• Fourteen Points	• Treaty of
•	League of Nations
•Georges
Clemenceau
•	David Lloyd George
Versailles
•	reparations •war-guilt clause
•	Henry Cabot Lodge
hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the Treaty of Versailles.
On<e American
▲
Colonel Edward M. House was a friend and advisor to President Woodrow Wilson.
In January 1918, at the magnificent Palace of Versailles outside Paris, President Wilson tried to persuade the Allies to construct a just and lasting peace and to establish a League of Nations. Colonel E. M. House, a native of Texas and a member of the American delegation to Versailles, later wrote about the conference.
A
Personal Voice colonel e. m. house “How splendid it would have been had we blazed a new and better trail!...
It may be that Wilson might have had the power and influence if he had remained in Washington and kept clear of the Conference. When he stepped from his lofty pedestal and wrangled with representatives of other states, upon equal terms, he became as common clay. ... To those who are saying that the Treaty is bad and should never have been made and that it will Involve Europe in infinite difficulties in its enforcement, I feel like admitting it. But I would also say in reply that empires cannot be shattered and new states raised upon their ruins without disturbance. ”
—quoted in Hooray for Peace, Hurrah for War
House saw what happened when Wilson's idealism ran up against practical politics. The Allied victors, vengeful toward Germany after four years of warfare, rejected most of Wilson's peace program.
Wilson Presents His Plan
Rejection was probably the last thing Wilson expected when he arrived in Europe. Everywhere he went, people gave him a hero's welcome. Italians displayed his picture in their windows; Parisians strewed the street with flowers. Representatives of one group after another, including Armenians, Jews, Ukrainians, and Poles, appealed to him for help in setting up independent nations for themselves.
398 Chapter 11
Vocabulary free trade: the
buying and selling of goods without tariffs, or fees
MAIN IDEA
Developing
Historical
Perspective
kj Why did the Allies reject Wilson’s plan?
FOURTEEN POINTS
Even before the war was over, Wilson presented his plan for world peace. On January 18, 1918, he delivered his now famous Fourteen Points speech before Congress. The points were divided into three groups. The first five points were issues that Wilson believed had to be addressed to prevent another war: 1.	There should be no secret treaties among nations.
2.	Freedom of the seas should be maintained for all.
3.	Tariffs and other economic barriers among nations should be lowered or abolished in order to foster free trade.
4.	Arms should be reduced "to the lowest point consistent with domestic safety, thus lessening the possibility of military responses" during diplomatic crises.
5.	Colonial policies should consider the interests of the colonial peoples as well as the interests of the imperialist powers.
The next eight points dealt with boundary changes.
Wilson based these provisions on the principle of self-determination "along historically established lines of nationality." In other words, groups that claimed distinct ethnic identities were to form their own nation-states or decide for themselves to what nations they would belong.
The fourteenth point called for the creation of an international organization to address diplomatic crises like those that had sparked the war. This League of Nations would provide a forum for nations to discuss and settle their grievances without having to resort to war.
THE ALLIES REJECT WILSON’S PLAN
Wilson's naivete about the political aspects of securing a peace treaty showed itself in his failure to grasp the anger felt by the Allied leaders. The French premier, Georges Clemenceau (klemz an-so"), had lived through two German invasions of France and was determined to prevent future invasions. David Lloyd George, the British prime minister, had just won reelection on the slogan "Make Germany Pay." The Italian prime minister, Vittorio Orlando, wanted control of Austrian-held territory.
Contrary to custom, the peace conference did not include the defeated Central Powers. Nor did it include Russia, which was now under the control of a Communist government, or the smaller Allied nations. Instead, the "Big Four Wilson, Clemenceau, Lloyd George, and Orlando—worked out the treaty's details among themselves. Wilson conceded on most of his Fourteen Points in return for the establishment of the League of Nations.
PLAYER
WOODROW WILSON 1856-1924
At the end of the war, President Wilson wanted the United States to become more involved in international affairs. He believed the nation had a moral obligation to help maintain peace in the world. Wilson’s sense of moral purpose had a lasting influence on American foreign policy.
t to right) David Lloyd George, Georges Clemenceau, ► I Woodrow Wilson in Paris in 1919-
The First World War 399
1

Europe and the Middle East, 1915
i Europe and the Middle East, 1923
[	] Allied Powers
j Central Powers
|	1 Neutral countries
GEOGRAPHY SKILLBUILDER
■HTS~ 500011165	1. Region What had happened to
0 250 500 kilometers	German territory in the east by 1923?
2. Location Which new nation absorbed — .... . -j Serbia and Montenegro by 1923?
0	250	500 miles
0	250 500 kilometers
| New nations
Allied-occupied zones| | IO French Mandate British Mandate
Debating the Treaty of Versailles
On June 28, 1919, the Big Four and the leaders of the defeated nations gathered in the Hall of Mirrors of the Palace of Versailles to sign the peace treaty. After four years of devastating warfare, everyone hoped that the treaty would create stability for a rebuilt Europe. Instead, anger held sway.
PROVISIONS OF THE TREATY
The Treaty of Versailles (var-sf) established nine new nations—including Poland, Czechoslovakia, and Yugoslavia—and shifted the boundaries of other nations. It carved five areas out of the Ottoman Empire and gave them to France and Great Britain as mandates, or temporary colonies. Those two Allies were to administer their respective mandates until the areas were ready for self-rule and then independence. The treaty barred Germany from maintaining an army. It also required Germany to return the region of Alsace-Lorraine to France and to pay reparations, or war damages, amounting to $33 billion to the Allies.
I
hkl,
HISTORY
VIDEO
The Treaty of Versailles
hmhsocialstudies.com!
THE TREATY’S WEAKNESSES
This treatment of Germany weakened the abil- ity of the Treaty of Versailles to provide a lasting peace in Europe. Several basic
flaws in the treaty sowed the seeds of postwar international problems that even-
tually would lead to the Second World War.
First, the treaty humiliated Germany. It contained a war-guilt clause
forcing Germany to admit sole responsibility for starting World War I. Although	___,
German militarism had played a major role in igniting the war, other European [ MAIN^^J nations had been guilty of provoking diplomatic crises before the war. «> arizing Furthermore, there was no way Germany could pay the huge financial Sunnn reparations. Germany was stripped of its colonial possessions in the Pacific, which	Versailles
might have helped it pay its reparations bill.	affect Germany?
11
400 Chapter 11
In addition, for three years the Russians had fought on the side of the Allies, suffering higher casualties than any other nation. However, because Russia was excluded from the peace conference, it lost more territory than Germany did. The Union of Soviet Socialist Republics (or Soviet Union), as Russia was officially called after 1922, became determined to regain its former territory.
Finally, the treaty ignored claims of colonized people for self-determination, as in the case of Southeast Asia, where the Vietnamese people were beginning to demand the same political rights enjoyed by people in Western nations.
OPPOSITION TO THE TREATY
When Wilson returned to the United States, he faced strong opposition to the treaty. Some people, including Herbert Hoover, believed it was too harsh. Hoover noted, "The economic consequences alone will pull down all Europe and thus injure the United States." Others considered the treaty a sell-out to imperialism because it simply exchanged one set of colonial rulers for another. Some ethnic groups objected to the treaty because the new national boundaries it established did not satisfy their particular demands for self-determination. For example, before the war many Poles had been under German rule. Now many Germans were under Polish rule. DEBATE OVER THE LEAGUE OF NATIONS
The main domestic opposition, however, centered on the issue of the League of Nations. A few opponents believed that the League threatened the U.S. foreign policy of isolationism. Conservative senators, headed by Henry Cabot Lodge, were suspicious of the provision for joint economic and military action against aggression, even though it was voluntary. They wanted the constitutional right of Congress to declare war included in the treaty. POINT
COUNTERPOINT
“The League of Nations was the world’s best hope for lasting peace.”
President Wilson campaigned for the League of Nations as “necessary to meet the differing and unexpected contingencies” that could threaten world peace. Wilson believed that the League would create a forum where nations could talk through their disagreements. He also hoped it would provide collective security, in which nations would “respect and preserve as against external aggression the territorial integrity and existing political independence of all members of the League,” and thereby prevent devastating warfare.
Critics complained that membership in the League would limit American independence in international affairs. However, Wilson argued that League membership included “a moral, not a legal, obligation” that would leave Congress free to decide its own course of action. Wilson tried to
assure Congress as well as the general public that the League was “not a straitjacket, but a vehicle of life.” It was also “a definite guaranty . . . against the things that have just come near bringing the whole structure of civilization into ruin.”
TfumN® eRmcAUY  ..................-...........
CONNECT TO HISTORY
Summarizing Both supporters and opponents of the League hoped to preserve peace. How did each group propose to secure peace for the United States? CONNECT TO TODAY
Identifying Problems What are some contemporary arguments against United States participation in international organizations such as the United Nations or the World Court? “The League of Nations posed a threat to U.S. self-determination.”
Senator William Borah was one of the foremost critics of the Treaty of Versailles because he objected to U.S. membership in the League of Nations. Borah feared that membership in the League “would draw America away from her isolation and into the internal affairs and concerns of Europe” and involve the United States in foreign wars. “Once having surrendered and become a part of the European concerns,” Borah wondered, “where, my friends, are you going to stop?”
Many opponents also feared that the League would nullify the Monroe Doctrine by limiting “the right of our people to govern themselves free from all restraint, legal or moral, of foreign powers.”
Although Wilson argued that the League of Nations would have no such power of restraint, Borah was
unconvinced. He responded to Wilson’s argument by asking, “What will your League amount to if it does not contain powers that no one dreams of giving it?”
The First World War 401
I
History Through
Film
ECHOES OF THE GREAT WAR
In the 1920s and 1930s, a number of Hollywood horror films were influenced by memories of the Great War. The Hunchback of Notre Dame and The Phantom of the Opera featured men who, like many veterans, were forced to live with shameful disfigurements.
Other films recalled the war’s bleak landscapes. For example, parts of the movie Frankenstein were filmed on the same sets as All Quiet on the Western Front, the famous war film. James Whale, who directed Frankenstein, was a veteran of the war. Like many of his generation, he remained profoundly disturbed by the horrors the war had unleashed.
Lon Chaney in ► The Phantom of the Opera (1925)
Chaney in The Hunchback of Notre Dame (1923)
(top) All Quiet on the Western Front (1930) (bottom) Frankenstein (1931)
SKILLBUILDER
Interpreting Visual Sources 1.	Why might the theme of human disfigurement be especially powerful to the generation that lived through World War I?
2.	How do horror films of your time reflect specific fears and anxieties of the current generation?
WILSON REFUSES TO COMPROMISE
Wilson unwisely ignored the Republican majority in the Senate when he chose the members of the American delegation. If he had been more willing to accept a compromise on the League, it would have been more likely that the Senate would have approved the treaty. Wilson, however, was exhausted from his efforts at Versailles. Despite ill health, Wilson set out in September 1919 on an 8,000-mile tour. He delivered 34 speeches in about 3 weeks, explaining why the United States should join the League of Nations. On October 2, Wilson suffered a stroke (a ruptured blood vessel to the brain) and lay partially paralyzed for more than two months, unable to even meet with his cabinet. His once-powerful voice was no more than a thick whisper.
When the treaty came up for a vote in the Senate in November 1919, Senator Lodge introduced a number of amendments, the most important of which qualified the terms under which the United States would enter the League of Nations. It was feared that U.S. membership in the League would force the United States to form its foreign policy in accord with the League. Although the Senate rejected the amendments, it also failed to ratify the treaty.
Wilson refused to compromise. "I will not play for position," he proclaimed. "This is not a time for tactics. It is a time to stand square. I can stand defeat; I cannot stand retreat from conscientious duty." The treaty again came up for a vote in March 1920. The Senate again rejected the Lodge amendments—and again failed to muster enough votes for ratification.
The United States finally signed a separate treaty with Germany in 1921, after Wilson was no longer president. The United States never joined the League of Nations, but it maintained an unofficial observer at League meetings.
MAIN IDEA
•2 Chapter 11
Making Inferences
Why were some people afraid of the treaty’s influence over American foreign policy?
J
The Legacy of the War
i
Vocabulary
fascist:
characteristic of or relating to fascism, a system of totalitarian government
When World War I ended, many Americans looked forward to a return of what Warren G. Harding called "normalcy." However, both the United States and the rest of the world had been utterly transformed by the war. At home, World War I had strengthened both the U.S. military and the power of government. It had also accelerated social change, especially for African Americans and women. In addition, the propaganda campaign had provoked powerful fears and antagonisms that were left unchanneled when the war finally came to an end.
In Europe the destruction and massive loss of life severely damaged social and political systems. In many countries the war created political instability and violence that persisted for decades. During the war years, the first Communist state was established in Russia, while after the war, militant fascist organizations seized control in Italy, Spain, and Germany.
World War I had devastated European economies, allowing the United States to emerge as the world's leading economic power. However, the United States still faced economic challenges at home. Increased demand for consumer goods led to inflation and many Americans struggled to afford ordinary items. Farmers who had increased production to meet wartime needs faced setbacks when demand dropped. Still, most Americans looked forward to the new decade as a time of prosperity.
Appalled by the scale of destruction, Americans began to call World War I "the war to end all wars," in the hope that humanity would never again be willing to fight such a war. However, the Treaty of Versailles had settled nothing, and unresolved issues in Europe would eventually drag America in to an even bigger war.
i
i
Domestic Consequences of World War I
•	accelerated America’s emergence as the world’s greatest industrial power
•	contributed to the movement of African Americans to Northern cities
•	intensified anti-immigrant and anti-radical sentiments among mainstream Americans
• brought over one million women into the work force
1. TERMS & NAMES For each term or name, write a sentence explaining its significance. •Fourteen Points	•Georges Clemenceau	’Treaty of Versailles
•League of Nations	•David Lloyd George	• reparations
war-guilt clause Henry Cabot Lodge
i
MAIN IDEA
USING YOUR NOTES
Re-create the spider diagram shown below. Fill in the web with information about the provisions and weaknesses of the Treaty of Versailles and opposition to it.
Do you think Congress should have rejected the treaty?
CRITICAL THINKING
DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
Why didn’t the Treaty of Versailles lay the foundations for a lasting peace?
ANALYZING ISSUES
Why did so many Americans oppose the Treaty of Versailles?
5.	SUMMARIZING
Describe how characteristics and issues of World War I were reflected in film.
6.	HYPOTHESIZING
Predict Germany’s reaction to the Treaty of Versailles. Give reasons for your predictions.
Think About:
•	what Germans thought of the war-guilt clause
•	German reaction to reparations
•	how Germans felt about the loss of territory
ANALYZING EFFECTS
How did the international military conflict of World War I affect the U.S. economy?
The First World War 403
TRACING THEMES
America in World Affairs
The United States has not always been as involved in world affairs as it is today. Throughout its history, the nation's foreign policy has swung back and forth between a commitment to involvement with the world and the desire for isolation. "Steer clear of permanent alliances," George Washington cautioned Americans in his Farewell Address of 1796. Washington's warning to the young nation became a theme of government policy for the next hundred years, as domestic issues dominated Americans' attention.
In the late 1800s, however, Americans began to look outward to the larger world. The country had reached the limits of its continental expansion and stretched from ocean to ocean. As its economic power grew stronger, the United States became more involved in the affairs of its neighbors in the Western Hemisphere.
THE UNITED STATES AND LATIN AMERICA
Throughout the 19th century, the United States expanded its influence in the Western Hemisphere. The Monroe Doctrine was intended to diminish European interference. After the Civil War, American trade with Latin America, including the Spanish colony of Cuba, grew. In fact, the United States traded more heavily with Cuba than Spain did.
When the Cubans rebelled against Spain, Americans sympathized with the rebels. After the battleship U.S.S. Maine sank in the Cuban harbor of Havana, Americans blamed the Spanish, and Congress declared war. After defeating the Spanish, the United States extended its influence in territories such as Puerto Rico, Panama, and Mexico. A new expansionist era had begun.
The Only Way We Can Save Her

’ nKjBTRjAWWiKw U R BATTI.K^HIP —.------ r«fv	--------
c; ■)
c


*’ STaY out’ / STAY OUT for. >, MY SAKE, AS WELL AS YOUR OWN •
s



INVOLVEMENT AND ISOLATIONISM
Before World War I, the United States had generally limited its military involvement to the Western Hemisphere. As the war in Europe progressed, this position became impossible to maintain, as German U-boats increasingly threatened American lives. In spite of fierce opposition from isolationists, the United States joined World War I in 1917. U.S. involvement in the conflict greatly strengthened its armed forces and revealed the nation’s military potential.
After the war, the United States returned to a policy of isolationism. A decade later, as European dictators began menacing other European countries, American public opinion was sharply divided. Many argued that the best way to preserve American democracy was to stay out of war in IQ??6' 11 t00k Japan’s attack on Pearl Harbor, Hawaii,in
1 to force the United States into World War II.
14 Chapter 11

U.S. forces in Vietnam in 1968
This statue of Lenin, the leader of the 1917 Russian Revolution, was toppled by Latvian citizens in 1991.

s n
THE COLD WAR
After World War II, tensions between the United States and Communist countries like the Soviet Union and China developed into a nonmilitary conflict known as the Cold War. During the Cold War, which lasted for nearly 50 years, the United States and the Soviet Union competed to extend their political and economic influence. In some parts of the world, such as Korea and Vietnam, the Cold War led to prolonged military warfare.
The great costs of these conflicts—both in money and in lives— led to renewed calls for isolationism. Nevertheless, the U.S. remained actively involved in the Cold War throughout the 1980s.
LIFE
INVOLVEMENT IN EUROPE
When the fascist threat to democracy became too great to ignore, the United States joined the Allies in fighting the Axis Powers during World War II. The United States and the Soviet Union emerged from the war as the two strongest military powers in the world.
It was now impossible for the nation to return to isolationism.
The United States took an active role in
rebuilding Europe through programs like the Marshall Plan and was instrumental in establishing the Unite Nations. The United States also stayed involved with Europe militarily during the Cold War as a member o the North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO).



The First World War 405
CHAPTER
LONG-TERM CAUSES
■^ASSESSMENT
r
TERMS & NAMES
For each term or name below, write a sentence connection to World War I.
nationalism trench warfare Zimmermann note Selective Service Act General John J. Pershing
6.	armistice
7.	Espionage and Sedition Acts
8.	Great Migration
9.	Fourteen Points 10. Treaty of Versailles
Nationalist tensions in Europe Competition for colonies Arms races and militarism Formation of defense alliances
IMMEDIATE CAUSES
Assassination of Franz Ferdinand Austria-Hungary’s retaliation against Serbia
Declarations of war between rival alliances
Germany’s invasion of Belgium
World War
IMMEDIATE EFFECTS
Destruction and immense loss of life
Revolution in Russia
Social change in United States
Allied victory over Central Powers
Treaty of Versailles
Formation of mandates (temporary
colonies)
League of Nations
MAIN IDEAS
Use your notes and the information in the chapter to answer the following questions.
World War I Begins (pages 372-380)
1.	What were the main reasons for U.S. involvement in thewar?
2.	Where did Germany begin its war offensive, and what happened there?
American Power Tips the Balance (pages 381 387)
3.	How did the United States mobilize a strong military during World War I?
4.	What new weapons made fighting in World War I deadlier than fighting in previous wars?
The War at Home (pages 388-395)
5.	How did the U.S. government sell the war to the nation?
6.	What events during the war undermined civil liberties?
Wilson Fights for Peace (pages 398-403)
7.	What were the major effects of the Treaty of Versailles?
8.	Analyze the major issues raised by Woodrow Wilson’s Fourteen Points.
CRITICAL THINKING
USING YOUR NOTES
In a chart like the one shown, provide causes for the listed effects of World War I. LONG-TERM EFFECTS
Causes			Effects
		
		U.S. enters World War 1
	jp-	
		Germany collapses
		
		U.S. economy becomes more productive
		
Breakup of empires
U.S. policy of isolationism United States' emergence as global economic giant
Rise of militant extremist parties in Europe
Eruption of World War II
DEVELOPING HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVE
How might U.S. involvement in World War I have affected the debate over American isolationism? INTERPRETING MAPS
Look at the maps of Europe befor and after World War I (page 400). Identify the changes in national boundaries and explain why they occurred. EXPLAINING TURNING POINTS
What is the significance of the years 1914-1918 as a turning point in American history? Explain. TEXAS TEST PRACTICE
Use the graph and your knowledge of United States history to answer question 2.
Use the map and your knowledge of United States history to answer question 1.
Which country was an ally of the United States during World War I?
A country A
B country B
C country C
D country D
Military Casualties
Austria-Hungary
Russia
France
Germany
Italy
Great Britain Bulgaria United States
20	40	60	80	100
Casualties (percent of soldiers)
2. The countries with the greatest percentage of military casualties were all —
F
G
H
J
El
members of the Allied Powers, members of the Central Powers, located far from the battlefront. bordering one of the war’s two fronts.
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
TEST PRACTICE
For additional test practice, go online for:
• Diagnostic tests • Tutorials
INTERACT WITH HISTORY
"VWriteSmart COLLABORATIVE
LEARNtl Think about the issues you recorded in myNotebook as you read the chapter. Write a speech arguing for or against American involvement in World War I.
Use information from the chapter to support your argument. Give your speech to the class. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your speech.
"'VWriteSmart
Imagine you are a diplomat participating in the peace talks at the end of World War I. Decide whether you support or oppose the provisions of the Treaty of Versailles. Then write an essay convincing the other participants to adopt your point of view. If you support the treaty, explain why. If you oppose it, offer an alternate version. Use persuasive language and clear examples. Use myWriteSmart in your eBook to write your essay.
XCEHTURY
Organize into small groups and review
the story of Eddie Rickenbacker, the famous World War I fighter pilot. Rickenbacker’s bravery and aviation skills made him a hero. Consider the definition of the term heroic. What qualities make people heroes? Using stories and images from magazines and newspapers, make a poster that defines the term and identifies current heroes. Explain why each individual on the poster represents the word heroic. Display the poster in your classroom.

The First World War 407
End-of-Chapter Skill Activity
Making Predictions
DEFINING THE SKILL
Making predictions entails identifying situations that leaders or groups face or have faced in the past, and then suggesting what course of action they might take as well as what might happen as a result of that action. Making predictions about the effects of past events helps you to understand how events in the past shape the future. Making predictions about the effects of proposed actions, such as proposed legislation, helps you to evaluate the possible courses of action.
UNDERSTANDING THE SKILL
STRATEGY: MAKE A PREDICTION
When reading history, to identify a decision to be made by historical figures, look for words such as decide, decision, and chose. Notice how one political decision often leads to another. Notice both positive and negative consequences of decisions. The following passage discusses the central weaknesses of the Treaty of Versailles, which ended World War I. The chart on the next page lists decisions made by those who framed the treaty, along with alternative decisions and predictions of possible outcomes. I
Weaknesses of the Treaty of Versailles I © First, the treaty humiliated Germany. The war-guilt clause, which forced Germany to accept I blame for the war and pay financial reparations, caused Germans of all political viewpoints to detest ; the treaty.
Q
Second, Russia, which had fought with the Allies, was excluded from the peace conference. ; Russia had suffered almost the same number of casualties as Germany-—the two countries had by far ; the highest casualty rates of the war. Russia lost more territory than Germany did. The Union of Soviet i Socialist Republics, as Russia was called after 1922, grew determined to regain its lost territory.
i ©Third, the treaty ignored the claims of colonized people for self-determination. For example, the : Allies dismissed the claims of the Vietnamese, who wanted freedom from French colonial rule.
© Identify the decisions. Think about what factors make the decision difficult and may have caused people to dislike the decision. In this case, Germans disliked the decision of the framers of the Treaty of Versailles to include the war-guilt clause because the clause forced their country to pay financial reparations.
Q
Decide what other decisions may have been made. Consider alternative choices that leaders or groups may have made in a historical situation. For example, what leaders might have decided not to exclude Russia from the peace conference? © Predict the outcomes of the alternative decisions. Consider the effect a different decision might have on historical events. Remember that there can be more than one consequence to a decision. For example, what might have happened if the Vietnamese were given independence from French colonial rule?
07 SKI
STRATEGY: MAKE A CHART
Record decisions made as well as alternative decisions and possible outcomes. By arranging the information in a chart, you will be better able to analyze each decision and its alternatives and make predictions based on that analysis. In this case, predictions based on alternative decisions suggest that the Treaty of Versailles may have been better able to avoid a world war and decrease tensions worldwide if those drafting the treaty had made different decisions. Decision:
The Treaty included a war-guilt clause.
Alternative decision:
The treaty has no war-guilt clause.
Possible outcome:
Germany rebuilds. World War II does not occur.
Decision:
Kussia was excluded from the peace conference.
Alternative decision:
Kussia was included in the peace negotiations.
Possible outcome:
Tension between the Soviet Union and the West decreases.
Decision:
The treaty ignored the claims of colonized peoples.
Alternative decision:
The treaty respected the claims of colonized peoples.
Possible outcome:
Tensions are reduced worldwide: Vietnam War is averted.
APPLYING THE SKILL
Turn to Chapter 11, Section 1, pages 379-380 and read the passage "The United States Declares War." Make a chart like the one above in which you identify the decision to enter the war, alternative decisions or actions that might have allowed the United States to avoid entering the war, and their possible outcomes. Consider how the effects of each decision might change depending on what action was taken or not taken.
1.	Identify the decisions.
What events occurred that led the United States to declare war?
2.	Decide what other decisions might have been made.
What else could the Germans have done when President Wilson called for peace? What else might have happened if Mexico and Germany did not discuss an alliance? What might have happened if there had been no change in Russian leadership?
3.	Predict the outcomes of the alternate decisions.
Consider your answers to the previous question. Think about the possible outcomes if the alternative decisions that you listed had occurred instead. Write your predicted outcomes in your chart.
407 SK2
! .i


J

When U.S. troops arrived in Europe in 1917 to fight in World War I, the war had been dragging on for nearly three years. The American soldiers suddenly found themselves in the midst of chaos. Each day, they faced the threats of machine gun fire, poison gas, and aerial attacks. Still, the arrival of American reinforcements had sparked a new zeal among the Allies, who believed the new forces could finally turn the tide in their favor. The letters
soldiers wrote to their families back home reveal the many emotions they felt on the battlefield: confusion about their surroundings, fear for their own safety, concern for friends and loved ones, and hope that the war would soon be over.
Explore World War I online through the eyes of the soldiers who fought in it. You can find a wealth of information, video clips, primary sources, activities, and more at
MCI MULTIMEDIA CONNECTIONS
“I have been ok everyfront in France. You cant imagine how torn uy this country really Is. Every where there acre wire entan^lencents and trenches and layouts. Even out frthe war 'zone there are entanyiewcents and layouts to yrotedt the civiliansfrom air raids’’
— Corp. Albert Smith, U.S. soldier
W
Over There Watch the video to learn about the experiences of American soldiers on the way to Europe and upon their arrival.
Letter from France
Read the document to learn about one soldier's observations of wartime life.
*
t P


., -.4 1
•»
tl
J*

r>
War on the Western Front
Watch the video to hear one soldier's vivid account of battle and its aftermath.
		
	'■V	
		
♦ xz	■A x ' tt	
		o HISTORY.
OH
Surrender! Watch the video to experience soldiers' reactions to the news that the war was finally over.
LETTERS FROM WORLD WAR I 407 IVIC2


The 1920s and the Great
